10-K 1 pepsico201810-k.htm FORM 10-K
Table of Contents
UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, DC 20549
FORM 10-K
ANNUAL REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the fiscal year ended December 29, 2018
Commission file number 1-1183
PepsiCo, Inc.
(Exact Name of Registrant as Specified in Its Charter) 
North Carolina
(State or Other Jurisdiction of Incorporation or Organization) 13-1584302
(I.R.S. Employer Identification No.)
700 Anderson Hill Road, Purchase, New York
(Address of Principal Executive Offices)  10577
(Zip Code)
Registrant’s telephone number, including area code: 914-253-2000
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934: 
Title of each class  Name of each exchange on which registered
Common Stock, par value 1-2/3 cents per share  The Nasdaq Stock Market LLC
2.500% Senior Notes Due 2022  The Nasdaq Stock Market LLC
1.750% Senior Notes Due 2021  The Nasdaq Stock Market LLC
2.625% Senior Notes Due 2026  The Nasdaq Stock Market LLC
0.875% Senior Notes Due 2028  The Nasdaq Stock Market LLC
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934: None
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act. Yes x  No ¨
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Act. Yes ¨  No x
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such
reports), and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements for the past 90 days. Yes x  No ¨
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted
pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T (§ 232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that
the registrant was required to submit such files). Yes x  No ¨
Indicate by check mark if disclosure of delinquent filers pursuant to Item 405 of Regulation S-K (§ 229.405 of this chapter) is not
contained herein, and will not be contained, to the best of registrant’s knowledge, in definitive proxy or information statements
incorporated by reference in Part III of this Form 10-K or any amendment to this Form 10-K. x
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, a smaller
reporting company, or an emerging growth company. See the definitions of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer,” “smaller
reporting company,” and “emerging growth company” in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act.  
Large accelerated filer  x   Accelerated filer  ¨
Non-accelerated filer  ¨   Smaller reporting company ¨
  Emerging growth company ¨
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for
complying with any new or revised financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act. ¨    
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act). Yes ¨  No x 
The aggregate market value of PepsiCo, Inc. Common Stock held by nonaffiliates of PepsiCo, Inc. (assuming for these purposes,
but without conceding, that all executive officers and directors of PepsiCo, Inc. are affiliates of PepsiCo, Inc.) as of June 15, 2018,
the last day of business of our most recently completed second fiscal quarter, was $152.0 billion (based on the closing sale price of
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Common Stock on that date as reported on the Nasdaq Global Select Market).
The number of shares of PepsiCo, Inc. Common Stock outstanding as of February 8, 2019 was 1,404,686,108.
Documents Incorporated by Reference
Portions of the Proxy Statement relating to PepsiCo, Inc.’s 2019 Annual Meeting of Shareholders are incorporated by reference into
Part III of this Form 10-K.
Table of Contents
PepsiCo, Inc.
Form 10-K Annual Report
For the Fiscal Year Ended December  29, 2018
Table of Contents
 
PART I   
Item 1. Business 2
Item 1A. Risk Factors 10
Item 1B. Unresolved Staf f Comments 30
Item 2. Properties 31
Item 3. Legal Proceedings 32
Item 4. Mine Safety Disclosures 32
   
PART II   
Item 5. Market for Registrant’ s Common Equity , Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer
Purchases of Equity Securities 36
Item 6. Selected Financial Data 37
Item 7. Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations 43
Item 7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk 132
Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data 132
Item 9. Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure 132
Item 9A. Controls and Procedures 132
Item 9B. Other Information 133
   
PART III   
Item 10. Directors, Executive Of ficers and Corporate Governance 133
Item 1 1. Executive Compensation 133
Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related
Stockholder Matters 134
Item 13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence 134
Item 14. Principal Accounting Fees and Services 134
   
PART IV   
Item 15. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules 135
Item 16. Form 10-K Summary 136
1
Table of Contents
Forward-Looking Statements
This Annu al Report on Form 10-K contains statements reflecting our views abou t our futur e performance that
constitute “forwar d-looking statements”  within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
of 1995 (Reform Act). Statements that constitute forwar d-looking statements within the meaning of the
Reform Act are gene rally identified through the inclusion of words such as “aim,” “anticipate,” “believe,”
“drive,” “estimate,” “expect,” “expr essed confidence,” “forecast,” “futur e,” “goal,” “guidance,”
“intend,” “may ,” “objective,” “outlook,” “plan,” “position,” “potential,” “project,” “seek,” “should,”
“strategy ,” “target,”  “will” or similar statements or variations of such words and other similar expressions.
All statements addressing our futur e operating performance, and statements addressing events and
developments that we expect or anticipa te will occur in the futur e, are forwar d-looking statements within the
meaning of the Reform Act. These forwar d-looking statements are based on currently available information,
operating plans and projections about futur e events and trends. They inher ently involve risks and
uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those predicted in any such forwar d-
looking statement. These risks and uncertainties include, but are not limited to, those described in “Item 1A.
Risk Factors” and “Item 7. Manageme nt’s Discussion and Analysis of Financ ial Condition and Results of
Operations – Our Business – Our Business Risks.” Investors are cautioned not to place undue reliance on
any such forwar d-looking statements, which speak only as of the date they are made. We undertake no
obligation to update any forwar d-looking statement, whether as a result of new information, futur e events or
otherwise. The discussion of risks below and elsewher e in this report is by no means all-inclusive but is
designed to highlight what we believe are important factors to consider when evaluating our futur e
performance.
PART I
Item 1. Business.
When used in this report, the terms “we,” “us,” “our,” “PepsiCo” and the “Company” mean PepsiCo, Inc. and
its consolidated subsidiaries, collectively . Certain terms used in this Annual Report on Form 10-K are defined
in the Glossary included in Item 7. of this report.
Company Overview
We were incorporat ed in Delaware in 1919 and reincorporated in North Carolina in 1986. We are a leading
global food and beverage company with a complementary portfolio of brands, including Frito-Lay , Gatorade,
Pepsi-Cola, Quaker and Tropicana. Through our operations, authorized bottlers, contract manufacturers and
other third parties, we make, market, distribute and sell a wide variety of convenient beverages, foods and
snacks, serving customers and consumers in more than 200 countries and territories.
Our Operations
We are or ganized into six reportable segments (also referred to as divisions), as follows:
1)Frito-Lay North America (FLNA), which includes our branded food and snack businesses in the
United States and Canada;
2)Quaker Foods North  America (QFNA), which includes our cereal, rice, pasta and other branded food
businesses in the United States and Canada;
3)North America Beverages (NAB), whic h includes our beverage businesses in the United States and
Canada;
4)Latin America, which includes all of our beverage, food and snack businesses in Latin America;
5)Europe Sub-Saharan Africa (ESSA), which includes all of our beverage, food and snack businesses in
Europe and Sub-Saharan Africa; and
6)Asia, Middle East and North Africa (AMENA), which includes all of our beverage, food and snack
2
Table of Contents
businesses in Asia, Middle East and North Africa.
Frito-Lay North America
Either independently  or in conjunction with third parties, FLNA  makes, markets, distributes and sells branded
snack foods. These foods include branded dips, Cheetos cheese-flavored snacks , Doritos tortilla chips, Fritos
corn chips , Lay’s potato chips, Ruffles potato chips and Tostitos tortilla chips. FLNA ’s branded products are
sold to independent distributors and retailers. In addition, FLNA ’s joint ventur e with Strauss Group makes,
markets, distributes and sells Sabra refrigerated dips and spreads.
Quaker Foods North America
Either independently or in conjunction with third parties, QFNA  makes, markets, distributes and sells cereals,
rice, pasta  and other branded products . QFNA ’s products include Aunt Jemim a mixes and syrups, Cap’n
Crunch cereal, Life cereal, Quaker Chewy granola bars, Quaker grits, Quaker oat squares, Quaker oatmeal,
Quaker rice cakes, Quaker simply granola and Rice-A-Roni side dishes. These branded products are sold to
independent distributors and retailers.
North America Beverages
Either independently or in conjunction with third parties, NAB makes, markets and sells beverage
concentrates, founta in syrups and finished goods under various beverage brands including Aquafina, Diet
Mountain Dew, Diet Pepsi, Gatorade, Mountain Dew, Pepsi, Propel, Sierra Mist and Tropicana. NAB also,
either independently or in conjunction with third parties, makes, markets, distributes and sells ready-to-drink
tea and coffee products through joint ventures with Unilever (under the Lipton brand name) and Starbucks,
respectively . Further , NAB manufactures and distributes certain brands licensed from Keurig Dr Pepper Inc.,
including Crush, Dr Pepper and Schwep pes, and certain juice brands licensed from Dole Food Company , Inc.
(Dole) and Ocean Spray Cranberries,  Inc. (Ocean Spray). NAB operates its own bottling plants and
distribution facilities and sells branded finished goods directly to independent distributors and retailers. NAB
also sells concentrate and finished goods for our brands to authorized and independent bottlers, who in turn
sell our branded finished goods to independent distributors and retailers in certain markets.
Latin America
Either independently or in conjunction with third parties, Latin America makes, markets, distributes and sells
a number of snack food brands including Cheetos, Doritos, Emperador , Lay’s, Marias Gamesa, Rosquinhas
Mabel, Ruffles, Sabritas, Saladitas and Tostitos, as well as many Quaker -branded cereals and snacks. Latin
America also, either independently or in conjunction with third parties, makes, markets, distributes and sells
beverage concentrat es, fountain syrups and finished goods under various beverage brands including 7UP,
Diet Pepsi, Gatorade, H2oh!, Manzanita  Sol, Mirinda, Pepsi, Pepsi Black and Toddy . These branded products
are sold to autho rized bottlers, independent distributors and retailers. Latin America also, either
independently or in conjunction with third parties, makes, markets, distributes and sells ready-to-drink tea
products through an international joint venture with Unilever (under the Lipton brand name).
Europe Sub-Saharan Africa
Either independently or in conjunction with third parties, ESSA  makes, markets, distributes and sells a
number of leading snack food brands including Cheetos, Chipita, Doritos, Lay’s, Ruffles and Walkers, as well
as many Quaker -branded cereals and snacks, through consolidated businesses, as well as through
noncontrolled affiliates. ESSA  also, either independently or in conjunction with third parties, makes, markets,
distributes and sells beverage concentrates, fountain syrups and finished goods under various beverage brands
including 7UP, Diet Pepsi, Mirinda, Pepsi, Pepsi Max and Tropicana. These branded products are sold to
authorized bottlers, independent distributors and retailers. In certain markets,  however , ESSA  operates its
own bottling plants and distribution facilities. ESSA  also, either independently or in conjunction with third
parties, makes,
3
Table of Contents
markets, distributes and sells ready-to-d rink tea products through an internation al joint venture with Unilever
(under the Lipton brand name). In addition, ESSA  makes, markets, distributes and sells a number of leading
dairy products inclu ding Agusha, Chudo and Domik v Derevne. In December 2018, we acquired SodaStream
International Ltd. (SodaStream), a manufacturer and distributor of sparkling water makers. SodaStream
products are included within ESSA ’s beverage business. See Note 14 to our consolidated financial statements
for additional information about our acquisition of SodaStream.
Asia, Middle East and North Africa
Either independently  or in conjunction with third parties, AMENA  makes, markets, distributes and sells a
number of leading snack food brands including Cheetos, Chipsy , Doritos, Kurkure and Lay’s, as well as many
Quaker branded cereals and snacks, through consolidated businesses, as well as through noncontrolled
affiliates. AMENA  also makes, market s, distributes and sells beverage conce ntrates, fountain syrups and
finished goods under various beverage brands including 7UP, Aquafina, Mirinda , Mountain Dew, Pepsi, Sting
and Tropicana. These branded products are sold to authorized bottlers, independent distributors and retailers.
In certain markets, however , AMENA  operates its own bottling plants and distribution facilities. AMENA
also, eithe r independ ently or in conjunction with third parties, makes, markets, distributes and sells ready-to-
drink tea products through an international joint venture with Unilever (under the Lipton brand name).
Further , we license the Tropicana brand for use in China on co-branded juice products in connection with a
strategic alliance with Tingyi (Cayman Islands) Holding Corp. (T ingyi).
Our Distribution Network
Our products are primarily brought to market through direct-store-delivery (DSD), customer warehouse and
distributor networks . The distribution system used depends on customer need s, product characteristics and
local trade practices.
Direct-Store-Delivery
We, our independent bottlers and our distributors operate DSD systems that deliver beverages, foods and
snacks directly to retail stores where the products are merchandised by our employees or our independent
bottlers. DSD enabl es us to merchandise with maximum visibility and appeal. DSD is especially well-suited
to products that are restocked often and respond to in-store promotion and merchandising.
Customer Warehouse
Some of our produc ts are delivered from  our manufacturing plants and warehouses to customer warehouses.
These less costly systems generally work best for products that are less fragile and perishable, and have lower
turnover .
Distributor Networks
We distribute many of our products through third-party distributors. Third-party distributors are particularly
effective when greater distribution reach can be achieved by including a wide range of products on the
delivery vehicles. For example, our foodservice and vending business distributes  beverages, foods and snacks
to restaurants, businesses, schools and stadiums through third-party foodservice and vending distributors and
operators.
Our products are also available on a growing number of e-commerce websites and mobile commerce
applications as consumer consumption patterns continue to change and retail increasingly expands online.
Ingredients and Other  Supplies
The principal ingredients we use in our beverage, food and snack products are apple, orange and pineapple
juice and other juice concentrates, aspar tame, corn, corn sweeteners, flavorings, flour , grapefruit, oranges and
other fruits, oats, potatoes, raw milk, rice, seasonings, sucralose, sugar , vegetable and essential oils, and
4
Table of Contents
wheat. We also use water in the manufacturing of our products. Our key packaging materials include plastic
resins, including polyethylene terephtha late (PET) and polypropylene resins used for plastic beverage bottles
and film packaging used for snack foods, aluminum used for cans, glass bottles, closures, cardboard and
paperboard cartons. Fuel, electricity and natural gas are also important commodities for our businesses due to
their use in our and our business partners’  facilities and the vehicles delivering our products. We employ
specialists to secure adequate supplies  of many of these items and have not experienced any significant
continuous shortages that would prevent us from meeting our requirements. Many of these ingredients, raw
materials and commodities are purchased in the open market. The prices we pay for such items are subject to
fluctuation, and we manage this risk through the use of fixed-price contracts and purchase orders, pricing
agreements and derivative instruments, including swaps and futures. In addition, risk to our supply of certain
raw mater ials is mitigated through purch ases from multiple geographies and suppliers. When prices increase,
we may or may not pass on such increases to our customers. In addition, we continue to make investments to
improve the sustain ability and resources of our agricultural supply chain, including the development of our
initiative to advance sustainable farming practices by our suppliers and expanding it globally . See Note 9 to
our consolidated financial statements for additional information on how we manage our exposure to
commodity costs.
Our Brands and Intellectual Pr operty Rights
We own numerous valuable trademarks which are essential to our worldwide businesses, including 1893,
Agusha, Amp Energy, Aquafina, Aquafina Flavorsplash, Arto Lifewater , Aunt Jemima, Bare, bubly , Cap’n
Crunch, Cheetos, Chester ’s, Chipsy , Chokis, Chudo, Cracker Jack, Crunchy , Diet Mountain Dew, Diet Mug,
Diet Pepsi, Diet Sierra Mist, Diet 7UP (outside the United States), Domik v Derevne, Doritos, Duyvis, Elma
Chips, Emperador , Frito-Lay , Fritos, Fruktovy Sad, G2, Gamesa, Gatorade, Grandma’ s, H2oh!, Health
Warrior , Imunele, Izze, J-7 Tonus, Kas, KeVita, Kurkure, Lay’s, Life, Lifewtr , Lubimy , Manzanita Sol,
Marias Gamesa, Matutano, Mirinda, Miss Vickie’ s, Mother ’s, Mountain Dew, Mountain Dew Code Red,
Mountain Dew Ice, Mountain Dew Kickstart, Mug, Munchies, Naked, Near East, O.N.E., Paso de los Toros,
Pasta Roni, Pepsi, Pepsi Black, Pepsi Max, Pepsi Next, Pepsi Zero Sugar , Propel, Quaker , Quaker Chewy ,
Rice-A-Roni, Rold Gold, Rosquinhas Mabel, Ruffles, Sabritas, Sakata, Saladitas, Sandora, Santitas, 7UP
(outside the United States), 7UP Free (outside the United States), Sierra Mist, Simba, Smartfood, Smith’ s,
Snack a Jacks, SoBe, SodaStream, Sonric’ s, Stacy’ s, Sting, Stubborn Soda, SunChips, Toddy , Toddynho,
Tostitos, Trop 50, Tropicana, Tropicana  Farmstand, Tropicana Pure Premium, Tropicana Twister , V Water,
Vesely Molochnik, Walkers and Ya. We also hold long-term licenses to use valua ble trademarks in connection
with our products in certain markets, including Dole and Ocean Spray . We also distribute Rockstar Energy
drinks, Muscle Milk protein shakes and various Keurig Dr Pepper Inc. brands, including Dr Pepper in certain
markets, Crush and Schweppes. Joint ventures in which we have an ownership interest either own or have the
right to use certain trademarks, such as Lipton, Sabra and Starbucks. Trademarks remain valid so long as they
are used properly for identification purposes, and we emphasize correct use of our trademarks. We have
authorized, through licensing arrangements, the use of many of our trademarks in such contexts as snack food
joint ventures and beverage bottling appointments. In addition, we license the use of our trademarks on
merchandise that is sold at retail, which enhances brand awareness.
We either own or have licenses to use a number of patents which relate to certain of our products, their
packaging, the processes for their production and the design and operation of various equipment used in our
businesses. Some of these patents are licensed to others.
Seasonality
Our busin esses are affected by seasonal variations. For instance, our beverage sales are higher during the
warmer months and certain food and dairy sales are higher in the cooler months. Weekly beverage and snack
sales are generally highest in the third quarter due to seasonal and holiday-re lated patterns, and generally
lowest in the first quarter . However , taken as a whole, seasonality has not had a material impact on our
5
Table of Contents
consolidated financial results.
Our Customers
Our customers include wholesale and other distributors, foodservice customers, grocery stores, drug stores,
convenience stores,  discount/dollar stores, mass merchandisers, membership stores, hard discounters, e-
commerce retailers and authorized independent bottlers, among others. We normally grant our independent
bottlers exclusive contracts to sell and manufacture certain beverage products bearing our trademarks within
a specific geographic area. These arrang ements provide us with the right to charge our independent bottlers
for concentrate, finished goods and Aquafina royalties and specify the manufacturing process required for
product quality . We also grant distribution rights to our independent bottlers for certain beverage products
bearing our trademarks for specified geographic areas.
We rely on and provide financial incentives to our customers to assist in the distribution and promotion of our
products to the consumer . For our independent distributors and retailers, these incentives include volume-
based rebates, product placement fees, promotions and displays. For our independent bottlers, these
incentives are referred to as bottler funding and are negotiated annually with each bottler to support a variety
of trade and consumer programs, such as consumer incentives, advertising support, new product support, and
vending and cooler equipment placement. Consumer incentives include coupons, pricing discounts and
promotions, and other promotional offers. Advertising support is directed at advertising programs and
supporting indepen dent bottler media. New product support includes targeted consumer and retailer
incentives and direct marketplace support, such as point-of-purchase materials, product placement fees,
media and advertising. Vending and cooler equipment placement programs support the acquisition and
placement of vending machines and cooler equipment. The nature and type of programs vary annually .
Changes to the retail landscape, including increased consolidation of retail ownership, the rapid growth of
sales through e-commerce websites and mobile commerce applications, including through subscription
services, the integration of physical and digital operations among retailers, as well as the growth in hard
discounters, and the current economic environment continue to increase the importance of major customers.
In 2018 , sales to Walmart Inc. (Walmart), including Sam’ s Club (Sam’ s), represented approximately 13% of
our consol idated net revenue. Our top five retail customers represented approx imately 33% of our 2018  net
revenue in North America, with Walmart (including Sam’ s) representing approximately 19%. These
percentages include concentrate sales to our independent bottlers, which were used in finished goods sold by
them to these retailers.
See “Off-Balance-Sheet Arrangements” in “Our Financial Results – Our Liquidity and Capital Resources” in
Item 7. Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations for more
information on our independent bottlers.
Our Competition
Our bever age, food and snack products are in highly competitive categories and markets and compete against
products of international beverage, food and snack companies that, like us, operate in multiple geographies,
as well as regional, local and private label manufacturers and economy brands and other competitors. In
many countries in which our products are sold, including the United States, The Coca-Cola Company is our
primary beverage competitor . Other beverage, food and snack competitors include, but are not limited to,
Campbell Soup Company , Conagra Brands, Inc., Kellogg Company , Keurig Dr Pepper Inc., The Kraft Heinz
Company , Link Snacks, Inc., Mondelēz International, Inc., Monster Beverage Corporation, Nestlé S.A. and
Red Bull GmbH.
Many of our food and snack products hold significant leadership positions in the food and snack industry in
the United States and worldwide. In 2018 , we and The Coca-Cola Company represented approximately 22%
and 20%, respectively , of the U.S. liquid refreshment beverage category by estimated retail sales in measured
6
Table of Contents
channels, according to Information Resources, Inc. However , The Coca-Cola Company has significant
carbonated soft drink (CSD) share advantage in many markets outside the United States.
Our beverage, food and snack products compete primarily on the basis of brand recognition and loyalty , taste,
price, value, quality , product variety , innovation, distribution, advertising, marketing and promotional
activity , packaging, convenience, servic e and the ability to anticipate and effectively respond to consumer
preferences and trends, including increased consumer focus on health and wellness and the continued
acceleration of e-commerce and other methods of distributing and purchasing products. Success in this
competitive environ ment is dependent on effective promotion of existing produ cts, effective introduction of
new products and reformulations of existing products, the effectiveness of our advertising campaigns,
marketing programs , product packaging, pricing, increased efficiency in production techniques, new vending
and dispensing equipment and brand and trademark development and protection. We believe that the strength
of our brands, innovation and marketing, coupled with the quality of our products and flexibility of our
distribution network, allows us to compete ef fectively .
Resear ch and Development
We engage  in a variety of research and development activities and invest in innovation globally with the goal
of meeting changing consumer demands  and preferences and accelerating sustai nable growth. These activities
principally involve: development of new ingredients, flavors and products; refor mulation and improvement in
the quality  and appeal of existing products; improvement and modernization  of manufacturing processes,
including cost reduction; improvements in product quality , safety and integrity; development of, and
improvements in, dispensing equipment, packaging technology (including investments in recycling-focused
technologies), packa ge design (including development of sustainable, bio-based packaging) and portion sizes;
efforts focused on identifying opportunities to transform, grow and broaden our product portfolio, including
by develo ping produ cts with improved nutrition profiles that reduce added sugars, sodium or saturated fat,
including through the use of sweetener alternatives and flavor modifiers and innovation in existing
sweeteners, further expanding our beyond the bottle portfolio (including through our acquisition of
SodaStream) and offering more products with positive nutrition including whole grains, fruits and vegetables,
dairy , protein and hydration; investments in building our capabilities to support our global e-commerce
business; and improvements in energy efficiency and efforts focused on reducing our impact on the
environment. Our research centers are located around the world, including in Brazil, China, India, Ireland,
Mexico, Russia, the United Kingdom and the United States, and leverage nutrition science, food science,
engineering and consumer insights to meet our strategy to continue to develop nutritious and convenient
beverages, foods and snacks.
In 2018 , we continued to refine our beverage, food and snack portfolio to meet changing consumer demands
by reducing added sugars in many of our beverages and sodium and saturated fat in many of our foods and
snacks, and by developing a broader portfolio of product choices, includin g: continuing to expand our
beverage options that contain no high-fructose corn syrup and that are made with natural flavors; expanding
our state-of-the-art food and beverage healthy vending initiative to increase the availability of convenient and
affordable nutrition;  further expanding our portfolio of nutritious products by building on our important
nutrition platforms and brands — Quaker (grains), Tropicana (juices, lemonades, fruit and vegetable drinks),
Gatorade (sports nutrition for athletes), Naked Juice (cold-pressed juices and smoothies), KeVita (probiotics,
tonics and fermented teas), Bare (baked  apple chips and other baked produce) and Health Warrior (nutrition
bars); further expanding our whole grain products globally; and further expanding our portfolio of nutritious
products in growing categories, such as dairy , hummus and other refrigerated dips, and baked grain snacks. In
addition, we continu ed to make investm ents to reduce our impact on the envir onment, including: efforts to
conserve raw materials and energy, such as by working to achieve reductions in greenhouse gas emissions
across our global businesses, by helping  to protect and conserve global water supply especially in high-water -
risk locations (including replenishing watersheds that source our operations in high-water -risk locations and
7
Table of Contents
promoting the efficient use of water in our agricultural supply chain), and by incorporating improvements in
the sustainability and resources of our agricultural supply chain into our opera tions; efforts to reduce waste
generated by our operations and disposed of in landfills; efforts to support increased packaging recovery ,
recycling rates and the amount of recycled content in our packaging; efforts to increase energy efficiency ,
including the increased use of renewabl e energy and resources; efforts to support sustainable agriculture by
expanding best practices with our growers and suppliers; and efforts to optimize packaging technology and
design to minimize the amount of plastic in our packaging, and make our packaging increasingly recoverable
or recyclab le with lower environmental impact, including continuing to invest in developing compostable and
biodegradable packaging.
Regulatory Matters
The condu ct of our businesses, including the production, storage, distributio n, sale, display , advertising,
marketing, labeling, content, quality , safety , transportation, packaging, disposal, recycling and use of our
products, as well as our employment and occupational health and safety practices and protection of personal
information, are subject to various laws and regulations administered by federal,  state and local governmental
agencies in the United States, as well as to laws and regulations administered by government entities and
agencies in the more than 200 other countries and territories in which our products are made, manufactured,
distributed or sold. It is our policy to abide by the laws and regulations around the world that apply to our
businesses.
The U.S. laws and regulations that we are subject to include: the Federal Food , Drug and Cosmetic Act and
various state laws governing food safet y; the Food Safety Modernization Act; the Occupational Safety and
Health Act; various federal, state and local environmental protection laws, as discussed below; the Federal
Motor Carrier Safety Act; the Federal Trade Commission Act; the Lanham Act; various federal and state laws
and regulations governing competition and trade practices; various federal and state laws and regulations
governing our employment practices, including those related to equal employment opportunity , such as the
Equal Employment Opportunity Act and the National Labor Relations Act and those related to overtime
compensation, such as the Fair Labor Standards Act; customs and foreign trade laws and regulations,
including laws regarding the import or export of our products or ingredients used in our products and tariffs;
laws regul ating the sale of certain of our products in schools; and laws relating to the payment of taxes. We
are also required to comply with the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act and the Trade Sanctions Reform and
Export Enhancemen t Act. We are also subject to various state and local statutes and regulations, including
state consumer protection laws such as Proposition 65 in California, which requires that a specific warning
appear on any product that contains a substance listed by the State of Califor nia as having been found to
cause cancer or birth defects, unless the amount of such substance in the product is below a safe harbor level.
We are also subject to numerous similar and other laws and regulations outside the United States, including
but not limited to laws and regulations governing food safety , international trade and tariffs, occupational
health and safety , competition, anti-corruption and data privacy , including the European Union General Data
Protection Regulatio n. In many jurisdict ions, compliance with competition laws is of special importance to us
due to our competitive position in those  jurisdictions, as is compliance with anti-corruption laws, including
the U.K. Bribery Act. We rely on legal and operational compliance programs, as well as in-house and outside
counsel and other experts, to guide our businesses in complying with the laws and regulations around the
world that apply to our businesses.
In addition, certain jurisdictions have either imposed, or are considering imposi ng, new or increased taxes on
the manufacture, distribution or sale of our products, ingredients or substances contained in, or attributes of,
our products or commodities used in the production of our products. These taxes vary in scope and form:
some apply to all beverages, including non-caloric beverages, while others apply only to beverages with a
caloric sweetener (e.g., sugar). Similarly , some measures apply a single tax rate per liquid ounce while others
8
Table of Contents
apply a graduated tax rate depending upon the amount of added sugar in the beverage and some apply a flat
tax rate on beverages containing a particular substance or ingredient.
In addition, certain jurisdictions have either imposed, or are considering imposing, product labeling or
warning requirements or other limitations on the marketing or sale of certain of our products as a result of
ingredients or substances contained in such products or the audience to whom products are marketed. These
types of provisions have required that we provide a label that highlights perceived concerns about a product
or warns consumers to avoid consumption of certain ingredients or substances present in our products. It is
possible that similar or more restrictive requirements may be proposed or enacted in the future.
In additio n, certain jurisdictions have either imposed or are considering impo sing regulations designed to
increase recycling rates or encourage waste reduction. These regulations vary in scope and form from deposit
return systems designed to incentivize the return of beverage containers, to extended producer responsibility
policies and even bans on the use of some plastic beverage bottles and other single-use plastics. It is possible
that similar or more restrictive requirements may be proposed or enacted in the future.
We are also subject to national and local environmental laws in the United States and in foreign countries in
which we do busine ss, including laws related to water consumption and treatment, wastewater dischar ge and
air emissio ns. In the United States, our facilities must comply with the Clean Air Act, the Clean Water Act,
the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act, the Resource Conservation
and Recovery Act and other federal and state laws regarding handling, storage, release and disposal of wastes
generated onsite and sent to third-part y owned and operated offsite licensed  facilities and our facilities
outside the United States must comply with similar laws and regulations. In addition, continuing concern
over clima te change may result in new or increased legal and regulatory requi rements (in or outside of the
United States) to reduce or mitigate the potential effects of greenhouse gases, or to limit or impose additional
costs on commercia l water use due to local water scarcity concerns. Our policy  is to abide by all applicable
environmental laws and regulations, and we have internal programs in place with respect to our global
environmental compliance. We have made, and plan to continue making, necessary expenditures for
compliance with applicable environmen tal laws and regulations. While these expenditures have not had a
material impact on our business, financial condition or results of operations to date, changes in environmental
compliance requirem ents, and any expen ditures necessary to comply with such requirements, could adversely
affect our financial performance. In addition, we and our subsidiaries are subject to environmental
remediation obligat ions arising in the normal course of business, as well as remediation and related
indemnification obligations in connection with certain historical activities and contractual obligations,
including those of businesses acquired by us or our subsidiaries. While these environmental remediation and
indemnification obligations cannot be predicted with certainty , such obligations have not had, and are not
expected to have, a material impact on our capital expenditures, earnings or competitive position.
In addition to the discussion in this section, see also “Item 1A. Risk Factors.”
Employees
As of December 29, 2018 , we and our conso lidated subsidiaries employed approximately 267,000 peop le
worldwide, includin g approximately 114,000 people within the United States. In certain countries, our
employment levels are subject to season al variations. We or our subsidiaries are party to numerous collective
bargaining agreemen ts. We expect that we will be able to renegotiate these collective bargaining agreements
on satisfactory terms when they expire.  We believe that relations with our employees are generally good.
Available Information
We are required to file annual, quarterly and current reports, proxy statements and other information with the
U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). The SEC maintains an Internet site that contains reports,
proxy and information statements, and other information regarding issuers that file electronically with the
SEC at http://www .sec.gov .
9
Table of Contents
Our Annual Reports on Form 10-K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q, Current Reports on Form 8-K, proxy
statements and amendments to those documents filed or furnished pursuant to Section 13(a) or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (Exchange Act), are also available free of charge on our
Internet site at http://www .pepsico.com  as soon as reasonab ly practicable after such reports are electronically
filed with or furnished to the SEC.
Investors should note that we currently  announce material information to our investors and others using
filings with the SEC, press release s, public conference calls, webcasts or our corporate website
(www .pepsico.com ), includin g news and announcements regarding our financial performance, key personnel,
our brands and our business strategy . Information that we post on our corporate website could be deemed
material to investors. We encourage investors, the media, our customers, consumers, business partners and
others interested in us to review the information we post on these channels. We may from time to time update
the list of channels we will use to communicate information that could be deemed material and will post
information about any such change on www .pepsico.com . The information on our website is not, and shall
not be deemed to be, a part hereof or incorporated into this or any of our other filings with the SEC.
Item 1A. Risk Factors.
You should carefully consider the risks described below in addition to the other information set forth in this
Annual Report on Form 10-K, including the Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition
and Results of Operations section and the consolidated financial statements and related notes. Any of the
factors described below could occur or continue to occur and could have a material adverse effect on our
business, financial condition, results of operations or the price of our publicl y traded securities. The risks
below are not the only risks we face. Additional risks and uncertainties not currently known to us, or that we
currently deem to be immaterial, may occur or become material in the future and may also adversely affect
our business, reputation, financial condition, results of operations or the price of our publicly traded
securities. Therefore, historical operating results, financial and business performance, events and trends may
not be a reliable indicator of future operating results, financial and business performance, events or trends.
Demand for our products may be adve rsely affected by changes in consumer preferences or any inability
on our part to innovate, market or distribute our products effectively , and any significant reduction in
demand could adversely af fect our business, financial condition or results of operations.
We are a global food and beverage company operating in highly competitive categories and markets. To
generate revenues and profits, we rely on continued demand for our products and therefore must understand
our custom ers and consumers and sell products that appeal to them in the sales  channel in which they prefer
to shop or browse for such products. In general, changes in consumption in our product categories or
consumer demograp hics could result in reduced demand for our products. Demand for our products depends
in part on our ability to anticipate and effectively respond to shifts in consumer trends and preferences,
including increased demand for produc ts that meet the needs of consumers who are concerned with: health
and wellness (including products that have less added sugars, sodium and saturated fat); convenience
(including respondin g to changes in in-home and on-the-go consumption patterns and methods of distribution
of our products to customers and consumers, including through e-commerce and hard discounters); or the
location of origin or source of ingredients and products (including the environmental impact related to
production of our products).
Consumer preferences have been evolving, and are expected to continue to evolve, due to a variety of factors,
including: changes in consumer demographics, including the aging of the general population and the
emer gence of the millennial and younger generations who have differing spending, consumption and
purchasing habits; consumer concerns or perceptions regarding the nutrition profile of products, including the
presence of added sugar , sodium and saturated fat in certain of our products; growing demand for organic or
locally sourced ingredients, or consumer concerns or perceptions (whether or not valid) regarding the
10
Table of Contents
health effects of ingredients or substan ces present in certain of our products, such as 4-MeI, acrylamide,
artificial flavors and colors, artificial sweeteners, aspartame, caffeine, furfuryl alcohol, high-fructose corn
syrup, partially hydrolyzed oils, saturated fat, sodium, sugar , trans fats or other product ingredients,
substances or attributes, including genetically engineered ingredients; taxes or other restrictions, including
labeling requirements, imposed on our products; consumer concerns or perceptions regarding packaging
materials, including  single-use and other plastic packaging, and their enviro nmental impact; changes in
package or portion size; changes in social trends that impact travel, vacation  or leisure activity patterns;
changes in weather patterns or seasonal  consumption cycles; the continued acceleration of e-commerce and
other methods of purchasing products; negative publicity (whether or not valid) resulting from regulatory
actions, litigation against us or other companies in our industry or negative or inaccurate posts or comments
in the media, includ ing social media, about us, our employees, our products or advertising campaigns and
marketing program s; perception of our employees, agents, customers, suppliers, bottlers, contract
manufacturers, distributors, joint ventur e partners or other third parties or our respective social media posts,
business practices or other information disseminated by or regarding them or us; product boycotts; or a
downturn in economic conditions. Any of these factors may reduce consumers’  willingness to purchase our
products and any inability on our part to anticipate or react to such changes could result in reduced demand
for our products or erode our competitive and financial position and could adversely affect our business,
reputation, financial condition or results of operations.
Demand for our products is also dependent in part on product quality , product and marketing innovation and
production and distribution, including our ability to: maintain a robust pipeline of new products; improve the
quality of existing products; extend our portfolio of products in growing markets and categories (through
acquisitions, such as SodaStream, and innovation, such as increasing non-carbo nated beverage offerings and
other alternatives to, or reformulations of, carbonated beverage offerings); respond to cultural differences and
regional consumer preferences (whether through developing or acquiring new products that are responsive to
such preferences); monitor and adjust our use of ingredients and packaging materials (including to respond to
applicable regulations); develop sweetener alternatives and innovation; increase the recyclability or
recoverability of our packaging; improve the production and distribution of our products; respond to
competitive product and pricing pressures and changes in distribution channels, including in the e-commerce
channel; and implement effective adve rtising campaigns and marketing programs, including successfully
adapting to a rapidl y changing media environment through the use of social media and online advertising
campaigns and marketing programs.
Although we devote significant resources to the items mentioned above, there can be no assurance as to our
continued ability to develop, launch, maintain or distribute successful new products or variants of existing
products in a timely manner (including correctly anticipating or effectively reacting to changes in consumer
preferences) or to develop and effectively execute advertising and marketing campaigns that appeal to
customers and consumers. Our failure to make the right strategic investments to drive innovation or
successfully launch new products or variants of existing products or effectiv ely market or distribute our
products could reduce demand for our products, result in inventory write-of fs and erode our competitive and
financial position and could adversely af fect our business, financial condition or results of operations.
Changes in laws and regulations relating to the use or disposal of plastics  or other packaging of our
products could continue to increase our costs, reduce demand for our products or otherwise have an
adverse impact on our business, reputation, financial condition or results of operations.
Certain of our food and beverage produ cts are sold in plastic or other packaging designed to be recoverable
for recycling but not all packaging is recovered, whether due to low value, lack of infrastructure or otherwise.
In addition, certain of our packaging may currently not be recyclable, compostable or biodegradable. There is
a growing concern with the accumulation of plastic and other packaging waste in the environment,
11
Table of Contents
particularly in the world’ s oceans and waterways. As a result, our branded packaging waste could result in
negative publicity (whether or not valid) or reduce consumer demand and overall consumption of our
products, which could adversely af fect our business, financial condition or results of operations.
In response to these concerns, the United States and many other jurisdictions have imposed or are considering
imposing regulation s or policies desig ned to increase the sustainability of packaging, encourage waste
reduction and increase recycling rates or facilitate the waste management process or restricting the sale of
products in certain packaging. These regulations vary in scope and form from taxes or fees designed to
incentivize behavio r to restrictions or bans on certain products and materials. For example, the state of
California is one of 10 states in the United States that have a bottle deposit return system in effect, which
requires a deposit charged to consumers to incentivize the return of the beverage container . In addition, 26
markets in the European Union have established extended producer respons ibility policies, which make
manufacturers such as us responsible for the costs of recycling products after consumers have used them.
Further , certain jurisdictions are consi dering imposing other types of regul ations or policies, including
packaging taxes, requirements for bottle caps to be tethered to the plastic bottle, minimum recycled content
mandates, which would require packaging to include a certain percentage of post-consumer recycled material
in a new package, and even bans on the use of some plastic beverage bottles and other single-use plastics.
These laws and regulations, whatever their scope or form, could increase the cost of our products, reduce
consumer demand and overall consumption of our products or result in negative publicity (whether or not
valid), which could adversely af fect our business, financial condition or results of operations.
While we continue to devote significa nt resources to increase the recyclabil ity and sustainability of our
packaging, the increased focus on reducing plastic waste may require us to increase capital expenditures,
including requiring additional investmen ts to minimize the amount of plastic across our packaging; increase
the amount of recycled content in our packaging; and develop sustainable , bio-based packaging as a
replacement for fossil fuel-based plastic packaging, including flexible film alternatives for our snacks
packaging. Our failure to minimize our plastics use, increase the amount of recycled content in our packaging
or develop sustainable packaging or consumers’  failure to accept such sustainable packaging could reduce
consumer demand and overall consumpt ion of our products and erode our competitive and financial position.
Further , our reputation could be damaged for failure to achieve our sustainability goals with respect to our
plastics use, includi ng our goal to use 25% recycled content in our plastic packaging by 2025, or if we or
others in our industr y do not act, or are perceived not to act, responsibly with respect to packaging or disposal
of our products.
Changes in, or failure to comply with, laws and regulations applicable to our products or our business
operations could adversely af fect our business, financial condition or results of operations.
The conduct of our business is subject to various laws and regulations administe red by federal, state and local
governmental agencies in the United States, as well as government entities and agencies outside the United
States, including laws and regulation s relating to the production, storage , distribution, sale, display ,
advertising, marketing, labeling, conten t, quality , safety , transportation, packaging, disposal, recycling and
use of our products, as well as our employment and occupational health and safety practices and protection of
personal information. In addition, in many jurisdictions, compliance with competition laws is of special
importance to us due to our competitive position in those jurisdictions, as is compliance with anti-corruption
laws. Many of these laws and regulations have differing or conflicting legal standards across the various
markets where our products are made, manufactured, distributed or sold and, in certain markets, such as
developing and emer ging markets, may be less developed or certain. For example, products containing
genetically engineer ed ingredients are subject to differing regulations and restrictions in the jurisdictions in
which our products are made, manufactured, distributed or sold, as is the packaging, disposal and
recyclability of our products. For examp le, five provinces in Canada, covering most of the Canadian market,
have
12
Table of Contents
established extended producer responsibility policies, which make manufacturers such as us responsible for
the costs of recycling products after consumers have used them. In addition, these laws and regulations and
related interpretatio ns may change, sometimes dramatically and unexpectedly , as a result of a variety of
factors, including political, economic or social events. Such changes may include changes in: food and drug
laws; laws related to product labeling, advertising and marketing practices, including restrictions on the
audience to whom products are marke ted; laws and treaties related to international trade, including laws
regarding the import or export of our products or ingredients used in our products and tariffs; laws and
programs aimed at reducing, restricting or eliminating ingredients or substances in, or attributes of, certain of
our products; laws and programs aimed at discouraging the consumption or altering the package or portion
size of certain of our products, including laws imposing restrictions on the use of government funds or
programs to purchase certain of our products; increased regulatory scrutiny  of, and increased litigation
involving product claims and concerns (whether or not valid) regarding the effects on health of ingredients or
substances in, or attributes of, certain of our products, including without limitation those found in energy
drinks; state consumer protection laws; laws regulating the protection of personal information; cyber -security
regulations; regulatory initiatives, includ ing the imposition or proposed imposit ion of new or increased taxes
or other measures impacting the manufacture, distribution or sale of our products; accounting rules and
interpretations; employment laws; privacy laws; laws regulating the price we may charge for our products;
laws regulating water rights and access to and use of water or utilities; environmental laws, including laws
relating to the regulation of water treatment and dischar ge of wastewater and air emissions and laws relating
to the disposal, recovery or recyclin g of our products and their packaging. Changes in regulatory
requirements or changing interpretations thereof, and differing or competing regulations and standards across
the markets where our products are made, manufactured, distributed or sold, may result in higher compliance
costs, capital expenditures and higher production costs, which could adversely affect our business, reputation,
financial condition or results of operations.
The imposition of new laws, regulations or governmental policy and their related interpretations, or changes
in any of the foregoing, including taxes, labeling, product, production, recovery or recycling requirements, or
other limitations on, or pertaining to, the sale or advertisement of certain of our products, ingredients or
substances contained in, or attributes of, our products, commodities used in the production of our products or
use, disposal, recovery or recyclability of our products and their packaging, may further alter the way in
which we do busine ss and, therefore, may continue to increase our costs or liabilities or reduce demand for
our products, which could adversely affect our business, financial condition or results of operations. If one
jurisdiction imposes  or proposes to impose new requirements or restrictions, other jurisdictions may follow .
For example, if one jurisdiction imposes a tax on sugar -sweetened beverages or foods, or imposes a specific
labeling or warning requirement, other jurisdictions may impose similar or other measures that impact the
manufacture, distrib ution or sale of our products. The foregoing may result in decreased demand for our
products, adverse publicity or increased concerns about the health implications of consumption of ingredients
or substances in our products (whether or not valid).
In addition, studies (whether or not scientifically valid) have been and continue to be underway by third
parties purporting to assess the health implications of consumption of certain ingredients or substances
present in certain of our products or packaging materials, such as 4-MeI, acrylamide, caffeine, glyphosate,
furfuryl alcohol, added sugars, sodium, saturated fat and plastic. Third parties have also published documents
or studies claiming (whether or not valid) that taxes can address consumer consumption of sugar -sweetened
beverages and foods high in sugar , sodium or saturated fat. If, as a result of these studies and documents or
otherwise, there is an increase in consumer concerns (whether or not valid) about the health implications of
consumption of certain of our products, an increase in the number of jurisdictions that impose taxes on our
products, or an increase in new labeling, product or production requirements  or other restrictions on the
manufacturing, sale or display of our products, demand for our products could decline, or we could be subject
13
Table of Contents
to lawsuits or new regulations that could affect sales of our products, any of which could adversely affect our
business, financial condition or results of operations.
Although we have policies and procedures in place that are designed to promote legal and regulatory
compliance, our employees, suppliers, or other third parties with whom we do business could take actions,
intentional or not, that violate these policies and procedures or applicable laws or regulations or could fail to
maintain required documentation sufficient to evidence our compliance with applicable laws or regulations.
Failure to comply with such laws or regulations could subject us to criminal or civil enforcement actions,
including fines, injunctions, product recalls, penalties, disgor gement of profits or activity restrictions, any of
which could adversely affect our business, reputation, financial condition or results of operations. In addition,
regulatory authoritie s under whose laws we operate may have enforcement powers that can subject us to
actions such as product recall, seizure of products or assets or other sanctions, which could have an adverse
effect on the sales of products in our portfolio or could lead to damage to our reputation.
In addition, we and our subsidiaries are party to a variety of legal and environmental remediation obligations
arising in the normal course of busines s, as well as environmental remediation, product liability , toxic tort
and relate d indemnification proceedin gs in connection with certain historical activities and contractual
obligations, including those of businesses acquired by us or our subsidiaries. Due to regulatory complexities,
uncertainties inherent in litigation and the risk of unidentified contaminants on current and former properties
of ours and our subsidiaries, the potential exists for remediation, liability and indemnification costs to differ
materially from the costs we have estimated. We cannot guarantee that our costs in relation to these matters
will not exceed our estimates or otherwise have an adverse effect on our business, financial condition or
results of operations.
The impo sition or proposed imposition of new or increased taxes aimed at our products could adversely
affect our business, financial condition or results of operations.
Certain jurisdictions in which our produ cts are made, manufactured, distributed or sold have either imposed,
or are considering imposing, new or increased taxes on the manufacture, distribution or sale of our products,
ingredients or substances contained in, or attributes of, our products or commodities used in the production of
our produ cts. These  taxes vary in scope and form: some apply to all beverages, including non-caloric
beverages, while others apply only to beverages with a caloric sweetener (e.g., sugar). Similarly , some
measures apply a single tax rate per liquid ounce while others apply a graduated  tax rate depending upon the
amount of added sugar in the beverage and some apply a flat tax rate on beve rages containing a particular
substance or ingredient. For example, effective January 2018, the City of Seattle, Washington in the United
States enacted a per-ounce surchar ge on all sugar -sweetened beverages. By contrast, France revised an
existing flat tax to become a graduated tax, effective July 2018, in which the per-ounce tax rate is tied to the
amount of added sugar present in the beverage: the higher the amount of added sugar , the higher the per-
ounce tax rate, while Saudi Arabia enacted, effective June 2017, a flat tax rate of 50%, and Jordan increased,
effective January 2018, its flat tax from 10% to 20%, on the retail price of carbonated soft drinks. These tax
measures, whatever their scope or form , could increase the cost of our produc ts, reduce consumer demand
and overall consumption of our products, lead to negative publicity (whether based on scientific fact or not)
or leave consumers with the perception (whether or not valid) that our products do not meet their health and
wellness needs. Such factors could adversely af fect our business, financial condition or results of operations.
Significant addition al labeling or warning requirements or limitations on the marketing or sale of our
products may reduce demand for such products and could adversely affect our business, financial
condition or results of operations.
Certain jurisdictions in which our produ cts are made, manufactured, distributed or sold have either imposed,
or are considering imposing, product labeling or warning requirements or limitations on the marketing or
14
Table of Contents
sale of certain of our products as a result of ingredients or substances contained in such products. These types
of provisions have required that we provide a label that highlights perceived concerns about a product or
warns consumers to avoid consumption of certain ingredients or substances present in our products. For
example, in California in the United States, Proposition 65 requires a specific warning on or relating to any
product that contains a substance listed by the State of California as having been found to cause cancer or
birth defects or other reproductive harm, unless the level of such substance in the product is below a safe
harbor level established by the State of California.
In addition , a number of jurisdictions, both in and outside the United States, have imposed or are considering
imposing labeling requirements, including color -coded labeling of certain food and beverage products where
colors such as red, yellow and green are used to indicate various levels of a particular ingredient, such as
sugar , sodium or saturated fat. The imposition or proposed imposition of additional product labeling or
warning requiremen ts could reduce overall consumption of our products, lead to negative publicity (whether
based on scientific fact or not) or leave consumers with the perception (whether or not valid) that our
products do not meet their health and wellness needs. Such factors could adversely affect our business,
financial condition or results of operations.
Our busin ess, financial condition or results of operations could suffer if we are unable to compete
effectively .
Our bever age, food and snack products are in highly competitive categories and markets and compete against
products of international beverage, food and snack companies that, like us, operate in multiple geographies,
as well as regional, local and private label manufacturers and economy brands and other competitors. In
many countries in which our products are sold, including the United States, The Coca-Cola Company is our
primary beverage competitor . Other beverage, food and snack competitors include, but are not limited to,
Campbell Soup Company , Conagra Brands, Inc., Kellogg Company , Keurig Dr Pepper Inc., The Kraft Heinz
Company , Link Snacks, Inc., Mondelēz International, Inc., Monster Beverage Corporation, Nestlé S.A. and
Red Bull GmbH.
Our beverage, food and snack products compete primarily on the basis of brand recognition and loyalty , taste,
price, value, quality , product variety , innovation, distribution, advertising, marketing and promotional
activity , packaging, convenience, servic e and the ability to anticipate and effectively respond to consumer
preferences and trends, including increased consumer focus on health and wellness and the continued
acceleration of e-commerce and other methods of distributing and purchasing products. If we are unable to
effectively promote our existing products or introduce new products, if our advertising or marketing
campaigns are not effective, if our competitors spend more aggressively than we do or if we are otherwise
unable to effectivel y respond to pricing pressure or compete effectively (including in distributing our
products effectively and cost efficiently through all existing and emer ging channels of trade, including
through e-commerce and hard discounters), we may be unable to grow or maintain sales or category share or
we may need to increase capital, marketing or other expenditures, which may adversely affect our business,
financial condition or results of operations.
Failure to realize anticipated benefits from our productivity initiatives or operating model could have an
adverse impact on our business, financial condition or results of operations.
Our future success and earnings growth depend, in part, on our ability to continue to reduce costs and
improve efficiencies, including implementing shared business service organizational models. Our
productivity initiatives help support our growth initiatives and contribute to our results of operations. We
continue to implement productivity initiatives that we believe will position our business for long-term
sustainable growth by allowing us to achieve a lower cost structure and operate more efficiently in the highly
competitive beverag e, food and snack categories and markets. We are also continuing to implement our
initiatives to
15
Table of Contents
improve efficiency , decision making, innovation and brand management across our global organization to
enable us to compete more effectively . Further , in order to continue to capitalize on our cost reduction efforts
and operating model, it will be necessary to make certain investments in our business, which may be limited
due to capital constraints. Some of these measures could yield unintended consequences, such as business
disruptions, distraction of managemen t and employees, reduced employee morale and productivity , and
unexpected addition al employee attrition, including the inability to attract or retain key personnel. It is critical
that we have the appropriate personne l in place to continue to lead and execute our plans, including to
effectively manage personnel adjustme nts and transitions resulting from these initiatives and increased
competition for employees with the skills necessary to implement our plans. If we are unable to successfully
implement our productivity initiatives as planned, fail to implement these initiatives as timely as we
anticipate, do not achieve expected savings as a result of these initiatives or incur higher than expected or
unanticipated costs in implementing these initiatives, fail to identify and implement additional productivity
opportunities in the future, or fail to successfully manage business disruptio ns or unexpected employee
consequences on our workforce, morale or productivity , we may not realize all or any of the anticipated
benefits, which could adversely af fect our business, financial condition or results of operations.
Our business, financial condition or results of operations could be adversely affected as a result of
political conditions in the markets in which our products are made, manufactured, distributed or sold.
Political conditions in the markets in which our products are made, manufactured, distributed or sold may be
difficult to predict and may adversely affect our business, financial condition and results of operations. The
results of elections,  referendums or other political conditions (including government shutdowns) in these
markets could impact how existing laws, regulations and government programs or policies are implemented
or create uncertainty as to how such laws, regulations and government progr ams or policies may change,
including with respect to tariffs, sanctio ns, climate change regulation, taxes, benefit programs, the movement
of goods, services and people betwee n countries and other matters, and could result in exchange rate
fluctuation, volatility in global stock markets and global economic uncertainty or adversely affect demand for
our products. For example, the United Kingdom’ s pending withdrawal from the European Union (commonly
referred to as Brexit) could lead to differing laws and regulations in the United Kingdom and European
Union. Any changes in, or the imposition of new laws, regulations or governmental policy and their related
interpretations due to elections, referen dums or other political conditions could have an adverse impact on
our business, financial conditions and results of operations.
Our business, financial condition or results of operations could be adversely affected if we are unable to
grow our business in developing and emerging markets.
Our success depends in part on our ability to grow our business in developing and emer ging markets,
including Mexico, Russia, the Middle East, Brazil, China and India. However , there can be no assurance that
our existing products, variants of our existing products or new products that we make, manufacture, distribute
or sell will be accepted or be successful in any particular developing or emer ging market, due to local or
global competition, product price, cultural differences, consumer preferences or otherwise. The following
factors could reduce demand for our products or otherwise impede the growth of our business in developing
and emerging markets: unstable economic, political or social conditions; acts of war, terrorist acts, and civil
unrest; increased competition; volatility in the economic growth of certain of these markets and the related
impact on develope d countries who export to these markets; volatile oil prices and the impact on the local
economy in certain of these markets; our inability to acquire businesses, form strategic business alliances or
to make necessary infrastructure investments; our inability to complete divestitures or refranchisings;
imposition of new or increased labeling, product or production requirements, or other restrictions; our
inability to hire or retain a highly skilled workforce; imposition of new or increased tariffs and other
impositions on imported goods or sanctions against, or other regulations restricting contact with, certain
countries in these
16
Table of Contents
markets, or imposition of new or increased sanctions against U.S. multinational corporations or tariffs on the
products of such corporations operatin g in these markets; actions, such as removing our products from
shelves, taken by retailers in response to U.S. trade sanctions, tariffs or other governmental action or policy;
foreign ownership restrictions; nationalization of our assets or the assets of our suppliers, bottlers, contract
manufacturers, distributors, joint venture partners or other third parties; imposi tion of taxes on our products
or the ingredients or substances used in our products; government-mandated closure, or threatened closure, of
our operat ions or the operations of our suppliers, bottlers, contract manufacture rs, distributors, joint venture
partners, customers or other third parties; restrictions on the import or export of our products or ingredients or
substances used in our products; regula tions relating to the repatriation of funds currently held in foreign
jurisdictions to the United States; highly inflationary economies, devaluation  or fluctuation, such as the
devaluation of the Russian ruble, Turkish lira, Brazilian real, Argentine peso and the Mexican peso, or
demonetization of currency; regulation s on the transfer of funds to and from foreign countries, currency
controls or other currency exchange restrictions, which result in significa nt cash balances in foreign
countries, from time to time, or could significantly affect our ability to effectively manage our operations in
certain of these markets and could result in the deconsolidation of such businesses, such as occurred with
respect to our Venezuelan businesses which were deconsolidated at the end of the third quarter of 2015; the
lack of well-established or reliable legal systems; increased costs of doing business due to compliance with
complex foreign and U.S. laws and regulations that apply to our international operations, including the
Foreign Corrupt Practices Act, the U.K. Bribery Act and the Trade Sanctions Reform and Export
Enhancement Act; and adverse consequences, such as the assessment of fines or penalties, for any failure to
comply with these laws and regulations. If we are unable to expand our businesses in developing and
emer ging markets, effectively operate, or manage the risks associated with operating, in these markets, or
achieve the return on capital we expec t from our investments in these markets, our business, reputation,
financial condition or results of operations could be adversely af fected.
Uncertain or unfavorable economic conditions may have an adverse impac t on our business, financial
condition or results of operations.
Many of the countri es in which our products are made, manufactured, distributed and sold have experienced
and may, from time to time, continue to experience uncertain or unfavorable economic conditions, such as
recessions or economic slowdowns. Our business or financial results may be adversely impacted by uncertain
or unfavor able econ omic conditions in the United States and globally , including: adverse changes in interest
rates, tax laws or tax rates; volatile commodity markets, including speculative influences; highly-inflationary
economies, devalua tion, fluctuation or demonetization; contraction in the availability of credit in the
marketplace due to legislation or economic conditions; the effects of government initiatives, including
demonetization, austerity or stimulus measures to manage economic conditions and any changes to or
cessation of such initiatives; the effects of any default by or deterioration in the creditworthiness of the
countries in which our products are made, manufactured, distributed or sold or of countries that may then
impact countries in which our products are made, manufactured, distributed or sold; reduced demand for our
products resulting from volatility in general global economic conditions or a shift in consumer preferences
for economic reasons or otherwise to regional, local or private label products or other lower -cost products, or
to less profitable sales channels; or a decrease in the fair value of pension or post-retirement assets that could
increase future employee benefit costs and/or funding requirements of our pension or post-retirement plans.
In addition, we cannot predict how current or future economic conditions  will affect our customers,
consumers, supplier s, bottlers, contract manufacturers, distributors, joint venture partners or other third
parties and any negative impact on any of the foregoing may also have an adverse impact on our business,
financial condition or results of operations.
In addition, some of the major financial institutions with which we execute transactions, including U.S. and
non-U.S. commercial banks, insurance companies, investment banks and other financial institutions may be
17
Table of Contents
exposed to a ratings downgrade, bankruptcy , liquidity events, default or similar risks as a result of
unfavorable econom ic conditions, changing regulatory requirements or other factors beyond our control. A
ratings downgrade, bankruptcy , receiver ship, default or similar event involving  a major financial institution,
or changes in the regulatory environment, may limit the ability or willingness of financial institutions to enter
into financial transactions with us, including to provide banking or related cash management services, or to
extend credit on terms commercially acceptable to us or at all; may leave us with reduced borrowing capacity
or exposed to certain  currencies or price  risk associated with forecasted purchas es of raw materials, including
through our use of fixed-price contracts  and purchase orders, pricing agreements and derivative instruments,
including swaps and futures; or may result in a decline in the market value  of our investments in debt
securities, which could have an adverse impact on our business, financial condition or results of operations.
Similar risks exist with respect to our customers, suppliers, bottlers, contract manufacturers, distributors and
joint ventu re partner s and could result in their inability to obtain credit to purchase our products or to finance
the manufacture and distribution of our products resulting in canceled orders and/or product delays, which
could also have an adverse impact on our business, reputation, financial condition or results of operations.
Our business and reputation could suffer if we are unable to protect our information systems against, or
effectively respond to, cyberattacks or other cyber incidents or if our information systems, or those of our
customers, supplier s, bottlers, contract manufacturers, distributors, joint venture partners or other third
parties, are otherwise disrupted.
We depend on infor mation systems and technology , some of which are provided by third parties, including
public websites and cloud-based services, for many activities important to our business, including: to
interface with our customers and consumers; to engage in marketing activities; to enable and improve the
effectiveness of our operations; to order and manage materials from supplie rs; to manage inventory; to
manage and operate our facilities; to conduct research and development; to maintain accurate financial
records; to achieve operational efficien cies; to comply with regulatory , financial reporting, legal and tax
requirements; to collect and store sensitive data and confidential information; to communicate electronically
among our global operations and with our employees and the employees of our customers, suppliers, bottlers,
contract manufacturers, distributors, joint venture partners and other third parties; and to communicate with
our investors.
Cyberattacks and other cyber incidents are occurring more frequently , are constantly evolving in nature, are
becoming more sophisticated and are being carried out by groups and individuals (including criminal
hackers, hacktivists, state-sponsored actors, criminal and terrorist organizations, individuals or groups
participating in organized crime and insiders) with a wide range of expertise and motives (including
monetization of corporate, payment or other internal or personal data, theft of computing resources, financial
fraud, operational disruption, theft of trade secrets and intellectual property for competitive advantage and
leverage for political, social, economic and environmental reasons). Such cyberattacks and cyber incidents
can take many forms including cyber extortion, denial of service, social engineering, such as impersonation
attempts to fraudulently induce employees or others to disclose information or unwittingly provide access to
systems or data, introduction of viruses  or malware, such as ransomware through phishing emails, website
defacement or theft of passwords and other credentials, unauthorized use of computing resources for digital
currency mining and business email compromises. As with other global companies, we are regularly subject
to cyberat tacks, including many of the types of attacks described above. Altho ugh we may incur significant
costs in protecting against or remediatin g cyberattacks or other cyber incidents, no cyberattack or other cyber
incident has, to our knowledge, had a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition or results of
operations to date.
If we do not allocate and effectively manage the resources necessary to build and maintain our information
technology infrastructure, including monitoring networks and systems, upgrading our security policies and
18
Table of Contents
the skills and training of our employees, and requiring our third-party service providers, customers, suppliers,
bottlers, contract manufacturers, distributors, joint venture partners or other third parties to do the same, if we
or they fail to timely identify or appropriately respond to cyberattacks or other cyber incidents, or if our or
their infor mation systems are damaged, compromised, destroyed or shut down (whether as a result of natural
disasters, fires, power outages, acts of terrorism or other catastrophic events, network outages, software,
equipment or telecommunications failures, technology development defects, user errors, lapses in our
controls or the intentional or negligent actions of employees, or from deliberate cyberattacks such as
malicious or disruptive software, denial of service attacks, malicious social engineering, hackers or
otherwise), our business could be disrupted and we could, among other things, be subject to: transaction
errors; processing inefficiencies; the loss of, or failure to attract, new customers and consumers; lost revenues
resulting from the disruption or shutdown of computer systems or other information technology systems at
our offices, plants, warehouses, distribution centers or other facilities, or the loss of a competitive advantage
due to the unauthorized use, acquisition or disclosure of, or access to, confidenti al information; the incurrence
of costs to restore data and to safeguard against future extortion attempts; the loss of, or damage to,
intellectual property or trade secrets, including the loss or unauthorized disclosure of sensitive data or other
assets; alteration, corruption or loss of accounting, financial or other data on which we rely for financial
reporting and other purposes, which could cause errors or delays in our financial reporting; damage to our
reputation or brands; damage to employee, customer and consumer relations; litigation; regulatory
enforcement actions or fines; unauthorized disclosure of confidential personal information of our employees,
customers or consumers; the loss of information and/or supply chain disruption resulting from the failure of
security patches to be developed and installed on a timely basis; violation of data privacy , security or other
laws and regulations; and remediation costs.
Further , our information systems and those of our third-party providers, and the information stored therein
could be compromised, including through cyberattacks or other external or internal methods, resulting in
unauthorized parties accessing or extracting sensitive data or confidential inform ation. Failure to comply with
data privacy laws could result in litigation, claims, legal or regulatory proceedings, inquiries or
investigations.
We contin ue to devote significant resour ces to network security , backup and disaster recovery , enhancing our
internal controls, and other security measures, including training, to protect our systems and data, but these
security measures cannot provide absolute security or guarantee that we will be successful in preventing or
responding to every such breach or disruption. In addition, due to the constantly evolving nature of these
security threats, the form and impact of any future incident cannot be predicted.
Similar risks exist with respect to the cloud-based service providers and other third-party vendors that we rely
upon for aspects of our information technology support services and administrative functions, including
payroll processing, health and benefit plan administration and certain finance and accounting functions, and
systems managed, hosted, provided and/or used by third parties and their vendors. The need to coordinate
with vario us third-p arty vendors may complicate our efforts to resolve any issues that may arise. As a result,
we are subject to the risk that the activities associated with our third-party vend ors may adversely affect our
business even if the attack or breach does not directly impact our systems or information. Moreover , our
increased use of mobile and cloud technologies could heighten these and other operational risks, as certain
aspects of the security of such technologies may be complex, unpredictable or beyond our control.
While we currently  maintain insurance coverage that, subject to its terms and conditions, is intended to
address costs associated with certain aspects of cyber incidents, network failures and data privacy-related
concerns, this insurance coverage may not, depending on the specific facts and circumstances surrounding an
incident, cover all losses or all types of claims that may arise from an incident, or the damage to our
reputation or brands that may result from an incident.
19
Table of Contents
Our business, financial condition or results of operations may be adversely  affected by increased costs,
disruption of supply or shortages of raw materials, energy , water and other supplies.
We and our business  partners use variou s raw materials, energy, water and other supplies in our business. The
principal ingredients we use in our beverage, food and snack products are apple, orange and pineapple juice
and other juice conc entrates, aspartame, corn, corn sweeteners, flavorings, flour , grapefruit, oats, oranges and
other fruits, potatoes, raw milk, rice, seasonings, sucralose, sugar , vegetable and essential oils, and wheat. We
also use water in the manufacturing of our products. Our key packaging materials include plastic resins,
including PET and polypropylene resins used for plastic beverage bottles and film packaging used for snack
foods, aluminum used for cans, glass bottles, closures, cardboard and paperbo ard cartons. Fuel, electricity
and natural gas are also important commodities for our businesses due to their use in our and our business
partners’  facilities and the vehicles delivering our products.
Some of these raw materials and supplies are sourced from countries experiencing civil unrest, political
instability or unfavorable economic conditions, and some are available from a limited number of suppliers or
a sole supplier or are in short supply when seasonal demand is at its peak. We cannot assure that we will be
able to maintain favorable arrangements and relationships with these suppliers or that our contingency plans,
including development of ingredients, materials or supplies to replace ingredients, materials or supplies
sourced from such suppliers, will be effective in preventing disruptions that may arise from shortages or
discontinuation of any ingredient that is sourced from such suppliers. In addition, increasing focus on climate
change, deforestation, water , animal welfare and human rights concerns and other risks associated with the
global food system may lead to increased activism focusing on consumer goods companies, governmental
intervention and consumer response, and could adversely affect our or our suppliers’  reputation and business
and our ability to procure the material s we need to operate our business. The raw materials and energy,
including fuel, that we use for the manufacturing, production and distribution of our products are largely
commodities that are subject to price volatility and fluctuations in availability caused by many factors,
including changes in global supply and demand, weather conditions (including any potential effects of
climate change), fire, natural disasters (such as a hurricane, tornado, earthquake or flooding), disease or pests
(including the impact of greening disease on the citrus industry), agricultural uncertainty , health epidemics or
pandemics, governmental incentives and controls (including import/export restrictions, such as new or
increased tariffs, sanctions, quotas or trade barriers), limited or sole sources of supply , political uncertainties,
acts of terrorism, governmental instabi lity or currency exchange rates. For example, in 2018, the United
States imposed tariffs on steel and aluminum as well as on goods imported from China and certain other
countries, which has resulted in retaliato ry tariffs by China and other countries. Additional tariffs imposed by
the United States on a broader range of imports, or further retaliatory trade measures taken by China or other
countries in response, could result in an increase in supply chain costs that we may not be able to offset or
otherwise adversely  impact our results  of operations. Shortage of some of these raw materials and other
supplies, sustained interruption in their supply or an increase in their costs  could adversely affect our
business, financial condition or results of operations. Many of our ingredients, raw materials and
commodities are purchased in the open market. The prices we pay for such items are subject to fluctuation,
and we manage this risk through the use of fixed-price contracts and purchase orders, pricing agreements and
derivative instrumen ts, including swaps and futures. If commodity price changes result in unexpected or
significant increases in raw materials and energy costs, we may be unwilling or unable to increase our
product prices or unable to effectively hedge against commodity price increases to offset these increased
costs without suffering reduced volume , revenue, margins and operating results. In addition, certain of the
derivatives used to hedge price risk do not qualify for hedge accounting treatment and, therefore, can result in
increased volatility in our net earnings in any given period due to changes in the spot prices of the underlying
commodities.
20
Table of Contents
Water is a limited resource in many parts of the world. The lack of available water of acceptable quality and
increasing pressure to conserve water in areas of scarcity and stress may lead to: supply chain disruption;
adverse effects on our operations; higher compliance costs; capital expenditures (including additional
investments in the development of technologies to enhance water efficiency and reduce water consumption);
higher production costs; the cessation of operations at, or relocation of, our facilities or the facilities of our
suppliers, bottlers, contract manufacturers, distributors, joint venture partners or other third parties; or
damage to our reputation, any of which could adversely affect our business, financial condition or results of
operations.
Business disruptions could have an adverse impact on our business, finan cial condition or results of
operations.
Our ability , and that of our suppliers and other third parties, including our bottlers, contract manufacturers,
distributors, joint venture partners and customers, to make, manufacture, transport, distribute and sell
products in our portfolio is critical to our success. Damage or disruption to our or their operations due to any
of the following factors could impair the ability to make, manufacture, transport, distribute or sell products in
our portfolio: adverse weather conditions (including any potential effects of climate change) or natural
disasters, such as a hurricane, tornado,  earthquake or flooding; government action; economic or political
uncertainties or instability in countries in which such products are made, manufactured, distributed or sold,
which may also affect our ability to protect the security of our assets and employees; fire; terrorism; outbreak
or escalation of armed hostilities; food safety warnings or recalls, whether related to products in our portfolio
or otherwise; health epidemics or pandemics; supply and commodity shortages; unplanned delays or
unexpected problem s associated with repairs or enhancements of facilities in which such products are made,
manufactured, distributed or sold; loss or impairment of key manufacturing sites; cyber incidents, including
the disrup tion or shutdown of compute r systems or other information techno logy systems at our offices,
plants, warehouses, distribution centers or other facilities or those of our suppliers and other third parties who
make, manufacture, transport, distribute and sell products in our portfolio; industrial accidents or other
occupational health and safety issues; telecommunications failures; power or water shortages; strikes, labor
disputes or lack of availability of qualified personnel, such as truck drivers; or other reasons beyond our
control or the contro l of our suppliers and other third parties. Failure to take adequate steps to mitigate the
likelihood or potential impact of such events, or to effectively manage such events if they occur , could
adversely affect our business, financial condition or results of operations, as well as require additional
resources to restore operations.
Product contamination or tampering or issues or concerns with respect to product quality , safety and
integrity could adversely af fect our business, reputation, financial condition or results of operations.
Product contamination or tampering, the failure to maintain high standards for product quality , safety and
integrity , including with respect to raw materials and ingredients obtained from suppliers, or allegations
(whether or not valid) of product quality issues, mislabeling, misbranding, spoil age, allergens, adulteration or
contamination with respect to products in our portfolio may reduce demand for such products, and cause
production and delivery disruptions or increase costs, which could adversely affect our business, reputation,
financial condition or results of operations. If any of the products in our portfo lio are mislabeled or become
unfit for consumptio n or cause injury , illness or death, or if appropriate resourc es are not devoted to product
quality and safety (particularly as we expand our portfolio into new categories) or to comply with changing
food safet y requirem ents, we could decide to, or be required to, recall products in our portfolio and/or we
may be subject to liability or government action, which could result in paymen t of damages or fines, cause
certain products in our portfolio to be unavailable for a period of time, result in destruction of product
inventory , or result in adverse publicity  (whether or not valid), which could reduce consumer demand and
brand equity . Moreover , even if allegations of product contamination or tampering or suggestions that our
products were not fit for consumption are meritless, the negative publicity surrounding assertions against us
or products in our portfolio or processes could adversely af fect our reputation or brands. Our business could
21
Table of Contents
also be adversely affected if consumer s lose confidence in product quality , safety and integrity generally ,
even if such loss of confidence is unrela ted to products in our portfolio. Any of the foregoing could adversely
affect our business, reputation, financial condition or results of operations. In addition, if we do not have
adequate insurance,  if we do not have enforceable indemnification from suppliers, bottlers, contract
manufacturers, distributors, joint venture partners or other third parties or if indemnification is not available,
the liability relating to such product claims or disruption as a result of recall efforts could materially
adversely af fect our business, financial condition or results of operations.
Any damage to our reputation or brand image could adversely affect our business, financial condition or
results of operations.
We are a leading global beverage, food and snack company with brands that are respected household names
throughout the world. Maintaining a good reputation globally is critical to selling our branded products. Our
reputation or brand image could be adversely impacted by any of the following, or by adverse publicity
(whether or not valid) relating thereto: the failure to maintain high ethical, socia l and environmental practices
for all of our operations and activities, including with respect to human rights, child labor laws and workplace
conditions and safety , or failure to require our suppliers or other third parties to do so; the failure to achieve
our goals of reducin g added sugars, sodium and saturated fat in certain of our products and of growing our
portfolio of product choices; the failure to achieve our other sustainability goals, including with respect to
plastic packaging, or to be perceived as appropriately addressing matters of social responsibility; the failure
to protect our intellectual property , including in the event our brands are used without our authorization;
health concerns (whether or not valid) about our products or particular ingredients or substances in, or
attributes of, our products, including concerns regarding whether certain of our products contribute to
obesity; the imposition or proposed imposition of new or increased taxes, labeling requirements or other
limitations on, or pertaining to, the sale, display or advertising of our produc ts; any failure to comply , or
perception of a failure to comply , with our policies and goals, including those regarding advertising to
children and reducing calorie consumption from sugar -sweetened beverages; our research and development
efforts; the recall (voluntary or otherw ise) of any products in our portfolio; our environmental impact,
including use of agricultural materials, plastics or other packaging, water , energy use and waste management;
any failure to achieve our goals with respect to reducing our impact on the environment, including the
recyclability or recoverability of our packaging, or perception of a failure to act responsibly with respect to
water use and the environment; any failure to achieve our goals with respect to human rights throughout our
value chain; the practices of our employees, agents, customers, suppliers, bottlers, contract manufacturers,
distributors, joint venture partners or other third parties (including others in our industry) with respect to any
of the foregoing, actual or perceived; consumer perception of our industry; consumer perception of our
advertising campaigns, sponsorship arrangements or marketing programs; consumer perception of our use of
social media; consumer perception of statements made by us, our employees and executives, agents,
customers, suppliers , bottlers, contract manufacturers, distributors, joint venture  partners or other third parties
(including others in our industry); or our responses or the responses of others in our industry to any of the
foregoing.
In addition, we operate globally , which  requires us to comply with numerous local regulations, including,
without limitation, anti-corruption laws,  competition laws and tax laws and regulations of the jurisdictions in
which our products are made, manufactured, distributed or sold. In the event that we or our employees
engage in or are believed to have engaged in improper activities, we may be subject to regulatory
proceedings, including enforcement actions, litigation, loss of sales or other consequences, which may cause
us to suffer damage to our reputation in the United States or abroad. Failure to comply with local laws and
regulations, to maintain an effective system of internal control or to provide accurate and timely financial
information could also hurt our reputation. In addition, water is a limited resource in many parts of the world
and demand for water continues to rise. Our reputation could be damaged if we or others in our industry do
not act, or are perceived not to act, responsibly with respect to water use.
22
Table of Contents
Further , the popularity of social media and other consumer -oriented technologies has increased the speed and
accessibility of information disseminati on. As a result, negative or inaccurate posts or comments about us,
our products, policies, practices, advertising campaigns and marketing programs or sponsorship
arrangements; our use of social media or of posts or other information dissemin ated by us or our employees,
agents, customers, suppliers, bottlers, contract manufacturers, distributors, joint venture partners or other
third parties; consumer perception of any of the foregoing, or failure by us to respond effectively to any of the
foregoing, may also generate adverse publicity (whether or not valid) that could damage our reputation.
Damage to our reputation or brand image or loss of consumer confidence in our products or employees for
any of these or other reasons could result in decreased demand for our products and could adversely affect
our business, financial condition or results of operations, as well as require additional resources to rebuild our
reputation.
Failure to successfully complete or integrate acquisitions and joint ventures into our existing operations,
or to complete or effectively manage divestitures or refranchisings, could adversely affect our business,
financial condition or results of operations.
We regularly review our portfolio of businesses and evaluate potential acquisitions, joint ventures,
divestitures, refranc hisings and other strategic transactions. Potential issues associated with these activities
could include, among other things: our ability to realize the full extent of the expected returns, benefits, cost
savings or syner gies as a result of a transaction, within the anticipated time frame, or at all; receipt of
necessary consents, clearances and approvals in connection with a transaction; and diversion of
management’ s attention from day-to-day operations.
With respect to acquisitions, including  our recently completed acquisition of SodaStream, the following
factors also pose potential risks: our ability to successfully combine our businesses with the business of the
acquired company , including integra ting the acquired company’ s manufacturing, distribution, sales,
accounting, financia l reporting and administrative support activities and information technology systems with
our company; our ability to successfull y operate in new categories or territories; motivating, recruiting and
retaining executives and key employees (both of the acquired company and our company); conforming
standards, controls (including internal control over financial reporting and disclo sure controls and procedures,
environmental comp liance, health and safety compliance and compliance with other laws and regulations),
procedures and policies, business cultures and compensation structures between us and the acquired
company; consolidating and streamlinin g corporate and administrative infrastructures and avoiding increased
operating expenses; consolidating sales and marketing operations; retaining existing customers and attracting
new customers; retaining existing distributors; identifying and eliminating redundant and underperforming
operations and assets; coordinating geographically dispersed organizations; managing tax costs or
inefficiencies associated with integrating our operations following completion of an acquisition; and other
unanticipated problems or liabilities, such as contingent liabilities and litigation.
With respect to joint ventures, we share ownership and management responsibility with one or more parties
who may or may not have the same goals, strategies, priorities, resources or values as we do. Joint ventures
are intend ed to be operated for the benefit of all co-owners, rather than for our exclusive benefit. Business
decisions or other actions or omissions of our joint venture partners may adversely affect the value of our
investment, result in litigation or regulatory action against us or otherwise dama ge our reputation and brands
and adversely af fect our business, financial condition or results of operations.
In addition, acquisitions and joint ventures outside of the United States increase our exposure to risks
associated with operations outside of the United States, including fluctuations in exchange rates and
compliance with the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act and other anti-corruption and anti-bribery laws and laws
and regulations outside the United States.
23
Table of Contents
With respect to divestitures and refranchisings, we may not be able to complete or effectively manage such
transactions on terms commercially favorable to us or at all and may fail to achieve the anticipated benefits or
cost savings from the divestiture or refranchising. Further , as divestitures and refranchisings may reduce our
direct control over certain aspects of our business, any failure to maintain good relations with divested or
refranchised businesses in our supply or sales chain may adversely impact our sales or business performance.
If an acquisition or joint venture is not successfully completed, integrated into our existing operations or
managed effectively , or if a divestiture or refranchising is not successfully completed or managed effectively
or does not result in the benefits or cost savings we expect, our business, financial condition or results of
operations may be adversely af fected.
A change  in our estimates and underlying assumptions regarding the future performance of our
businesses could result in an impairment charge, which could materially af fect our results of operations.
We conduct impairment tests on our goodwill, indefinite-lived intangible assets, as well as other investments
and other long-lived  assets annually , during our third quarter , or more frequen tly if circumstances indicate
that the carrying value may not be recoverable. Any changes in our estimates or underlying assumptions
regarding the future performance of our reporting units or in determining the fair value of any such reporting
unit, inclu ding goodwill, indefinite-lived  intangible assets, as well as other investments and other long-lived
assets, could adversely affect our results of operations. Factors that could result in an impairment include, but
are not limited to: significant negative economic or industry trends or comp etitive operating conditions;
significant macroeco nomic conditions that may result in a future increase in the weighted-average cost of
capital used to estimate fair value; and significant changes in the nature and timing of decisions regarding
assets or markets that do not perform consistent with our expectations, including factors we use to estimate
future levels of sales, operating profit or cash flows. Future impairment charges could have a significant
adverse ef fect on our results of operations in the periods recognized.
Increases in income tax rates, changes in income tax laws or disagreements with tax authorities could
adversely af fect our business, financial condition or results of operations.
We are subject to income taxes in the United States and in certain foreign jurisdictions in which we operate.
Increases in income tax rates or other changes in income tax laws in any particular jurisdiction could reduce
our after-tax income  from such jurisdiction and could adversely affect our business, financial condition or
results of operations. Our operations outside the United States generate a significant portion of our income. In
addition, the United States and many of the other countries in which our products are made, manufactured,
distributed or sold, including countries in which we have significant operations, have recently made or are
actively considering changes to existing tax laws. For example, in December 2017, the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act
(TCJ Act) was signed into law in the United States. While our accounting for the recorded impact of the TCJ
Act is deemed to be complete, these amounts are based on prevailing regulations and currently available
information, and any additional guidan ce issued by the Internal Revenue Service (IRS) could impact our
recorded amounts in future periods. For further information regarding the impa ct and potential impact of the
TCJ Act, see “Our Liquidity and Capital Resources” and “Our Critical Accounting Policies” in Item 7.
Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations and Note 5 to our
consolidated financial statements.
Additional changes in the U.S. tax regime or in how U.S. multinational corporations are taxed on foreign
earnings, including changes in how existing tax laws are interpreted or enforced, could adversely affect our
business, financial condition or results of operations. For example, the Organization for Economic
Cooperation and Development (OECD) has recommended changes to numerous long-standing international
tax princi ples through its base erosion and profit shifting (BEPS) project. These changes, to the extent
adopted,
24
Table of Contents
may increase tax uncertainty , result in higher compliance costs and adversely affect our provision for income
taxes, results of operations and/or cash flow .
We are also subject to regular reviews, examinations and audits by the IRS and other taxing authorities with
respect to income and non-income based taxes both within and outside the United States. In connection with
the OECD’ s BEPS project, companies  are required to disclose more information to tax authorities on
operations around the world, which may lead to greater audit scrutiny of profits earned in various countries.
Economic and political pressures to increase tax revenues in jurisdictions in which we operate, or the
adoption of new or reformed tax legislation or regulation, may make resolving tax disputes more difficult and
the final resolution of tax audits and any related litigation could differ from our historical provisions and
accruals, resulting in an adverse impact on our business, financial condition or results of operations.
If we are unable to recruit, hire or retain key employees or a highly skilled and diverse workforce, it could
have a negative impact on our business, financial condition or results of operations.
Our continued growth requires us to recruit, hire, retain and develop our leadership bench and a highly skilled
and divers e workforce. We compete to recruit and hire new employees and then must train them and develop
their skills and competencies. Our employees are highly sought after by our competitors and other companies
and our continued ability to compete effectively depends on our ability to retain, develop and motivate highly
skilled personnel for all areas of our organization. Any unplanned turnover or unsuccessful implementation of
our succession plans to backfill current leadership positions, including the Chief Executive Officer, or to hire
and retain  a highly skilled and diverse workforce could deplete our institution al knowledge base and erode
our competitive advantage or result in increased costs due to increased competition for employees, higher
employee turnover or increased emplo yee benefit costs. Any of the foregoing could adversely affect our
business, reputation, financial condition or results of operations.
The loss of, or a significant reduction in sales to, any key customer could adversely affect our business,
financial condition or results of operations.
Our customers include wholesale and other distributors, foodservice customers, grocery stores, drug stores,
convenience stores,  discount/dollar stores, mass merchandisers, membership stores, hard discounters, e-
commerce retailers and authorized indep endent bottlers, among others. We must  maintain mutually beneficial
relationships with our key customers, including Wal-Mart, to compete effectively . Any inability to resolve a
significant dispute with any of our key customers, a change in the business condition (financial or otherwise)
of any of our key customers, even if unrelated to us, a significant reduction in sales to any key customer , or
the loss of any of our key customers could adversely affect our business, financial condition or results of
operations.
Disruption in the retail landscape, including rapid growth in hard disco unters and the e-commerce
channel, could adversely af fect our business, financial condition or results of operations.
Our industry has been affected by changes to the retail landscape, including the rapid growth in sales through
e-commerce website s, mobile commerce applications and subscription services  as well as the integration of
physical and digital operations among retailers. We continue to make significant investments in attracting
talent to and building our global e-commerce capabilities. Although we are engaged in e-commerce with
respect to many of our products, if we are unable to maintain and develop successful relationships with
existing and new e-commerce retailers or otherwise adapt to the growing e-commerce landscape, while
simultaneously main taining relationship s with our key customers operating in traditional retail channels, we
may be disadvantaged in certain channels and with certain customers and consumers, which could adversely
affect our business, financial condition or results of operations. In addition, the growth in e-commerce and
hard discounters may result in consumer price deflation, which may af fect our relationships with key retail
25
Table of Contents
customers. Further , the ability of consu mers to compare prices on a real-time basis using digital technology
puts additional pressure on us to main tain competitive prices. If these e-commerce and hard discounter
retailers were to take significant marke t share away from traditional retailers and/or we fail to adapt to the
rapidly changing retail and e-commerce  landscapes, our ability to maintain and grow our profitability , share
of sales or volume and our business, financial condition or results of operations could be adversely af fected.
Further , the retail landscape continues to be impacted by the increased consolidation of retail ownership and
purchasing power , particularly in North America, Europe and Latin America, resulting in large retailers with
increased purchasing power , which may impact our ability to compete in these areas. Such retailers may
demand improved efficiency , lower pricing and increased promotional programs. Further , should larger
retailers increase utilization of their own distribution networks, other distribution channels such as e-
commerce, or private label brands, the competitive advantages we derive from our go-to-market systems and
brand equity may be eroded. In addition, the growth of hard discounters that are focused on limiting the
number of items they sell and selling predominantly private label brands may reduce our ability to sell our
products through such retailers. Failure to appropriately respond to any of the foregoing, including failure to
offer effective sales incentives and marketing programs to our customers, could reduce our ability to secure
adequate shelf space and product availability at our retailers, adversely affect our ability to maintain or grow
our share of sales or volume, and adversely af fect our business, financial condition or results of operations.
Our borrowing costs and access to capital and credit markets may be adversely affected by a downgrade or
potential downgrade of our credit ratings.
Rating agencies routinely evaluate us, and their ratings of our long-term and short-term debt are based on a
number of factors, including our cash generating capability , levels of indebted ness, policies with respect to
shareholder distribu tions and our financial strength generally , as well as factors beyond our control, such as
the then-current state of the economy and our industry generally . Any downgrade of our credit ratings by a
credit rating agency , especially any downgrade to below investment grade, whether as a result of our actions
or factors which are beyond our control, could increase our future borrowing costs, impair our ability to
access capital and credit markets on terms commercially acceptable to us or at all, and result in a reduction in
our liquidity . We expect to maintain Tier 1 commercial paper access, whic h we believe will facilitate
appropriate financia l flexibility and ready access to global credit markets at favorable interest rates. However ,
any down grade of our current short-ter m credit ratings could impair our ability to access the commercial
paper market with the same flexibility that we have experienced historically , and therefore require us to rely
more heavily on more expensive types of debt financing. Our borrowing costs and access to the commercial
paper market could also be adversely affected if a credit rating agency announces that our ratings are under
review for a potential downgrade. An increase in our borrowing costs, limitation s on our ability to access the
global capital and credit markets or a reduction in our liquidity could adversely affect our financial condition
and results of operations.
If we are not able to successfully imple ment shared services or utilize informa tion technology systems and
networks ef fectively , our ability to conduct our business may be negatively impacted.
We have entered into agreements with third-party service providers to utilize information technology support
services and adminis trative functions in certain areas of our business, including payroll processing, health and
benefit plan administration and certain finance and accounting functions. We may enter into new or additional
agreements for shared services in other functions in the future to achieve cost savings and efficiencies as we
continue to migrate to shared business service organizational models across our business operations. In
addition, we utilize cloud-based servic es and systems and networks managed by third-party vendors to
process, transmit and store information and to conduct certain of our business activities and transactions with
employees, customers, consumers and other third parties. If any of these third-party service
26
Table of Contents
providers or vendors do not perform effectively , or if we fail to adequatel y monitor their performance
(including compliance with service level agreements or regulatory or legal requirements), we may not be able
to achieve the expec ted cost savings, we may have to incur additional costs to correct errors made by such
service providers, our reputation could be harmed or we could be subject to litigation, claims, legal or
regulatory proceedings, inquiries or investigations. Depending on the function involved, such errors may also
lead to business disruption, processing inefficiencies, the loss of or damage to intellectual property or
sensitive data through security breaches or otherwise, incorrect or adverse effects on financial reporting,
litigation or remediation costs, or damage to our reputation, which could have a negative impact on employee
morale. In addition, the management of multiple third-party service providers increases operational
complexity and decreases our control.
We continue on our multi-year business  transformation initiative to migrate certain of our systems, including
our financ ial processing systems, to enterprise-wide systems solutions. These systems implementations are
part of our ongoing global business transformation initiative, and we plan to continue implementing such
systems throughout other parts of our businesses. If we do not allocate and effectively manage the resources
necessary to build and sustain the proper information technology infrastructure, or if we fail to achieve the
expected benefits from this initiative, it may impact our ability to process transactions accurately and
efficiently , and remain in step with the changing needs of our business, whic h could result in the loss of
customers or consumers and revenue. In addition, the failure to either deliver the applications on time, or
anticipate the necessary readiness and training needs, could lead to business disruption and loss of customers
or consumers and revenue. In connection with these implementations and resulting business process changes,
we contin ue to enhance the design and documentation of business processes and controls, including our
internal control over financial reporting processes, to maintain effective controls over our financial reporting.
To date, this transiti on has not material ly affected, and we do not expect it to materially affect, our internal
control over financial reporting.
Fluctuations in exchange rates impact our business, financial condition and results of operations.
We hold assets, incur liabilities, earn revenues and pay expenses in a variety of currencies other than the U.S.
dollar . Because our consolidated financi al statements are presented in U.S. dollars, the financial statements of
our subsidiaries outside the United States, where the functional currency is other than the U.S. dollar , are
translated into U.S. dollars. Our opera tions outside of the United States, particularly in Mexico, Russia,
Canada, the United Kingdom and Brazil , generate a significant portion of our net revenue. In addition, we
purchase many of the ingredients, raw materials and commodities used in our business in numerous markets
and in numerous currencies. Fluctuations in exchange rates, including as a result of currency controls or other
currency exchange restrictions have had, and may continue to have, an adverse impact on our business,
financial condition and results of operations.
Climate change, water scarcity or legal , regulatory or market measures to address climate change or water
scarcity may negatively af fect our business and operations or damage our reputation.
There is concern that carbon dioxide and other greenhouse gases in the atmosphere have an adverse impact
on global temperatures, weather patter ns and the frequency and severity of extreme weather and natural
disasters. In the event that such climate change has a negative effect on agricul tural productivity , we may be
subject to decreased availability or less favorable pricing for certain commodities that are necessary for our
products, such as sugar cane, corn, wheat, rice, oats, oranges and other fruits and potatoes. Natural disasters
and extrem e weath er conditions, such as a hurricane, tornado, earthquake or flooding, may disrupt the
productivity of our facilities or the operation of our supply chain and unfavorably impact the demand for, or
our consumers’  ability to purchase, our products. The predicted effects of climate change may also exacerbate
challenges regarding the availability and quality of water . As demand for water access continues to increase
27
Table of Contents
around the world, we may be subject to decreased availability of water , deterio rated quality of water or less
favorable pricing for water , which could adversely impact our manufacturing and distribution operations.
Concern over climate change may result in new or increased regional, federal and/or global legal and
regulatory requirements to reduce or mitigate the effects of greenhouse gases, or to limit or impose additional
costs on commercial water use due to local water scarcity concerns. In the event that such regulation is more
stringent than current regulatory obligations or the measures that we are currently undertaking to monitor and
improve our energy efficiency and water conservation, we may experience disruptions in, or significant
increases in our costs of, operation and delivery and we may be required to make additional investments in
facilities and equipm ent or relocate our facilities. In particular , increasing regulation of fuel emissions could
substantially increase the cost of energy, including fuel, required to operate our facilities or transport and
distribute our products, thereby substantially increasing the distribution and supply chain costs associated
with our products. As a result, the effects of climate change or water scarcity could negatively affect our
business and operations.
In addition, any failure to achieve our goals with respect to reducing our impact on the environment or
perception (whether  or not valid) of our failure to act responsibly with respect to water use and the
environment or to effectively respond to new, or changes in, legal or regulatory requirements concerning
climate change or water scarcity could result in adverse publicity and could adversely affect our business,
reputation, financial condition or results of operations.
There is also increa sed focus, including by governmental and non-governme ntal organizations, investors,
customers and consumers on these and other environmental sustainability matters, including deforestation,
land use, climate impact, water use and recyclability or recoverability of packaging, including plastic. Our
reputation could be damaged if we or others in our industry do not act, or are perceived not to act, responsibly
with respect to our impact on the environment.
A portion of our workforce is represented by unions. Failure to successfully negotiate collective
bargaining agreements, or strikes or work stoppages, could cause our business to suf fer.
Many of our employ ees are covered by collective bargaining agreements, and other employees may seek to
be covered by collective bargaining agreements. Strikes or work stoppages or other business interruptions
could occur if we are unable to renew these agreements on satisfactory terms or enter into new agreements on
satisfactory terms or if we are unable to otherwise manage changes in, or that affect, our workforce, which
could impair manufacturing and distribution of our products or result in a loss of sales, which could adversely
impact our business, financial condition or results of operations. The terms and conditions of existing,
renegotiated or new collective bargaini ng agreements could also increase our costs or otherwise affect our
ability to fully implement future operational changes to enhance our efficiency or to adapt to changing
business needs or strategy .
If we are not able to adequately protect our intellectual property rights or if we are found to infringe the
intellectual property rights of others, the value of our products or brands, or our competitive position,
could be reduced, which could have an adverse impact on our business, financial condition or results of
operations.
We possess intellectual property rights that are important to our business. These intellectual property rights
include ingredient formulas, trademarks , copyrights, patents, business processes and other trade secrets that
are important to our business and relate to a variety of our products, their packaging, the processes for their
production and the design and operat ion of various equipment used in our businesses. We protect our
intellectual property rights globally through a combination of trademark, copyright, patent and trade secret
laws, third-party assignment and nondisclosure agreements and monitoring of third-party misuses of our
28
Table of Contents
intellectual property . If we fail to obtain or adequately protect our trademarks, copyrights, patents, business
processes and trade secrets, including our ingredient formulas, or if there is a change in law that limits or
removes the current legal protections of our intellectual property , the value of our products and brands, or our
competitive position, could be reduced and there could be an adverse impact on our business, financial
condition or results of operations. In addition, if, in the course of developing new products or improving the
quality of existing products, we are found to have infringed the intellectual property rights of others, directly
or indirectly , such finding could have an adverse impact on our business, reputation, financial condition or
results of operations and may limit our ability to introduce new products or improve the quality of existing
products.
Potential liabilities and costs from litigation, claims, legal or regulatory proceedings, inquiries or
investigations could have an adverse impact on our business, financial condition or results of operations.
We and our subsidiaries are party to a variety of litigation, claims, legal or regulatory proceedings, inquiries
and invest igations, including but not limited to matters related to our advertisi ng, marketing or commercial
practices, product labels, claims and ingredients including sugar , sodium and saturated fat, our intellectual
property rights, alleged infringement or misappropriation by us of intellectu al property rights of others,
environmental, priva cy, employment, tax and insurance matters and matters relating to our compliance with
applicable laws and regulations. We evaluate such matters to assess the likelihood of unfavorable outcomes
and estimate, if possible, the amount of potential losses and establish reserves as appropriate. These matters
are inhere ntly uncer tain and there is no guarantee that we will be successful in defending ourselves in these
matters, or that our assessment of the materiality of these matters and the likely outcome or potential losses
and established reserves will be consistent with the ultimate outcome of such matters. In the event that
management’ s assessment of actual or potential claims and proceedings proves inaccurate or litigation,
claims, proceedings, inquiries or investigations that are material arise in the future, there may be a material
adverse effect on our business, financia l condition or results of operations. Responding to litigation, claims,
proceedings, inquiri es, and investigations, even those that are ultimately non-meritorious, may also require us
to incur significant expense and devote significant resources, and may generate adverse publicity that may
damage our reputation or brand image, which could have an adverse impact on our business, financial
condition or results of operations.
Many factors may adversely af fect the price of our publicly traded securities.
Many factors may adversely affect the price of our common stock and publicly traded debt. Such factors,
some of which are beyond our control, may include, but are not limited to: unfavorable economic conditions;
changes in financial or tax reporting and changes in accounting principles or practices that materially affect
our report ed financi al condition and results; investor perceptions of our business, strategies and performance
or those of our competitors; actions by shareholders or others seeking to influence our business strategies;
speculation by the media or investmen t community regarding our business, strategies and performance or
those of our competitors; developments relating to pending litigation, claims, inquiries or investigations;
changes in laws and regulations applic able to our products or business operations; trading activity in our
securities or trading activity in derivative instruments with respect to our securities; changes in our credit
ratings; the impact of our share repurchase programs or dividend policy; and the outcome of referenda and
elections. In addition, corporate actions, such as those we may or may not take from time to time as part of
our continuous review of our corporate structure and our strategy , including as a result of business, legal,
regulatory and tax considerations, may not have the impact we intend and may adversely affect the price of
our securi ties. The above factors, as well as the other risks included in this “Item 1A. Risk Factors,” could
adversely af fect the price of our securities.
29
Table of Contents
Item 1B. Unr esolved Staff Comments.
We have received no written comments regarding our periodic or current reports from the staff of the SEC
that were issued 180 days or more preceding the end of our 2018  fiscal year and that remain unresolved.
30
Table of Contents
Item 2. Pr operties.
Our principal executive offices located in Purchase, New York and our facilities located in Plano, Texas, all
of which we own, are our most significant corporate properties.
Each division utilizes plants, warehouses, distribution centers, storage facilities, offices and other facilities,
either owned or leased, in connection with making, marketing, distributing and selling our products. The
approximate number of such facilities utilized by each division is as follows:
 FLNA  QFNA NABLatin
America ESSA AMENA  Shared(a)
Plants (b)35  5  65 45  85 45  5
Other Facilities (c)1,660  4  440 575  350 335  45
(a)Shared properties are in addition to the other properties reported by our six divisions identified in this table.
(b)Includes manufacturing and processing plants as well as bottling and production plants.
(c)Includes warehouses, distribution centers, storage facilities, offices, including division headquarters, research and development facilities and
other facilities.
Significant properties by division included in the table above are as follows:
•FLNA ’s research and development facility in Plano, Texas, which is owned.
•QFNA ’s food plant in Cedar Rapids, Iowa, which is owned.
•NAB’ s research and development facility in Valhalla, New York, and a Tropica na plant in Bradenton,
Florida, both of which are owned.
•Latin Ame rica’s three snack plants in Mexico (one in Vallejo, one in Celaya and one in Obregón) and
one in Brazil (Sorocaba), all of which are owned.
•ESSA ’s snack plant in Leicester , United  Kingdom, which is leased; its snack plant in Kashira, Russia,
its fruit juice plant in Zeebrugge, Belgium, its beverage plant in Lebedyan, Russia and its dairy plant
in Moscow , Russia, all of which are owned.
•AMENA ’s two beverage plants in Egypt (one in Tanta City and one in Sixth of October City) and its
snack plant in Wuhan, China, all of which are owned; and its snack plant in Riyadh, Saudi Arabia,
which is leased.
•Two concentrate plants in Cork, Ireland,  which are shared by our NAB, ESSA  and AMENA  segments,
both of which are owned; and one in Singapore, which is shared by our NAB and AMENA  segments,
which is leased.
•Shared service centers in Winston-Salem, North Carolina, and Plano, Texas, which are primarily
shared by our FLNA, QFNA  and NAB segments, both of which are leased.
Most of our plants are owned or leased on a long-term basis. In addition to company-owned or leased
properties described  above, we also utilize a highly distributed network of plants, warehouses and distribution
centers that are owned or leased by our contract manufacturers, co-packers , strategic alliances or joint
ventures in which we have an equity interest. We believe that our properties generally are in good operating
condition and, taken as a whole, are suitable, adequate and of suf ficient capacity for our current operations.
31
Table of Contents
Item 3. Legal Pr oceedings.
As previo usly discl osed, in April 2017 , Corporación Autónoma Regional de Cundinamarca, a Colombian
environmental autho rity (the environmental authority), initiated an administrat ive proceeding regarding our
subsidiary , PepsiCo Alimentos Z.F., Ltda. (PAZ), for allegedly delivering wastewater to a third party without
first verify ing that the third party had appropriate permits with respect to the dischar ge of such wastewater . In
July 2018, the environmental authority initiated an administrative proceeding to impose a monetary sanction
against PAZ with respect to the alleged permitting violation by the third party , and on August 13, 2018, PAZ
submitted evidence of its defense to these allegations. If the environmental authority determines PAZ is
responsible for the alleged permitting violations by the third party , the environmental authority may seek to
impose monetary sanctions of up to $1.3 million, which P AZ would be entitled to appeal.
In addition, we and our subsidiaries are party to a variety of litigation, claims, legal or regulatory
proceedings, inquiri es and investigations. While the results of such litigation , claims, legal or regulatory
proceedings, inquiri es and investigations cannot be predicted with certainty , management believes that the
final outcome of the foregoing will not have a material adverse effect on our financial condition, results of
operations or cash flows. Sanctions imposed by foreign authorities are levied in local currency and disclosed
using the U.S. dolla r equivalent at the time of imposition and are subject to currency fluctuations. See also
“Item 1. Business – Regulatory Matters” and “Item 1A. Risk Factors.”
Item 4. Mine Safety Disclosur es.
Not applicable.  
__________________________________________________
Executive Officers of the Registrant
The following is a list of names, ages and backgrounds of our current executive of ficers:
Name Age Title
Marie T. Gallagher 59 Senior Vice President and Controller , PepsiCo
Hugh F . Johnston 57 Vice Chairman, PepsiCo; Executive Vice President and Chief Financial
Officer, PepsiCo
Dr. Mehmood Khan 60 Vice Chairman, PepsiCo; Executive Vice President, PepsiCo Chief Scientific
Officer, Global Research and Development
Ramon Laguarta 55 Chairman of the Board of Directors and Chief Executive Of ficer, PepsiCo
Laxman Narasimhan 51 Chief Executive Of ficer, Latin America, Europe and Sub-Saharan Africa
Silviu Popovici 51 President, Europe Sub-Saharan Africa
Vivek Sankaran 56 Chief Executive Of ficer, Frito-Lay North America
Ronald Schellekens 54 Executive Vice President and Chief Human Resources Of ficer, PepsiCo
Mike Spanos 54 Chief Executive Of ficer, Asia, Middle East and North Africa
Kirk Tanner 50 Chief Executive Of ficer, North America Beverages
David Yawman 50 Executive Vice President, Government Affairs, General Counsel and
Corporate Secretary , PepsiCo
Marie T. Gallagher , 59, was appointed PepsiCo’ s Senior  Vice President and Controller in May 2011.
Ms. Gallagher joined PepsiCo in 2005 as Vice President and Assistant Controller . Prior to joining PepsiCo,
Ms. Gallagher was Assistant Controller at Altria Corporate Services from 1992 to 2005 and, prior to that, a
senior manager at Coopers & L ybrand.
32
Table of Contents
Hugh F. Johnston , 57, was appointed Vice Chairman, PepsiCo in July 2015 and Executive Vice President
and Chief Financial Officer, PepsiCo in March 2010. Mr. Johnston assumed responsibility for the Company’ s
global e-commerce business and the Company’ s global business and information solutions function in July
2015. He previously held responsibility for the Quaker Foods North America division from 2014 to 2016, the
position of Executive Vice President, Global Operations from 2009 to 2010 and the position of President of
Pepsi-Cola North America from 2007 to 2009. He was formerly PepsiCo’ s Executive Vice President,
Operations, a position he held from 2006 until 2007. From 2005 until 2006, Mr. Johnston was PepsiCo’ s
Senior Vice President, Transformation. Prior to that, he served as Senior Vice President and Chief Financial
Officer of PepsiCo Beverages and Foods from 2002 through 2005, and as PepsiCo’ s Senior Vice President of
Mergers and Acquisitions in 2002. Mr. Johnston joined PepsiCo in 1987 as a Business Planner and held
various finance positions until 1999 when he left to join Merck & Co., Inc. as Vice President, Retail, a
position which he held until he rejoined PepsiCo in 2002. Prior to joining PepsiC o in 1987, Mr. Johnston was
with General Electric Company in a variety of finance positions.
Dr. Mehmood Khan , 60, was appointed  Vice Chairman, PepsiCo in February 2015 and Executive Vice
President, PepsiCo Chief Scientific Officer, Global Research and Development in May 2012. He previously
held the position of Chief Executive Officer of PepsiCo’ s Global Nutrition Group from 2010 to May 2012
and the position of PepsiCo’ s Chief Scientific Officer from 2008 to May 2012. Prior to joining PepsiCo,
Dr. Khan served for five years at Takeda Pharmaceuticals in various leadership roles including President of
Research and Development and Chief Medical Officer. Dr. Khan also served at the Mayo Clinic from 2001
until 2003  as the director of the Diabetes, Endocrinology and Nutrition Clinical Unit and as Consultant
Physician in Endocrinology .
Ramon Laguarta , 55, has served as Chief Executive Officer of PepsiCo and as a director of the Board since
October 2018, and assumed the role of Chairman of the Board in February 2019. Mr. Laguarta previously
served as President from 2017 to 2018 . Prior to serving as PepsiCo’ s President, Mr. Laguarta also held a
variety of positions of increasing responsibility in Europe, including as Commercial Vice President of
PepsiCo Europe from 2006 to 2008, PepsiCo Eastern Europe Region from 2008 to 2012, President,
Developing & Emer ging Markets, PepsiCo Europe from 2012 to 2015, Chief Executive Officer, PepsiCo
Europe in 2015, and Chief Executive Officer, Europe Sub-Saharan Africa from 2015 to 2017. From 2002 to
2006, he was Gener al Manager for Iberia Snacks and Juices, and from 1999 to 2001 a General Manager for
Greece Snacks. Prior to joining PepsiCo in 1996 as a marketing vice president for Spain Snacks, Mr.
Laguarta worked for Chupa Chups, S.A., where he worked in several international assignments in Europe and
the United States.
Laxman Narasimhan , 51, was appointed Chief Executive Officer, Latin America, Europe and Sub-S aharan
Africa in September  2017. He previous ly held the positions of Chief Executive Officer, Latin America from
2015 to September 2017, Chief Executive Officer, PepsiCo Latin America Foods from 2014 to July 2015 and
Senior Vice President and Chief Finan cial Officer of PepsiCo Americas Foods, a business unit that had
previously included  the Company’ s Frito-Lay North America, Quaker Foods North America and Latin
America Foods divisions, from 2012 to 2014. Prior to joining PepsiCo in 2012, Mr. Narasimhan spent 19
years at McKinsey & Company , where he served in various positions, including as a director and location
manager of the New Delhi of fice and co-leader of the global consumer and shopper insights practice.
Silviu Popovici , 51, was appointed President, Europe Sub-Saharan Africa, effective September 2017. Mr.
Popovici previously served as President, Russia, Ukraine and CIS (The Commonwealth of Independent
States) from August 2015 to September 2017, and as President, PepsiCo Russia from January 2013 to July
2015. Mr. Popovici joined PepsiCo in 2011 following PepsiCo’ s acquisition of Wimm-Bill-Dann Foods OJSC
(WBD) and served as General Manage r, WBD Foods Division from February  2011 until December 2012.
Prior to the acquisition, Mr. Popovici held senior leadership roles at WBD, running its dairy business from
2008 to 201 1 and its beverages business from 2006 to 2008.
33
Table of Contents
Vivek Sankaran , 56, was appointed Chief Executive Officer, Frito-Lay North America, effective January
2019. Prior to that, Mr. Sankaran served as President and Chief Operating Officer, Frito-Lay North America
from April 2016 to December 2018; Chief Operating Officer, Frito-Lay North America from February 2016
to April 2016; Chief Commercial Officer, North America from 2014 to February 2016; Chief Customer
Officer for Frito-Lay North America from 2012 to 2014; Senior Vice President  and General Manager , Frito-
Lay North America’ s South business unit from 2011 to 2012; and Senior Vice President, Corporate Strategy
and Devel opment from 2009 to 2010.  Prior to joining PepsiCo in 2009, Mr. Sankaran was a partner at
McKinsey & Company , where he advised Fortune 100 companies with a focus on retail and high tech and co-
led the North America purchasing and supply management practice.
Ronald Schellekens , 54, was appointed Executive Vice President and Chief Human Resources Officer,
PepsiCo, effective December 2018. Prior to that, Mr. Schellekens served as Group HR Director of Vodafone
Group Services Limited from 2009 to December 2018, where he was responsible for the Vodafone Human
Resource Management function, as well as health and safety , and property and real estate functions. Prior to
joining Vodafone, Mr. Schellekens was executive vice president, human resources for the global downstream
division of Royal Dutch Shell Plc. Prior to that, he worked for PepsiCo for nine years from 1994 to 2003 in
various international, senior human resources roles, including assignments in Switzerland, Spain, South
Africa, the United Kingdom and Poland, where he was most recently responsible for the Europe, Middle East
& Africa region for PepsiCo Foods International. Prior to that, he served for nine years at AT&T  Inc. in
Human Resources.
Mike Spanos, 54, was appointed Chief Executive Officer, Asia, Middle East and North Africa, effective
January 2018. Mr. Spanos previously served as interim head of PepsiCo’ s Asia, Middle East and North Africa
division from October 2017 to January 2018 and as President and Chief Execu tive Officer, PepsiCo Greater
China Region, from September 2014 to January 2018. Prior to that, Mr. Spanos served as Senior Vice
President and Chief Customer Officer, PepsiCo North America Beverages from  October 2011 to September
2014, as Senior Vice President and Gene ral Manager , PepsiCo Beverages Company’ s West business unit from
March 2011 to October 2011 and as Senior Vice President, Retail Sales and Execution, PepsiCo Beverages
Company from March 2010 to March 2011. Mr. Spanos joined PepsiCo in 1993 as a territory sales manager
and unit manager in the Philadelphia market unit and served in various other leadership roles through March
2010. Prior to joining PepsiCo, Mr. Spanos served in the United States Marines Corps from 1987 to 1993,
and with Tallahassee Medical Company as a sales representative in 1993.
Kirk Tanner , 50, was appointed Chief Executive Officer, North America Beverages, effectiv e January 2019.
Prior to that, Mr. Tanner served as President and Chief Operating Officer, North America Beverages from
April 2016 to December 2018; Chief Operating Officer, North America Beverages and President, Global
Foodservice from December 2015 to April 2016 and President, Global Foodservice from 2014 to December
2015. Mr. Tanner joined PepsiCo in 1992, where he has worked in numerous domestic and international
locations and in a variety of roles, including senior vice president of Frito-Lay North America’ s West region
from 2009 to 2013 ; vice president, sales of PepsiCo UK and Ireland from  2008 to 2009; region vice
president, Frito-Lay  North America’ s Mountain region from 2005 to 2008; region vice president, Frito-Lay
North America’ s Mid-America region from 2002 to 2005; and region vice president, Frito-Lay North
America’ s California region from 2000 to 2002.
David Yawman , 50, was appointed Executive Vice President, Government Affairs, General Counsel and
Corporate Secretary , PepsiCo effective October 2017. Prior to that, Mr. Yawman served as Senior Vice
President and Deputy General Counsel for PepsiCo and General Counsel for North America and Corporate
from July 2017 to October 2017. He previously served as Senior Vice President, PepsiCo Deputy General
Counsel, General Counsel, North America Beverages and Quaker Foods North  America from July 2015 to
July 2017, as Senior Vice President, PepsiCo Deputy General Counsel, General Counsel, PepsiCo America
34
Table of Contents
Beverages from April 2014 to July 2015, as Senior Vice President, PepsiCo Chief Compliance and Ethics
Officer from March 2012 to April 2014 and as Senior Vice President, General Counsel, Pepsi Beverages
Company from February 2010 to March 2012. Prior to that, he served five years in the law department of The
Pepsi Bottling Group, Inc. (PBG) and, prior to that, was a member of PepsiCo’ s corporate law department
from the time he joined PepsiCo in 1998 until 2003.
Executive officers are elected by our Board of Directors, and their terms of office continue until the next
annual meeting of the Board or until their successors are elected and have qualified. There are no family
relationships among our executive of ficers.
35
Table of Contents
PART II
Item 5. Market for Registrant’ s Common Equity , Related Stockholder  Matters and Issuer  Purchases of
Equity Securities.
Stock Trading Symbol – PEP
Stock Exchange Listings – The Nasdaq Global Select Market is the principal market for our common stock,
which is also listed on the SIX Swiss Exchange.
Shareholders – As of February 8, 2019 , there were approx imately 114,513 shareholders of record of our
common stock.
Dividends – We have paid consecutive quarterly cash dividends since 1965. The declaration and payment of
future dividends are at the discretion of the Board of Directors. Dividends are usually declared in February ,
May, July and November and paid at the end of March, June and September and the beginning of January . On
February 13, 2019, the Board of Directors declared a quarterly dividend of $0.9275 payable March 29, 2019,
to shareholders of record on March 1, 2019. For the remainder of 2019, the dividend record dates for these
payments are expected to be June 7, September 6 and December 6, 2019, subjec t to approval of the Board of
Directors.
For inform ation on securities authorize d for issuance under our equity compensation plans, see “Item 12.
Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters.”
A summary of our common stock repurchases (in millions, except average price per share) during the fourth
quarter of 2018  is set forth in the table below .
Issuer  Purchases of Common Stock
PeriodTotal
Number  of
Shar es
Repur chased(a)Average
Price Paid
Per Shar eTotal Number  of
Shar es
Purchased as
Part of Publicly
Announced Plans
or ProgramsMaximum Number  (or
Appr oximate
Dollar  Value) of
Shar es that May Yet Be
Purchased Under  the
Plans or  Programs(b)
9/8/2018   $ 14,631
   
9/9/2018 - 10/6/2018 1.3 $ 112.64 1.3 (147)
   14,484
10/7/2018 - 1 1/3/2018 1.3 $ 110.39 1.3 (145)
   14,339
11/4/2018 - 12/1/2018 1.4 $ 116.68 1.4 (163)
   14,176
12/2/2018 - 12/29/2018 0.8 $ 116.99 0.8 (92)
Total 4.8 $ 113.91 4.8 $ 14,084
(a)All shares were repurchased in open market transactions pursuant to publicly announced repurchase programs.
(b)Represents shares authorized for repurchase under the $15 billion repurchase program authorized by our Board of Directors
and publicly announced on February 13, 2018, which commenced on July 1, 2018 and will expire on June 30, 2021. Such
shares may be repurchased in open market transactions, in privately negotiated transactions, in accelerated stock repurchase
transactions or otherwise.
36
Table of Contents
Item 6. Selected Financial Data.
Five-Y ear Summary
(unaudited, in millions except per share amounts)  
The following selected financial data should be read in conjunction with “Item 7. Management’ s Discussion
and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations,” our consolidated financial statements and
accompanying notes  thereto. Our fiscal year ends on the last Saturday of each December and our fiscal year
2016 comprised fifty-three reporting weeks while all other fiscal years presented in the tables below
comprised fifty-two reporting weeks.
 2018 2017 2016 2015  2014
Net revenue (a)$ 64,661$ 63,525$ 62,799$ 63,056 $ 66,683
Operating profit (b)$ 10,110$ 10,276$ 9,804$ 8,274 $ 9,755
(Benefit from)/provision for income taxes (c)$ (3,370)$ 4,694$ 2,174$ 1,941 $ 2,199
Net income attributable to PepsiCo (c)$ 12,515$ 4,857$ 6,329$ 5,452 $ 6,513
Net income attributable to PepsiCo per common
share – basic (c)$ 8.84$ 3.40$ 4.39$ 3.71 $ 4.31
Net income attributable to PepsiCo per common
share – diluted (c)$ 8.78$ 3.38$ 4.36$ 3.67 $ 4.27
Cash dividends declared per common share $ 3.5875$ 3.1675$ 2.96$ 2.7625 $ 2.5325
Total assets $ 77,648$ 79,804$ 73,490$ 68,976 $ 69,634
Long-term debt $ 28,295$ 33,796$ 30,053$ 29,213 $ 23,821
(a) Our fiscal 2016 results included an extra week of results (53rd reporting week). The 53rd reporting week increased 2016 net revenue by $657
million, including $294 million in our FLNA  segment, $43 million in our QFNA  segment, $300 million in our NAB segment and $20 million
in our ESSA  segment.
(b) Our fiscal results prior to 2018 reflect the retrospective adoption of guidance requiring the presentation of non-service cost components of
net periodic benefit cost below operating profit. See Note 2 to our consolidated financial statements.
(c) Our fiscal 2018 results include other net tax benefits related to the reorganization of our international operations. Our fiscal 2018 and 2017
results include the impact of the TCJ Act. See Note 5 to our consolidated financial statements.
37
Table of Contents
The following information highlights certain items that impacted our results of operations and financial
condition for the five years presented above:
 2018
 Operating
profit  Other
pension and
retiree
medical
benefits
income  Inter est
expenseBenefit
from
income
taxes(d) Net income
attributable to
noncontr olling
inter estsNet income
attributable
to PepsiCo  Net income
attributable
to PepsiCo
per common
share –
 diluted
Mark-to-market net impact
(e) $ (163) $ — $ — $ 38 $ — $ (125) $ (0.09)
Restructuring and
impairment charges (f)$ (272) $ (36) $ — $ 56 $ 1$ (251) $ (0.18)
Merger and integration
charges (g)$ (75) $ — $ — $ — $ — $ (75) $ (0.05)
Net tax benefit related to the
TCJ Act (h)$ — $ — $ — $ 28 $ — $ 28 $ 0.02
Other net tax benefits (i)$ — $ — $ — $ 5,064 $ — $ 5,064 $ 3.55
Charges related to cash
tender and exchange offers
(j) $ — $ — $(253)$ 62 $ — $ (191) $ (0.13)
Tax reform bonus (k)$ (87) $ — $ — $ 21 $ — $ (66) $ (0.05)
Gains on beverage
refranchising (l)$ 202 $ — $ — $ (30) $ — $ 172 $ 0.12
Gains on sale of assets (m)$ 76 $ — $ — $ (19) $ — $ 57 $ 0.04
 2017
 Operating
profit(b)Other pension
and retiree
medical
benefits
income(b) Provision for
income
taxes(d) Net income
attributable to
PepsiCoNet income
attributable to
PepsiCo per
common
share –
diluted
Mark-to-market net impact (e)$ 15$ — $ (7) $ 8$ 0.01
Restructuring and impairment charges (f)$ (229)$ (66) $ 71 $ (224)$ (0.16)
Provisional net tax expense related to the TCJ Act (h)$ — $ — $ (2,451) $ (2,451)$ (1.70)
Gain on sale of Britvic plc (Britvic) securities (n)$ 95$ — $ (10) $ 85$ 0.06
Gain on beverage refranchising (l)$ 140$ — $ (33) $ 107$ 0.07
Gain on sale of assets (m)$ 87$ — $ (25) $ 62$ 0.04
38
Table of Contents
 2016
 Operating
profit(b) Other
pension and
retiree
medical
benefits
expense(b) Interest
expenseProvision for
income
taxes(d) Net income
attributable to
noncontrolling
interests  Net income
attributable to
PepsiCo  Net income
attributable to
PepsiCo per
common
share –
diluted
Mark-to-market net
impact (e)$ 167 $ — $ — $ (56) $ —  $ 111 $ 0.08
Restructuring and
impairment charges (f)$ (155) $ (5) $ — $ 26 $ 3 $ (131) $ (0.09)
Charge related to the
transaction with Tingyi
(o) $ (373) $ — $ — $ — $ —  $ (373) $ (0.26)
Charge related to debt
redemption (j)$ — $ — $ (233)$ 77 $ —  $ (156) $ (0.11)
Pension-related
settlement charge (p)$ — $ (242) $ — $ 80 $ —  $ (162) $ (0.11)
53rd reporting week (q)$ 126 $ — $ (19)$ (44) $ (1) $ 62 $ 0.04
 2015
 Operating
profit(b) Other pension
and retiree
medical
benefits
income(b)Provision for
income
 
taxes(d) Net income
attributable to
PepsiCoNet income
attributable to
PepsiCo per
common
share –
 diluted
Mark-to-market net impact (e)$ 11 $ — $ (3) $ 8$ —
Restructuring and impairment charges (f)$ (207) $ (23)$ 46 $ (184)$ (0.12)
Charge related to the transaction with Tingyi (o)$ (73) $ — $ — $ (73)$ (0.05)
Pension-related settlement benefits (p)$ 67 $ — $ (25) $ 42$ 0.03
Venezuela impairment charges (r)$ (1,359) $ — $ — $ (1,359)$ (0.91)
Tax benefit (i)$ — $ — $ 230 $ 230$ 0.15
Müller Quaker Dairy (MQD) impairment (s)$ (76) $ — $ 28 $ (48)$ (0.03)
Gain on beverage refranchising (l)$ 39 $ — $ (11) $ 28$ 0.02
Other productivity initiatives (t)$ (90) $ — $ 24 $ (66)$ (0.04)
Joint venture impairment charge (u)$ (29) $ — $ — $ (29)$ (0.02)
 2014
 Operating
profit(b) Other
pension and
retiree
medical
benefits
expense(b) Provision for
income
taxes(d)Net income
attributable to
noncontrolling
interestsNet income
attributable to
PepsiCoNet income
attributable to
PepsiCo per
common
share –
 diluted
Mark-to-market net impact (e)$ (68) $ — $ 24$ — $ (44)$ (0.03)
Restructuring and impairment charges
(f) $ (384) $ (34) $ 99$ 3$ (316)$ (0.21)
Pension-related settlement charge (p)$ — $ (141) $ 53$ — $ (88)$ (0.06)
Venezuela remeasurement charge (v)$ (105) $ — $ — $ — $ (105)$ (0.07)
Gain on sale of assets (m)$ 31 $ — $ 3$ — $ 34$ 0.02
Other productivity initiatives (t)$ (67) $ — $ 13$ — $ (54)$ (0.04)
39
Table of Contents
(d) Benefit from/provision for income taxes is the expected tax benefit/char ge on the underlying item based on the tax laws and income tax rates
applicable to the underlying item in its corresponding tax jurisdiction and tax year .
(e) Mark-to-market net gains and losses on commodity derivatives in corporate unallocated expenses.
(f) Expenses related to the 2019 Multi-Y ear Productivity Plan (2019 Productivity Plan), 2014 Multi-Y ear Productivity Plan (2014 Productivity
Plan) and 2012 Multi-Y ear Productivity Plan (2012 Productivity Plan). See Note 3 to our consolidate d financial statements for further
discussion of our 2019 and 2014 Productivity Plans.
(g) In 2018, merger and integration charges related to our acquisition of SodaStream. $57 million of this charge was recorded in the ESSA
segment, with the balance recorded in corporate unallocated expenses. See Note 14 to our consolidated financial statements.
(h) In 2018, a net tax benefit and, in 2017, a provisional net tax expense, each associated with the enactment  of the TCJ Act. See Note 5 to our
consolidated financial statements.
(i) In 2018 , other net tax benefits of $4.3 billion resulti ng from the reorganization of our international operations, including the intercompany
transfer of certain intangib le assets. Also in 2018, non-cash tax benefits of $717 million associated with both the conclusion of certain
international tax audits and our agreement with the IRS resolving all open matters related to the audits of taxable years 2012 and 2013. See
Note 5 to our consolidated financial statements.  In 2015, non-cash tax benefit associated with our agreement with the IRS resolving
substantially all open matte rs related to the audits for taxable years 2010 through 2011, which reduced our reserve for uncertain tax positions
for the tax years 2010 through 201 1.
(j) In 2018, interest expense in connection with our cash tender and exchange offers, primarily representing the tender price paid over the
carrying value of the tendered notes.  In 2016, interest expense  primarily representing the premium paid in accordance with the “make-
whole” redem ption provisi ons to redeem all of our outstanding 7.900% senior notes due 2018 and 5.125% senior notes due 2019 for the
principal amounts of $1.5 billion and $750 million, respectively . See Note 8 to our consolidated financial statements.
(k) In 2018, bonus extended to certain U.S. employees in connection with the TCJ Act in the following segments: $44 million in FLNA, $2
million in QFNA  and $41 million in NAB.
(l) In 2018, gains of $58 million and $144 million assoc iated with refranchising our entire beverage bottling operations and snack distribution
operations in Czech Republic, Hungary  and Slovakia (CHS) in the ESSA  segment and refranchising a portion of our beverage business in
Thailand in the AMENA  segment, respectively . In 2017, gain in the AMENA  segment associated with refranchising a portion of our
beverage business in Jorda n. See Note 14 to our consolidated financial statements.  In 2015, gain in the AME NA segment associated with
refranchising a portion of our beverage businesses in India.
(m) In 2018, gains associated with the sale of assets in the following segments: $64 million in NAB and $12 million in AMENA. In 2017, gains
associated with the sale of assets in the following segments: $17 million in FLNA, $21 million in NAB, $21 million in AMENA  and $28
million in corporate unallocated expenses . In 2014, gain in the ESSA  segment associated with the sale of agricultural assets in Russia.
(n) In 2017, gain in the ESSA  segment associated with the sale of our minority stake in Britvic.
(o) In 2016 , impa irment charge in the AMENA  segment to reduce the value of our 5% indirect equity intere st in KSF Beverage Holding Co.,
Ltd. (KSFB), formerly known as Tingyi-Asahi Beverages Holding Co. Ltd., to its estimated fair value. See Note 9 to our consolidated
financial statements. In 2015, write-of f in the AMENA  segment of the value of a call option to increase our holding in KSFB to 20%.
(p) In 2016 , pension settlement charge related to the purchase of a group annuity contract. In 2015, benefits in the NAB segment associated with
the settlement of pension-r elated liabilities from previous acquisitions. In 2014, lump sum settlement charge related to payments for pension
liabilities to certain former employees who had vested benefits.
(q) Our fiscal 2016 results included the 53rd reporting week, the impact of which was fully of fset by incremental investments in our business.
(r) In 2015 , charges in the Latin America segment related to the impairment of investments in our wholly-owned Venezuelan subsidiaries and
beverage joint venture. Beginning in the fourth quarter of 2015, our financial results have not included the results of our Venezuelan
businesses.
(s) In 2015 , impairment charges in the QFNA  segment associated with our MQD joint venture investment, including a charge related to ceasing
its operations.
(t) In 2015 and 2014, expenses related to other productivity initiatives outside the scope of the 2014 and 2012 Productivity Plans.
(u) In 2015, impairment char ge in the AMENA  segment associated with a joint venture in the Middle East.
(v) In 2014, net charge related  to our remeasurement of the bolivar for certain net monetary assets of our Venezuelan businesses. $126 million of
this char ge was in corporate unallocated expenses, with the balance (equity income of $21 million) in our Latin America segment.
40
Table of Contents
Selected Quarterly Financial Data
Selected financial data for 2018  and 2017  is summarized as follows and highlights certain items that
impacted our quarterly results (in millions except per share amounts, unaudited):
 2018 2017
 First
QuarterSecond
Quarter Third
Quarter Fourth
QuarterFirst
Quarter Second
QuarterThird
Quarter Fourth
Quarter
Net revenue $12,562$16,090 $16,485 $19,524$12,049 $15,710$16,240 $19,526
Gross profit (a)$6,907$8,827 $8,958 $10,588$6,759 $8,651$8,872 $10,447
Operating profit (a)$1,807$3,028 $2,844 $2,431$1,863 $2,919$2,924 $2,570
Mark-to-market net impact (b)$ (31)$ 3 $ (29) $(106)$ (14) $ (26)$ 27 $ 28
Restructuring and impairment
charges (c)$ (12)$ (32) $ (35) $(229)$ (27) $ (34)$ (8) $(226)
Merger and integration charges (d)— — — $ (75) — — — —
Net tax (expense)/benefit related to
the TCJ Act (e)$ (1)$(777) $ (76) $ 882 — — — $(2,451)
Other net tax benefits (f)— $ 314 $ 364 $4,386 — — — —
Charges related to cash tender
and exchange offers (g)— — — $(253) — — — —
Tax reform bonus (h)$ (87) — — — — — — —
Gains on beverage refranchising
(i) — $ 144 — $ 58 — — — $ 140
Gains on sale of assets (j)$ 18$ 9 $ 37 $ 12 — — $ 21 $ 66
Gain on sale of Britvic securities
(k) — — — — — $ 95 — —
Provision for/(benefit from)
income taxes (l)$ 304$1,070 $ 188 $(4,932)$ 392 $ 656$ 620 $3,026
Net income/(loss) attributable to
PepsiCo (l)$1,343$1,820 $2,498 $6,854$1,318 $2,105$2,144 $(710)
Net income/(loss) attributable to
PepsiCo per common share (l)         
Basic $ 0.94$ 1.28 $ 1.77 $ 4.86$0.92 $1.47$1.50 $(0.50)
Diluted $ 0.94$ 1.28 $ 1.75 $ 4.83$0.91 $1.46$1.49 $(0.50)
Cash dividends declared per
common share $0.805$0.9275 $0.9275 $0.9275$0.7525 $0.805$0.805 $0.805
(a) In 2017 , reflect the retrospective adoption of guidance requiring the presentation of non-service cost components of net periodic benefit cost
below operating profit. See Note 2 to our consolidated financial statements.
(b) Mark-to-market net gains and losses on commodity derivatives in corporate unallocated expenses.
(c) Expenses related to the 2019 and 2014 Productivity Plans. See Note 3 to our consolidated financial statements.
(d) In 2018, merger and integration charges related to our acquisition of SodaStream. $57 million of this charge was recorded in the ESSA
segment, with the balance recorded in corporate unallocated expenses. See Note 14 to our consolidated financial statements.
(e) In 2018, a net tax benefit and, in 2017, a provisional net tax expense, each associated with the enactment  of the TCJ Act. See Note 5 to our
consolidated financial statements.
(f) In 2018, other net tax benefits of $4.3 billion resulting from the reorganization of our international operations. Also in 2018, non-cash tax
benefits of $717 million associated with both the conclusion of certain international tax audits and our agreement with the IRS resolving all
open matters related to the audits of taxable years 2012 and 2013. See Note 5 to our consolidated financial statements.
(g) In 2018, interest expense in connection with our cash tender and exchange of fers. See Note 8 to our consolidated financial statements.
(h) In 2018, bonus extended to certain U.S. employees in connection with the TCJ Act in the following segments: $44 million in FLNA, $2
million in QFNA  and $41 million in NAB.
(i) In 2018, gains of $58 million and $144 million assoc iated with refranchising our entire beverage bottling operations and snack distribution
operations in CHS in the ESSA  segment and refranchising a portion of our beverage business in Thailand in the AMENA  segment,
respectively . In 2017, gain in the AMENA  segment associated with refranchising a portion of our beverag e business in Jordan. See Note 14
to our consolidated financial statements.
(j) In 2018, gains associated with the sale of assets in the following segments: $64 million in NAB and $12 million in AMENA. In 2017, gains
associated with the sale of assets in the following segments: $17 million in FLNA, $21 million in NAB, $21 million in AMENA  and $28
million in corporate unallocated expenses .
(k) In 2017, gain in the ESSA  segment associated with the sale of our minority stake in Britvic. See Note 9 to our consolidated financial
statements.
41
Table of Contents
(l) Our fiscal 2018 results include other net tax benefits related to the reorganization of our international operations. Our fiscal 2018 and 2017
results include the impact of the TCJ Act. See Note 5 to our consolidated financial statements.
42
Table of Contents
Item 7. Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations.
OUR BUSINESS  
Executive Overview 44
Our Operations 44
Other Relationships 45
Our Business Risks 45
OUR FINANCIAL  RESUL TS  
Results of Operations – Consolidated Review 49
Non-GAAP  Measures 52
Items Affecting Comparability 55
Results of Operations – Division Review 59
Frito-Lay North America 60
Quaker Foods North America 61
North America Beverages 62
Latin America 63
Europe Sub-Saharan Africa 64
Asia, Middle East and North Africa 65
Our Liquidity and Capital Resources 67
Return on Invested Capital 71
OUR CRITICAL  ACCOUNTING POLICIES  
Revenue Recognition 72
Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets 72
Income Tax Expense and Accruals 73
Pension and Retiree Medical Plans 75
Consolidated Statement of Income 78
Consolidated Statement of Compr ehensive Income 79
Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows 80
Consolidated Balance Sheet 81
Consolidated Statement of Equity 82
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements  
Note 1 – Basis of Presentation and Our Divisions 83
Note 2 – Our Significant Accounting Policies 86
Note 3 – Restructuring and Impairment Char ges 92
Note 4 – Property , Plant and Equipment and Intangible Assets 95
Note 5 – Income Taxes 98
Note 6 – Share-Based Compensation 102
Note 7 – Pension, Retiree Medical and Savings Plans 105
Note 8 – Debt Obligations 112
Note 9 – Financial Instruments 114
Note 10 – Net Income Attributable to PepsiCo per Common Share 119
Note 1 1 – Preferred Stock 119
Note 12 – Accumulated Other Comprehensive Loss Attributable to PepsiCo 120
Note 13 – Restricted Cash 122
Note 14 – Acquisitions and Divestitures 122
Note 15 – Supplemental Financial Information 124
Management’ s Responsibility for  Financial Reporting 126
Report of Independent Register ed Public Accounting Firm 128
GLOSSAR Y 130
43
Table of Contents
Our discussion and analysis is intended to help the reader understand our results of operations and financial
condition and is provided as an addition to, and should be read in connection with, our consolidated
financial statements and the accompanying notes. Definitions of key terms can be found in the glossary .
Tabular dollars are presented in millions, except per share amounts. All per share amounts reflect common
stock per share amounts, assume dilution unless otherwise noted, and are based on unrounded amounts.
Percentage changes ar e based on unr ounded amounts.
OUR BUSINESS
Executive Overview
We are a leading global food and beverage company with a complementary portfolio of brands, including
Frito-Lay , Gatorade,  Pepsi-Cola, Quaker and Tropicana. Through our operations , authorized bottlers, contract
manufacturers and other third parties, we make, market, distribute and sell a wide variety of convenient
beverages, foods and snacks, serving customers and consumers in more than 200 countries and territories.
At PepsiCo, we are focused on an approach called Winning with Purpose that will help make our company
faster , stronger and better at meeting the needs of our customers, consumers, partners and communities, while
caring for our planet and inspiring our associates.
Our strategies are designed to address key challenges facing our Company , including: shifting consumer
preferences and behaviors; a highly competitive operating environment; a rapid ly changing retail landscape,
including the growth in e-commerce; continued macroeconomic and political volatility; and an evolving
regulatory landscape.
We intend to focus on the following areas to address and adapt to these challenges:
•Winning in the marketplace and accelerating growth by strengthening and broadening our portfolio,
while focusing on locally meeting the needs of our consumers and customers;
•Continuing to implement our product ivity initiatives to improve our operational efficiency and
enhance our competitive advantage while continuing to transform our core capabilities with
technology and building and retaining a talented workforce to drive cost savings; and
•Continuing to lead with purpose by focusing on our impact on the planet and our people, assisting in
establishing a more sustainable food system, minimizing our impact on the environment, protecting
human rights and securing supply while positioning our Company for sustainable growth.
We believe these priorities will position our Company for long-term sustainable growth.
See also “Item 1A. Risk Factors” for additional information about risks and uncertainties that the Company
faces.
Our Operations
See “Item 1. Busin ess” for information on our divisions and a description of our distribution network,
ingredients and other supplies, brands and intellectual property rights, seasonality , customers and
competition. In addition, see Note 1 to our consolidated financial statements for financial information about
our divisions and geographic areas.
44
Table of Contents
Other  Relationships
Certain members of our Board of Directors also serve on the boards of certain vendors and customers. These
Board members do not participate in our vendor selection and negotiations nor in our customer negotiations.
Our transactions with these vendors and customers are in the normal course of business and are consistent
with terms negotiated with other vendors and customers. In addition, certain of our employees serve on the
boards of Pepsi Bottling Ventures LLC and other affiliated companies of PepsiCo and do not receive
incremental compensation for such services.
Our Business Risks
We are subject to risks in the normal course of business. During 2018  and 2017 , certain jurisdictions in which
our products are made, manufactured, distributed or sold operated in a challenging environment, experiencing
unstable economic, political and social conditions, civil unrest, natural disasters, debt and credit issues, and
currency fluctuations. We continue to monitor the economic, operating and political environment in these
markets closely and to identify actions to potentially mitigate any unfavorable impacts on our future results.
In addition, certain jurisdictions in which our products are made, manufactu red, distributed or sold have
either imposed, or are considering imposing, new or increased taxes or regulations on the manufacture,
distribution or sale of our products or their packaging, ingredients or substances contained in, or attributes of,
our produc ts or their packaging, commo dities used in the production of our products or their packaging or the
recyclability or recoverability of our packaging. These taxes and regulations vary in scope and form. For
example, some taxes apply to all beve rages, including non-caloric beverages, while others apply only to
beverages with a caloric sweetener (e.g., sugar). In addition, some regulation s apply to all products using
certain types of packaging (e.g., plastic) , while others are designed to increase the sustainability of packaging
and encourage waste reduction and increased recycling rates.
We sell a wide variety of beverages, foods and snacks in more than 200 countries  and territories and the
profile of the produc ts we sell, the amount of revenue attributable to such produ cts and the type of packaging
used varies by jurisdiction. Because of this, we cannot predict the scope or form potential taxes, regulations
or other limitations on our products or their packaging may take, and therefore cannot predict the impact of
such taxes, regulations or limitations on our financial results. In addition, taxes, regulations and limitations
may impact us and our competitors differently . We continue to monitor existing and proposed taxes and
regulations in the jurisdictions in which  our products are made, manufactured , distributed and sold and to
consider actions we may take to potentially mitigate the unfavorable impact, if any, of such taxes, regulations
or limitati ons, inclu ding advocating alternative measures with respect to the imposition, form and scope of
any such taxes, regulations or limitations.
In addition, our industry continues to be affected by disruption of the retail landscape, including the rapid
growth in sales through e-commerce websites and mobile commerce applications, including through
subscription services, the integration of physical and digital operations among retailers and the international
expansion of hard discounters. We continue to monitor changes in the retail landscape and to identify actions
we may take to build our global e-com merce capabilities, distribute our products effectively through all
existing and emer ging channels of trade and potentially mitigate any unfavorable impacts on our future
results.
During the fourth quarter of 2017, the TCJ Act was enacted in the United States. As a result of the enactment
of the TCJ Act, we recognized a provisional net tax expense of $2.5 billion in the fourth quarter of 2017. In
2018, we recognized a net tax benefit of $28 million  in connec tion with the TCJ Act. See further information
in “Items Affecting Comparability .” While our accounting for the recorded impact of the TCJ Act is deemed
to be complete, these amounts are based on prevailing regulations and currently available information, and
any additional guidance issued by the IRS could impact the aforementioned amounts in future periods.  For
45
Table of Contents
additional information, see “Our Liquidity and Capital Resources,” “Our Critical Accounting Policies” and
Note 5 to our consolidated financial statements.
See also “Item 1A. Risk Factors,” “Executive Overview” above and “Market Risks” below for more
information about these risks and the actions we have taken to address key challenges.
Risk Management Framework
The achie vement of our strategic and operating objectives involves taking risks and that those risks may
evolve over time. To identify , assess, prioritize, address, manage, monitor and communicate these risks across
the Company’ s operations, we leverage an integrated risk management framew ork. This framework includes
the following:
•PepsiCo’ s Board of Directors has oversight responsibility for PepsiCo’ s integra ted risk management
framework. One of the Board’ s primary responsibilities is overseeing and interacting with senior
management with respect to key aspect s of the Company’ s business, including risk assessment and
risk mitiga tion of the Company’ s top risks. The Board receives updates on key risks throughout the
year, including risks related to cybersecurity . In addition, the Board has tasked designated
Committees of the Board with overs ight of certain categories of risk management, and the
Committees report to the Board regularly on these matters.
◦The Audit Committee of the Board reviews and assesses the guidelines and policies
governing PepsiCo’ s risk management and oversight processes, and assists the Board’ s
oversight of financial, compliance and employee safety risks facing PepsiCo;
◦The Com pensation Committee of the Board reviews PepsiCo’ s employee compensation
policies and practices to assess whether such policies and practices could lead to unnecessary
risk-taking behavior;
◦The Nominating and Corporate Govern ance Committee assists the Board in its oversight of
the Comp any’s governance structure and other corporate governance matters, including
succession planning; and
◦The Public Policy and Sustainability Committee of the Board assists the Board in its
oversight of PepsiCo’ s policies, program s and related risks that concern key public policy and
sustainability matters.
•The Pepsi Co Risk Committee (PRC), which is comprised of a cross-functional, geographically
diverse, senior mana gement group, including PepsiCo’ s Chairman of the Board  and Chief Executive
Officer, meets regul arly to identify , assess, prioritize and address top strategic,  financial, operating,
compliance, safety , reputational and other risks. The PRC is also responsible for reporting progress
on our risk mitigation ef forts to the Board;
•Division and key country risk committees, comprised of cross-functional senio r management teams,
meet regularly to identify , assess, prioritize and address division and country-specific business risks;
•PepsiCo’ s Risk Management Office, which manages the overall risk management process, provides
ongoing guidance, tools and analytical support to the PRC and the division and key country risk
committees, identifi es and assesses potential risks and facilitates ongoing communication between
the parties, as well as with PepsiCo’ s Board of Directors and the Audit Committee of the Board;
•PepsiCo’ s Corporate Audit Departmen t evaluates the ongoing effectiveness of our key internal
controls through periodic audit and review procedures; and
•PepsiCo’ s Compliance & Ethics and Law Departments lead and coordinate our compliance policies
and practices.
46
Table of Contents
Market Risks
We are exposed to market risks arising from adverse changes in:
•commodity prices, af fecting the cost of our raw materials and ener gy;
•foreign exchange rates and currency restrictions; and
•interest rates.
In the normal course of business, we manage commodity price, foreign exchange and interest rate risks
through a variety of strategies, including productivity initiatives, global purch asing programs and hedging.
Ongoing productivity initiatives involve  the identification and effective implementation of meaningful cost-
saving opportunities or efficiencies, including the use of derivatives. Our global purchasing programs include
fixed-price contracts and purchase orders and pricing agreements. See “Item 1A. Risk Factors” for further
discussion of our market risks, and see “Our Liquidity and Capital Resources” for further information on our
non-cancelable purchasing commitments.
The fair value of our derivatives fluctuates based on market rates and prices. The sensitivity of our
derivatives to these market fluctuations is discussed below . See Note 9 to our consolidated financial
statements for further discussion of these derivatives and our hedging policies. See “Our Critical Accounting
Policies” for a discussion of the exposure of our pension and retiree medical plan assets and liabilities to risks
related to market fluctuations.
Inflationary , deflatio nary and recessionary conditions impacting these market risks also impact the demand
for and pricing of our products. See “Item 1A. Risk Factors” for further discussion.
Commodity Prices
Our commodity derivatives had a total notional value of $1.1 billion  as of December 29, 2018  and $0.9
billion  as of December 30, 2017 . At the end of 2018 , the potential chan ge in fair value of commodity
derivative instruments, assuming a 10% decrease in the underlying commodity  price, would have increased
our net unrealized losses in 2018  by $100 million .
Foreign Exchange
Our operations outside of the United States generated 43% of our consolidated net revenue in 2018 , with
Mexico, Russia, Canada, the United Kingdom and Brazil  comprisin g approximately 20% of our consolidated
net revenue in 2018 . As a result, we are exposed to foreign exchange risks in the international markets in
which our products are made, manufactured, distributed or sold. During 2018 , unfavorable foreign exchange
reduced net revenue  growth by one percentage point due to declines in the Russian ruble, Turkish lira and
Brazilian real. Currency declines against the U.S. dollar which are not offset could adversely impact our
future financial results.
In addition, volatile economic, political and social conditions and civil unrest in certain markets in which our
products are made, manufactured, distributed or sold, including in Argentina, Brazil, China, India, Mexico,
the Middl e East, Russia and Turkey , and currency fluctuations in certain of these international markets
continue to result in challenging operating environments. We also continue to monitor the economic and
political developments related to the United Kingdom’ s pending withdrawal from the European Union,
including how the United Kingdom will interact with other European Union countries following its departure,
as well as the econo mic, operating and political environment in Russia, and the potential impact for the ESSA
segment and our other businesses.
Our foreign currency derivatives had a total notional value of $2.0 billion  as of December 29, 2018  and $1.6
billion as of December 30, 2017 . The total notional amount of our debt instruments designated as net
47
Table of Contents
investment hedges was $0.9 billio n as of December 29, 2018  and $1.5 billio n as of December 30, 2017 . At
the end of 2018 , we estim ate that an unfavorable 10% change in the underlying exchange rates would have
decreased our net unrealized gains in 2018 by $149 million .
Inter est Rates
Our interest rate derivatives had a total notional value of $10.5 billion  as of December 29, 2018  and $14.2
billion  as of December 30, 2017 . Assuming year-end 2018  investment levels and variable rate debt, a 1-
percentage-point increase in interest rates would have increased our net interest expense in 2018  by $7
million  due to lower cash and cash equivalents and short-term investments levels as compared with our
variable rate debt.
48
Table of Contents
OUR FINANCIAL  RESUL TS
Results of Operations — Consolidated Review
In the discussions of net revenue and operating profit below , “effective net pricing” reflects the year-over -
year impact of discrete pricing actions , sales incentive activities and mix resulting from selling varying
products in different package sizes and in different countries, and “net pricing” reflects the year-over -year
combined impact of list price changes, weight changes per package, discounts and allowances. Additionally ,
“acquisitions and divestitures,” except as otherwise noted, reflect all mergers and acquisitions activity ,
including the impact of acquisitions, divestitures and changes in ownership or control in consolidated
subsidiaries and nonconsolidated equity investees.
Volume
Our bever age volume in the NAB, Latin America, ESSA  and AMENA  segments reflects sales to authorized
bottlers, independen t distributors and retailers, as well as the sale of beverages bearing Company-owned or
licensed trademarks that have been sold through our authorized independent bottlers. Bottler case sales (BCS)
and concentrate shipments and equivale nts (CSE) are not necessarily equal during any given period due to
seasonality , timing of product launches, product mix, bottler inventory practices and other factors. While our
beverage revenues are not entirely based on BCS volume, as there are independent bottlers in the supply
chain, we believe that BCS is a valuable measure as it quantifies the sell-throug h of our beverage products at
the consum er level. Sales of products from our unconsolidated joint ventures are reflected in our reported
volume. NAB, Latin America, ESSA  and AMENA, either independently or in conjunction with third parties,
make, market, distribute and sell ready-t o-drink tea products through a joint venture with Unilever (under the
Lipton brand name), and NAB, either independently or in conjunction with third parties, makes, markets,
distributes and sells ready-to-drink coffee products through a joint venture with Starbucks. In addition,
AMENA  licenses the Tropicana brand for use in China on co-branded juice products in connection with a
strategic alliance with Tingyi.
Our food and snack volume in the FLNA, QFNA, Latin America, ESSA  and AMENA  segments is reported
on a system-wide basis, which includes our own sales and the sales by our noncontrolled affiliates of snacks
bearing Company-owned or licensed trademarks.
Servings
Since our divisions each use different measures of physical unit volume (i.e., kilos, gallons, pounds and case
sales), a common servings metric is necessary to reflect our consolidated  physical unit volume. Our
divisions’  physical volume measures are converted into servings based  on U.S. Food and Drug
Administration guidelines for single-serving sizes of our products.
In 2018 , total servings increased 1% compared to 2017 . In 2017 , total servings decreased 1% compared to
2016 . Excludin g the impact of the 53rd reporting week in 2016, total servings in 2017 was even with the prior
year. Servings growth reflects adjustments to the prior year results for divestitures and other structural
changes.
49
Table of Contents
Consolidated Net Revenue and Operating Profit
    Change
 2018 2017 2016 2018  2017
Net revenue $64,661 $ 63,525 $62,799 2 % 1%
Operating profit (a)$ 10,110 $ 10,276 $ 9,804 (2)% 5%
Operating profit margin (a)15.6% 16.2% 15.6% (0.5) 0.6
(a)In 2017 and 2016, operating profit and operating profit margin reflect the retrospective adoption of guidance requiring the
presentation of non-service cost components of net periodic benefit cost below operating profit. See Note 2 to our consolidated
financial statements.
See “Resu lts of Operations – Division Review” for a tabular presentation and discussion of key drivers of net
revenue.
2018
Operating profit decreased 2% and operating profit margin declined 0.5 percentage points. The operating
profit performance was driven by certain operating cost increases and a 6-percentage-point impact of higher
commodity costs, partially of fset by productivity savings of more than $1 billion and net revenue growth.
The impact of refra nchising a portion of our beverage business in Jordan in 2017 and a prior -year gain
associated with the sale of our minority stake in Britvic negatively impacted operating profit performance by
2.5 percentage points. These impacts were offset by a 2-percentage-point positive impact of refranchising a
portion of our beverage business in Thailand and our entire beverage bottling operations and snack
distribution operations in CHS in 2018. Items affecting comparability (see “Items Affecting Comparability”)
negatively impacted operating profit performance by 3 percentage points and decreased operating profit
margin by 0.5 percentage points, primarily due to higher mark-to-market net impact on commodity
derivatives included in corporate unallocated expenses.
2017
Operating profit increased 5% and operating profit margin improved 0.6 percen tage points. Operating profit
growth was driven by productivity savings of more than $1 billion and effective net pricing, partially offset
by certain operating cost increases, a 7-percentage-point impact of higher commodity costs and unfavorable
foreign exchange.
The impact of refran chising a portion of our beverage business in Jordan and a gain associated with the sale
of our minority stake in Britvic each contributed 1 percentage point to operating profit growth. Items
affecting comparab ility (see “Items Affecting Comparability”) also contributed 2 percentage points to
operating profit growth and increased operating profit margin by 0.2 percentage points, primarily reflecting a
prior -year impairme nt charge to reduce the value of our 5% indirect equity interest in KSFB to its estimated
fair value.
50
Table of Contents
Other Consolidated Results  
   Change
 2018 2017 2016 2018  2017
Other pension and retiree medical benefits
income/(expense) (a)$ 298 $ 233 $ (19)$ 65  $ 252
Net interest expense $ (1,219) $(907)$(1,232)$(312) $ 325
Annual tax rate (b)(36.7)% 48.9% 25.4%   
Net income attributable to PepsiCo $12,515 $4,857 $6,329 158% (23)%
Net income attributable to PepsiCo per common
share – diluted $ 8.78 $ 3.38 $ 4.36 160% (23)%
Mark-to-market net impact 0.09 (0.01) (0.08)   
Restructuring and impairment charges 0.18 0.16 0.09   
Merger and integration charges 0.05 — —   
Net tax (benefit)/expense related to the TCJ Act (b)(0.02) 1.70 —   
Other net tax benefits (b)(3.55) — —   
Charges related to cash tender and exchange
offers 0.13 — —   
Charge related to the transaction with Tingyi — — 0.26   
Charge related to debt redemption — — 0.11   
Pension-related settlement charge — — 0.11   
Net income attributable to PepsiCo per common
 
  share – diluted, excluding above items (c) $ 5.66 $ 5.23 $ 4.85 8% 8 %
Impact of foreign exchange translation 1  1
Growth in net income attributable to PepsiCo per
  common share – diluted, excluding above items,
on  
 
  a constant currency basis (c) 9% 9 %
(a)In 2017 and 2016, reflect the retrospective adoption of guidance requiring the presentation of non-service cost components of
net periodic benefit cost below operating profit. See Note 2 to our consolidated financial statements.
(b)See Note 5 to our consolidated financial statements.
(c)See “Non-GAAP Measures.”
2018
Other pension and retiree medical benefits income increased $65 million , reflecting the impact of the $1.4
billion discretionary  pension contribution to the PepsiCo Employees Retirem ent Plan A (Plan A) in the
United States, as well as the recognitio n of net asset gains, partially offset by higher amortization of net
losses.
Net interest expense increased $312 million reflecting a charge of $253 million in connection with our cash
tender and exchange offers, primarily representing the tender price paid over the carrying value of the
tendered notes. This increase also reflects higher interest rates on debt balances, as well as losses on the
market value of investments used to economically hedge a portion of our deferred compensation liability .
These impacts were partially of fset by higher interest income due to higher interest rates on cash balances.
The reported tax rate decreased 85.6 percentage points, reflecting both other net tax benefits related to the
reorganization of our international operations, which reduced the reported tax rate by 45 percentage points,
and the prior year provisional net tax expense related to the TCJ Act, which reduced the current year reported
tax rate by 25 percentage points. Additionally , the favorable conclusion of certa in international tax audits and
the favora ble resolution with the IRS of all open matters related to the audits of taxable years 2012 and 2013,
collectively , reduced the reported tax rate by 7 percentage points.  See Note 5 to our consolidated financial
statements for further information.
51
Table of Contents
Net incom e attribut able to PepsiCo increased 158%  and net income attributable to PepsiCo per common
share increased 160% . Items affecting comparability (see “Items Affecting Comparability”) positively
contributed 150 percentag e points to net income attributable to PepsiCo growth and 152 percentag e points to
net income attributable to PepsiCo per common share growth.
2017
Other pension and retiree medical bene fits income increased $252 milli on, primarily  reflecting  a settlement
charge of $242 million related to the purchase of a group annuity contract in 2016.
Net interest expense decreased $325 million  reflecting a charge of $233 million in 2016 representing the
premium paid in accordance with the “make-whole” redemption provisions to redeem all of our outstanding
7.900% senior notes due 2018 and 5.125% senior notes due 2019 for the principal amounts of $1.5 billion
and $750 million, respectively . This decrease also reflects higher interest income due to higher interest rates
and average cash balances, as well as gains on the market value of investments used to economically hedge a
portion of our deferred compensation liability . These impacts were partially offset by higher interest expense
due to higher average debt balances.
The reported tax rate increased 23.5 percentage points primarily as a result of the provisional net tax expense
related to the TCJ Act, which contributed 26 percentage points to the increase, partially offset by the impact
of the 2016 impairment charge to reduce the value of our 5% indirect equity interest in KSFB to its estimated
fair value, which had no corresponding tax benefit, as well as the impact of recognizing excess tax benefits in
the provision for income taxes as a result of the changes in accounting for certain aspects of share-based
payments to employees in 2017. See Note 2 and Note 5 to our consolidated financial statements for additional
information.
Net income attributable to PepsiCo and net income attributable to PepsiCo per common share both decreased
23%. Items affecting comparability (see “Items Affecting Comparability”) negatively impacted both net
income attributable to PepsiCo performance and net income attributable to PepsiCo per common share
performance by 30 percentage points, primarily as a result of the provisional net tax expense related to the
TCJ Act.
Non-GAAP  Measur es
Certain financial measures contained in this Form 10-K adjust for the impact of specified items and are not in
accordance with U.S. Generally Accep ted Accounting Principles (GAAP). We use non-GAAP  financial
measures internally  to make operating and strategic decisions, including the preparation of our annual
operating plan, evaluation of our overal l business performance and as a factor in determining compensation
for certain employees. We believe presenting non-GAAP  financial measures in this Form 10-K provides
additional information to facilitate comparison of our historical operating results  and trends in our underlying
operating results, and provides addition al transparency on how we evaluate our business. We also believe
presenting these measures in this Form 10-K allows investors to view our performance using the same
measures that we use in evaluating our financial and business performance and trends.
We consider quantitative and qualitative factors in assessing whether to adjust for the impact of items that
may be significant or that could affect an understanding of our ongoing financial and business performance or
trends. Examples of items for which we may make adjustments include: amounts related to mark-to-market
gains or losses (non-cash); charges related to restructuring programs; charges or adjustments related to the
enactment of new laws, rules or regulations, such as significant tax law changes; amounts related to the
resolution of tax positions; tax benefits related to reorganizations of our operatio ns; gains or losses associated
with mergers, acquisitions, divestitures and other structural changes; debt redemptions, cash tender or
exchange of fers; pension and retiree medical related items; asset impairments (non-cash); and
52
Table of Contents
remeasurements of net monetary assets.  See below and “Items Affecting Comparability” for a description of
adjustments to our U.S. GAAP  financial measures in this Form 10-K. 
Non-GAAP  information should be considered as supplemental in nature and is not meant to be considered in
isolation or as a substitute for the related financial information prepared in accordance with U.S. GAAP . In
addition, our non-GAAP  financial measures may not be the same as or comparable to similar non-GAAP
measures presented by other companies.
The following non-GAAP  financial measures are contained in this Form 10-K:
•cost of sales, gross profit, selling, general and administrative expenses, other pension and retiree
medical benefits income/expense, interest expense, benefit from/provision for income taxes and
noncontrolling interests, each adjusted for items af fecting comparability;
•operating profit, adjusted for items affecting comparability , and net income attributable to PepsiCo
per common share – diluted, adjusted for items affecting comparability , and the corresponding
constant currency growth rates;
•organic revenue growth;
•free cash flow; and
•return on invested capital (ROIC) and net ROIC, excluding items af fecting comparability .
Cost of Sales, Gross Profit, Selling, General and Administrative Expenses, Other Pension and Retir ee
Medical Benefits Income/Expense, Interest Expense, Benefit from/Pr ovision for Income Taxes, Annual Tax
Rate and Noncontr olling Inter ests, Adjusted for Items Affecting Comparability; Operating Profit, Adjusted for
Items Affecting Comparability , and Net Income Attributable to PepsiCo per Common Share – Diluted,
Adjusted for Items Affecting Comparability , and the Corr esponding Constant Curr ency Gr owth Rates
These measures exclude the net impact of mark-to-market gains and losses on centrally managed commodity
derivatives that do not qualify for hedge accounting, restructuring and impairme nt charges related to our 2019
and 2014 Productivity Plans, merger and integration charges associated with our acquisition of SodaStream,
net tax benefit/expense associated with the enactment of the TCJ Act, other net tax benefits, charges related to
cash tende r and exchange offers, a charge related to the transaction with Tingyi, a charge related to debt
redemption, and a pension-related settlement charge (see “Items Affecting Comparability” for a detailed
description of each of these items). We also evaluate performance on operati ng profit, adjusted for items
affecting comparabi lity, and net incom e attributable to PepsiCo per common share – diluted, adjusted for
items affecting comparability , on a constant currency basis, which measure our financial results assuming
constant foreign currency exchange rates used for translation based on the rates in effect for the comparable
prior -year period. In order to compute our constant currency results, we multi ply or divide, as appropriate,
our current year U.S. dollar results by the current year average foreign exchan ge rates and then multiply or
divide, as appropria te, those amounts by the prior -year average foreign exchange rates. We believe these
measures provide useful information in evaluating the results of our business because they exclude items that
we believe are not indicative of our ongo ing performance. We are not able to reconcile our full year projected
2019  annual tax rate, excluding items affecting comparability , to our full year projected 2019  reported annual
tax rate because we are unable to predict the 2019  impact of foreign exchange or the mark-to-market net
impact on commodity derivatives due to the unpredictability of future changes in foreign exchange rates and
commodity prices. Therefore, we are unable to provide a reconciliation of this measure.
Organic Revenue Gr owth
We define organic revenue growth as net revenue growth adjusted for the impact of foreign exchange
translation, as well as the impact from acquisitions, divestitures and other structural changes. Our 2018
reported results reflect the accounting policy election taken in conjunction with the adoption of the revenue
53
Table of Contents
recognition guidance to exclude from net revenue and cost of sales all sales, use, value-added and certain
excise taxes assessed by governmental authorities on revenue-producing transactions not already excluded.
Our 2018 organic revenue growth exclud es the impact of approximately $75 million of these taxes previously
recognized in net revenue. In addition, our fiscal 2016 reported results included an extra week of results. Our
2017 or ganic revenue growth excludes the impact of the 53rd reporting week from our 2016 results.
We believe organic revenue provides useful information in evaluating the results of our business because it
excludes items that we believe are not indicative of ongoing performance or that we believe impact
comparability with the prior year .
See “Net Revenue and Or ganic Revenue Growth” in “Results of Operations – Division Review .”
Free Cash Flow
We define free cash flow as net cash provided by operating activities less capital spending, plus sales of
property , plant and equipment. Since net capital spending is essential to our product innovation initiatives and
maintaining our operational capabilities , we believe that it is a recurring and necessary use of cash. As such,
we believe investors should also consider net capital spending when evaluating our cash from operating
activities. Free cash flow is used by us primarily for financing activities,  including debt repayments,
dividends and share repurchases. Free cash flow is not a measure of cash available for discretionary
expenditures since we have certain non-discretionary obligations such as debt service that are not deducted
from the measure.
See “Free Cash Flow” in “Our Liquidity and Capital Resources.”
ROIC and Net ROIC, Excluding Items Affecting Comparability
We define ROIC as net income attributable to PepsiCo plus interest expense after-tax divided by the sum of
quarterly average debt obligations and quarterly average common shareholders’  equity . Although ROIC is a
common financial metric, numerous methods exist for calculating ROIC. Accordingly , the method used by
management to calculate ROIC may dif fer from the methods other companies use to calculate their ROIC.
We believe this metric serves as a measure of how well we use our capital to generate returns. In addition, we
use net ROIC, excluding items affecting comparability , to compare our performance over various reporting
periods on a consistent basis because it removes from our operating results the impact of items that are not
indicative of our ongoing performance and reflects how management evaluates our operating results and
trends. We define net ROIC, excluding items affecting comparability , as ROIC, adjusted for quarterly average
cash, cash equivalents and short-term investments, after-tax interest income and items affecting
comparability . We believe the calculation of ROIC and net ROIC, excluding items affecting
comparability , provides useful informa tion to investors and is an additional relevant comparison of our
performance to consider when evaluating our capital allocation ef ficiency .
See “Return on Invested Capital” in “Our Liquidity and Capital Resources.”
54
Table of Contents
Items Affecting Comparability
Our reported financial results in this Form 10-K are impacted by the following items in each of the following
years:  
 2018
 Cost of
sales Gross
profitSelling, general
and
administrative
expenses  Operating
profit Other
pension and
retiree
medical
benefits
income Interest
expense (Benefit
from)/provision
for income
taxes(a)Net income
attributable to
noncontrolling
interests  Net income
attributable
to PepsiCo
Reported, GAAP
Measure $29,381 $35,280$ 25,170 $ 10,110 $ 298 $1,525 $ (3,370)$ 44 $ 12,515
Items Affecting
Comparability            
Mark-to-
market net
impact (83) 83 (80) 163 — — 38 — 125
Restructuring
and
impairment
charges (3) 3 (269) 272 36 — 56 1 251
Merger and
integration
charges — — (75) 75 — — — — 75
Net tax benefit
related to
the TCJ Act — — — — — — 28 — (28)
Other net tax
benefits — — — — — — 5,064 — (5,064)
Charges
related to
cash tender
and
exchange
offers — — — — — (253) 62 — 191
Core, Non-GAAP
Measure $29,295 $35,366$ 24,746 $ 10,620 $ 334 $1,272 $ 1,878 $ 45 $ 8,065
 2017(b)
 Cost of sales Gross profit Selling, general
and
administrative
expenses Operating
profit Other
pension and
retiree
medical
benefits
income Provision for
income taxes(a) Net income
attributable to
PepsiCo
Reported, GAAP Measure$ 28,796 $ 34,729 $ 24,453 $10,276 $ 233 $ 4,694 $ 4,857
Items Affecting Comparability        
Mark-to-market net impact8 (8) 7 (15) — (7) (8)
Restructuring and impairment charges— — (229) 229 66 71 224
Provisional net tax expense related to the
TCJ Act — — — — — (2,451) 2,451
Core, Non-GAAP Measure$ 28,804 $ 34,721 $ 24,231 $10,490 $ 299 $ 2,307 $ 7,524
55
Table of Contents
 2016(b)
 Cost of
sales Gross
profitSelling, general
and
administrative
expenses  Operating
profitOther pension
and retiree
medical benefits
(expense)/incomeInterest
expense Provision
for income
taxes(a) Net income
attributable to
noncontrolling
interestsNet income
attributable
to PepsiCo
Reported, GAAP
Measure $28,222 $34,577 $ 24,773 $ 9,804 $ (19) $1,342 $ 2,174 $ 50 $ 6,329
Items Affecting
Comparability         
Mark-to-market
net impact 78 (78) 89 (167) — — (56) — (111)
Restructuring and
impairment
charges — — (155) 155 5 — 26 3 131
Charge related to
the transaction
with Tingyi — — (373) 373 — — — — 373
Charge related to
debt
redemption — — — — — (233) 77 — 156
Pension-related
settlement
charge — — — — 242 — 80 — 162
Core, Non-GAAP
Measure $28,300 $34,499 $ 24,334 $ 10,165 $ 228 $1,109 $ 2,301 $ 53 $ 7,040
(a)Benefit from/provision for income taxes is the expected tax benefit/charge on the underlying item based on the tax laws and income tax rates applicable to the
underlying item in its corresponding tax jurisdiction and tax year.
(b)Reflects the retrospective adoption of guidance requiring the presentation of non-service cost components of net periodic benefit cost below operating profit.
See Note 2 to our consolidated financial statements.
Mark-to-Market Net Impact
We centrally manage commodity derivatives on behalf of our divisions. These commodity derivatives include
energy, agricultural products and metal s. Commodity derivatives that do not qualify for hedge accounting
treatment are marked to market each period with the resulting gains and losses recorded in corporate
unallocated expense s as either cost of sales or selling, general and administrativ e expenses, depending on the
underlying commod ity. These gains and losses are subsequently reflected in division results when the
divisions recognize the cost of the unde rlying commodity in operating profit. Therefore, the divisions realize
the econom ic effects of the derivative without experiencing any resulting mark-to-market volatility , which
remains in corporate unallocated expenses.
Restructuring and Impairment Charges
2019 Multi-Y ear Pr oductivity Plan
Our 2019 Productiv ity Plan, publicly announced on February 15, 2019, will leverage new technology and
business models to further simplify , harmonize and automate processes; re-engineer our go-to-market and
information systems , including deploying the right automation for each market; simplify our organization and
optimize our manufacturing and supply chain footprint. In connection with this program, we expect to incur
pre-tax charges of approximately $2.5 billion, of which $138 million is included in our 2018 results,
approximately $800 million is expected to be reflected in our 2019 results and the balance to be reflected in
our 2020 through 2023 results. These pre-tax charges will consist of approximately 70% of severance and
other employee-related costs, 15% for asset impairments (all non-cash) resulting from plant closures and
related actions, and 15% for other costs associated with the implementation of our initiatives. We expect that
these pre-tax charges will result in cash expenditures of approximately $1.6 billion, of which we expect
approximately $450  million to be reflected in our 2019 cash flows and the balance to be reflected in our 2020
through 2023 cash flows. We expect to incur the majority of the pre-tax charges and cash expenditures in our
2019 and 2020 results.
56
Table of Contents
The total expected program pre-tax char ges are expected to be incurred by division approximately as follows:
 FLNA QFNA NABLatin
America ESSA AMENA Corporate
Expected pre-tax charges 10% 3% 35% 12% 25% 13% 2%
2014 Multi-Y ear Pr oductivity Plan
To build on the successful implementa tion of the 2014 Productivity Plan, we expanded and extended the
program through the end of 2019 to take advantage of additional opportunities within the initiatives of the
2014 Productivity Plan to further strengthen our beverage, food and snack businesses. In connection with this
program, we expect to incur pre-tax charges and cash expenditures of approximately $1.3 billion and $960
million, respectively . This total pre-tax charge is expected to consist of approximately 55% of severance and
other employee-related costs, 15% for asset impairments (all non-cash) resulting from plant closures and
related actions, and 30% for other costs associated with the implementation of our initiatives. To date, we
have incurred $1.2 billion of pre-tax charges and $814 million of cash expenditures. We expect to complete
the program and incur the program’ s remaining pre-tax char ges and cash expenditures before the end of 2019.
The total expected program pre-tax char ges are expected to be incurred by division approximately as follows:
 FLNA QFNA NABLatin
America ESSA AMENA Corporate
Expected pre-tax charges 14% 3% 30% 15% 20% 6% 12%
See Note 3 to our consolidated financial statements for further information related to our 2019 and 2014
Productivity Plans.
We regularly evaluate productivity initiatives beyond the productivity plans and other initiatives discussed
above and in Note 3 to our consolidated financial statements.
Merger and Integration Charges
In 2018, we incurred merger and integration charges of $75 million ($0.05 per share) related to our
acquisition of SodaStream, including $57 million recorded in the ESSA  segment and $18 million recorded in
corporate unallocate d expenses. These charges include closing costs, advisory fees and emplo yee-related
costs .
See Note 14 to our consolidated financial statements.
Net T ax (Benefit)/Expense Related to the TCJ Act
During the fourth quarter of 2017, the TCJ Act was enacted in the United States . Among its many provisions,
the TCJ Act imposed a mandatory one-t ime transition tax on undistributed intern ational earnings and reduced
the U.S. corporate income tax rate from 35% to 21%, ef fective January 1, 2018. 
In 2017, we recorded a provisional net tax expense of $2.5 billion ($1.70 per share) associated with the
enactment of the TCJ Act. Included in the provisional net tax expense of $2.5 billion was a provisional
mandatory one-time transition tax of approximately $4 billion on undistrib uted international earnings,
included in other liabilities. This mandatory one-time transition tax was partially offset by a provisional $1.5
billion benefit resulting from the required remeasurement of our deferred tax assets and liabilities to the new,
lower U.S. corporate income tax rate.
In 2018, we recorded a net tax benefit of $28 million ($0.02 per share) in connection with the TCJ Act.
See Note 5 to our consolidated financial statements.
57
Table of Contents
Other Net T ax Benefits
In 2018, we reorganized our international operations, including the interc ompany transfer of certain
intangible assets. As a result, we recognized other net tax benefits of $4.3 billion ($3.05 per share). Also in
2018, we recognize d non-cash tax benefits associated with both the conclusion of certain international tax
audits and our agree ment with the IRS resolving all open matters related to the audits of taxable years 2012
and 2013. The conc lusion of certain international tax audits and the resolution with the IRS resulted in non-
cash tax benefits of $364 million ($0.26 per share) and $353 million ($0.24 per share), respectively .
See Note 5 to our consolidated financial statements.
Charges Related to Cash T ender and Exchange Of fers
In 2018, we recorde d a pre-tax charge of $253 milli on ($191 million after-tax or $0.13 per share) to interest
expense in connectio n with our cash tender and exchange offers, primarily representing the tender price paid
over the carrying value of the tendered notes.
See Note 8 to our consolidated financial statements.
Charge Related to the T ransaction with T ingyi
In 2016, we record ed a pre- and after-tax impairment charge of $373 million ($0.26 per share) in the
AMENA  segment to reduce the value of our 5% indirect equity interest in KSFB to its estimated fair valu e. 
See Note 9 to our consolidated financial statements.
Charge Related to Debt Redemption
In 2016, we paid $2.5 billion to redeem  all of our outstanding 7.900% senior notes due 2018 and 5.125%
senior notes due 2019 for the principal amounts of $1.5 billion and $750 million, respectively , and terminated
certain interest rate swaps. As a result, we recorded a pre-tax charge of $233 million ($156 million after-tax
or $0.11 per share) to interest expense, primarily representing the premium paid in accordance with the
“make-whole” redemption provisions.
See Note 8 to our consolidated financial statements.
Pension-Related Settlement Charge
In 2016, we recorde d a pre-tax pension settlement charge in corporate unalloca ted expenses of $242 million
($162 million after -tax or $0.1 1 per share) related to the purchase of a group annuity contract.
See Note 7 to our consolidated financial statements.
58
Table of Contents
Results of Operations — Division Review
The results and discussions below are based on how our Chief Executive Officer monitors the performance of
our divisions. See “Non-GAAP  Measures” and “Items Affecting Comparability” for a discussion of items to
consider when evaluating our results and related information regarding non-GAAP  measures.  
Net Revenue and Organic Revenue Growth
Organic revenue growth is a non-GAAP  financial measure. For further information on organic revenue
growth, see “Non-GAAP  Measures.”
 2018
  Impact of    Impact of
 Net revenue
growthForeign
exchange
translationAcquisitions
and
divestitures Sales and
certain
other taxes Organic
revenue
growth(a) Volume(b) Effective net
pricing(c)
FLNA 3.5 % — — — 3 % 1 2
QFNA (1.5)% — — — (2)% (0.5) (1)
NAB 1 % — — — 0.5 % (1) 2
Latin America 2 % 6 — — 8 % 1 7
ESSA 4 % 2 — 0.5 7 % 4 3
AMENA (2)% 1 8 — 7 % 3 3
Total 2 % 1 1 — 4 % 1 3
 2017
  Impact of  Impact of
 Net revenue
growth  Foreign
exchange
translationAcquisitions
and
divestitures53rd
reporting
week(d)Organic
revenue
growth(a)Volume(b) Effective net
pricing(c)
FLNA 2 % — — 2 3 % 1 2.5
QFNA (2)% — — 2 (1)% — (1)
NAB (2)% — (1) 1 (2)% (2.5) 1
Latin America 6 % (1) 0.5 — 5 % (2) 7
ESSA 8 % (3) — — 6 % 3 2
AMENA (5)% 10 — — 5 % — 5
Total 1 % — — 1 2 % — 3
(a) Amounts may not sum due to rounding.
(b) Excludes the impact of acquisitions and divestitures. In certain instances, volume growth varies from the amounts disclosed in the following
divisional discussions due to nonconsolidated joint venture volume, and, for our beverage businesses, temporary timing differences between
BCS and CSE, as well as the mix of beverage volume sold by our Company-owned and franchise-owned bottlers. Our net revenue excludes
nonconsolidated joint venture volume, and, for our franchise-owned beverage businesses, is based on CSE.
(c) Includes the year-over -year impact of discrete pricin g actions, sales incentive activities and mix resulting from selling varying products in
different package sizes and in dif ferent countries.
(d) Our fiscal 2016 results included a 53rd reporting week which increased 2016 net revenue by $657 million, includi ng $294 million in our
FLNA  segment, $43 million in our QFNA  segment,  $300 million in our NAB segment and $20 million  in our ESSA  segment.  Our 2017
organic revenue growth excludes the impact of the 53rd reporting week from our 2016 results.
59
Table of Contents
Frito-Lay North America
      % Change
 2018 2017(a) 2016(a) 2018  2017
Net revenue $16,346 $15,798  $15,549  3.5  2
Impact of foreign exchange translation     —  —
Impact of acquisitions and divestitures     — —
Impact of 53rd reporting week     — 2
Organic revenue growth (b)    3(d) 3(d) 
       
Operating profit $5,008 $4,793  $4,612  4.5  4  
Restructuring and impairment char ges (c) 36 54 12   
Operating profit excluding above item (b) $5,044 $4,847  $4,624  4 5  
Impact of foreign exchange translation     — —  
Operating profit growth excluding above item,
on a constant currency basis (b)    4 5
(a)In 2017 and 2016, operating profit and restructuring and impairment charges reflect the retrospective adoption of guidance
requiring the presentation of non-service cost components of net periodic benefit cost below operating profit. See Note 2 to our
consolidated financial statements.
(b)See “Non-GAAP Measures.”
(c)See “Items Affecting Comparability.”
(d)Does not sum due to rounding.
2018
Net revenue grew 3.5%, primarily reflecting effective net pricing and volum e growth. Volume grew 1%,
reflecting mid-single-digit growth in variety packs and low-single-digit growth in trademark Doritos,
partially of fset by a double-digit decline in Santitas.
Operating profit grew 4.5%, primarily reflecting the net revenue growth and productivity savings, partially
offset by certain operating cost increases and a 1-percentage-point impact of a bonus extended to certain U.S.
employees in connection with the TCJ Act.
2017
Net revenue grew 2%, primarily reflecting effective net pricing, partially offset by the impact of the 53rd
reporting week in 2016, which reduced net revenue growth by 2 percentage points. Volume declined 1%,
reflecting mid-single -digit declines in trademark Lay’s and Fritos and a low-single-digit decline in trademark
Doritos, partially offset by high-single-digit growth in variety packs. The 53rd reporting week in 2016
negatively impacted volume performance by 2 percentage points.
Operating profit grew 4%, primarily reflecting productivity savings, the effective net pricing and a 1-
percentage-point impact of 2016 increm ental investments into our business. These impacts were partially
offset by certain operating cost increases, including strategic initiatives, and a 1-percentage-point impact of
higher commodity costs, primarily cooking oil. The 53rd reporting  week in 2016 reduced opera ting profit
growth by 2 percentage points.
60
Table of Contents
Quaker  Foods North America
      % Change
 2018  2017(a) 2016(a)2018  2017
Net revenue $2,465  $2,503  $2,564 (1.5)  (2)
Impact of foreign exchange translation   — —
Impact of acquisitions and divestitures   — —
Impact of 53rd reporting week   — 2
Organic revenue growth (b)  (2)(d) (1)(d) 
   
Operating profit $ 637  $ 640  $ 649 —  (1)
Restructuring and impairment char ges (c) 7 9 1
Operating profit excluding above item (b) $ 644  $ 649  $ 650 (1)  —
Impact of foreign exchange translation   — —
Operating profit growth excluding above item,
on a constant currency basis (b)  (1) —
(a)In 2017 and 2016, operating profit and restructuring and impairment charges reflect the retrospective adoption of guidance
requiring the presentation of non-service cost components of net periodic benefit cost below operating profit. See Note 2 to our
consolidated financial statements.
(b)See “Non-GAAP Measures.”
(c)See “Items Affecting Comparability.”
(d)Does not sum due to rounding.
2018
Net revenue declined 1.5% and volume declined 0.5%. The net revenue performance reflects unfavorable net
pricing and mix and the volume decline. The volume decline was driven by a double-digit decline in
trademark Gamesa and a mid-single-dig it decline in ready-to-eat cereals, partia lly offset by mid-single-digit
growth in oatmeal.
Operating profit decreased slightly , reflecting certain operating cost increases, the net revenue performance
and a 3-percentage -point impact of higher commodity costs. These impacts were partially offset by
productivity saving s, lower advertising and marketing expenses and a 1-percentage-point positive
contribution from insurance settlement recoveries related to the 2017 earthquake in Mexico.
2017
Net revenue declined 2%, reflecting the impact of the 53rd reporting week in 2016, which negatively impacted
net revenue performance by 2 percentage points, as well as unfavorable mix. Volume declined 2%, reflecting
a low-single-digit decline in ready-to- eat cereals and high-single-digit declines in trademark Roni and
Gamesa, in part reflecting the impact of the 53rd reporting week in 2016 which negatively impacted volume
performance by 2 percentage points.
Operating profit decreased 1%, reflectin g certain operating cost increases and the net revenue performance.
The 53rd reporting  week in 2016 negatively impacted operating profit performance by 2 percentage points.
These impacts were partially offset by productivity savings, lower advertising and marketing expenses and a
1.5-percentage-point impact of 2016 incremental investments into our business. Higher restructuring and
impairment char ges negatively impacted operating profit performance by 1 percentage point.
61
Table of Contents
North America Beverages
      % Change
 2018  2017(a) 2016(a)2018  2017
Net revenue $21,072  $20,936  $21,312 1  (2)
Impact of foreign exchange translation     — —
Impact of acquisitions and divestitures     — (1)
Impact of sales and certain other taxes (b)    — —
Impact of 53rd reporting week     — 1
Organic revenue growth (b)    0.5 (d) (2)
     
Operating profit $2,276  $2,700  $2,947 (16)  (8)
Restructuring and impairment char ges (c) 88 43 33
Operating profit excluding above item (b) $2,364  $2,743  $2,980 (14) (8)
Impact of foreign exchange translation     — —
Operating profit growth excluding above item, on a
constant currency basis (b)    (14) (8)
(a)In 2017 and 2016, operating profit and restructuring and impairment charges reflect the retrospective adoption of guidance
requiring the presentation of non-service cost components of net periodic benefit cost below operating profit. See Note 2 to our
consolidated financial statements.
(b)See “Non-GAAP Measures.”
(c)See “Items Affecting Comparability.”
(d)Does not sum due to rounding.
2018
Net revenue grew 1%, driven by effective net pricing, partially offset by a decline in volume. Volume
decreased 1%, driven by a 3% decline in CSD volume, partially offset by a 2% increase in non-carbonated
beverage volume. The non-carbonated  beverage volume increase primarily reflected a high-single-digit
increase in our overa ll water portfolio. Additionally , a low-single-digit increase in Gatorade sports drinks was
offset by a low-single-digit decline in our juice and juice drinks portfolio.
Operating profit decreased 16%, reflecting certain operating cost increases, inclu ding increased transportation
costs, a 7-percentage-point impact of higher commodity costs and higher adverti sing and marketing expenses.
These impacts were partially offset by productivity savings and the net revenue growth. Higher gains on asset
sales positively contributed 1.5 percen tage points to operating profit perform ance. A bonus extended to
certain U.S. employees in connection with the TCJ Act negatively impacted operating profit performance by
1.5 percentage points and was partiall y offset by prior -year costs related to hurricanes which positively
contributed 1 percentage point to operating profit performance.
2017
Net revenu e decreased 2%, primarily reflecting a decline in volume, partially offset by effective net pricing,
as well as acquisitions which positively contributed 1 percentage point to the net revenue performance. The
53rd reporting  week in 2016 negatively impacted net revenue performance by 1 percentage point. Volume
decreased 3.5%, driven by a 5% decline in CSD volume and a 1% decline in non-carbonated beverage
volume. The non-carbonated beverage  volume decrease primarily reflected mid-single-digit declines in
Gatorade sports drinks and in our juice and juice drinks portfolio, partially  offset by a mid-single-digit
increase in our overall water portfolio and a low-single-digit increase in Lipton ready-to-drink teas.
Acquisitions had a nominal positive contribution to the volume performance. The 53rd reporting week in 2016
negatively impacted volume performance by 1.5 percentage points.
62
Table of Contents
Operating profit decreased 8%, prima rily reflecting certain operating cost increases, the net revenue
performance and a 2-percentage-point impact of higher commodity costs. These impacts were partially offset
by productivity savings and lower adve rtising and marketing expenses. Costs related to the hurricanes that
occurred in 2017 negatively impacted operating profit performance by 1 percen tage point and were offset by
a gain associated with a sale of an asset. In addition, the 53rd reporting week in 2016 negatively impacted
operating profit performance by 1 percentage point and was offset by incremental investments in our business
in 2016.
Latin America
    % Change
 2018 2017(a)2016(a)2018 2017
Net revenue $7,354 $7,208 $6,820 2 6
Impact of foreign exchange translation 6 (1)
Impact of acquisitions and divestitures — 0.5
Organic revenue growth (b) 8 5(d) 
 
Operating profit $1,049 $ 924 $ 904 13 2
Restructuring and impairment char ges (c)40 56 27
Operating profit excluding above item (b) $1,089 $ 980 $ 931 11 5
Impact of foreign exchange translation 2 1
Operating profit growth excluding above item, on
a constant currency basis (b) 13 6
(a)In 2017 and 2016, operating profit and restructuring and impairment charges reflect the retrospective adoption of guidance
requiring the presentation of non-service cost components of net periodic benefit cost below operating profit. See Note 2 to our
consolidated financial statements.
(b)See “Non-GAAP Measures.”
(c)See “Items Affecting Comparability.”
(d)Does not sum due to rounding.
2018
Net reven ue grew 2%, reflecting effective net pricing, partially offset by a 6-percentage-point impact of
unfavorable foreign exchange.
Snacks volume grew 1%, reflecting low-single-digit growth in Mexico, partially offset by a mid-single-digit
decline in Brazil.
Beverage volume declined 1%, reflectin g a high-single-digit decline in Brazil,  a low-single-digit decline in
Mexico and a mid-single-digit decline in Argentina, partially offset by double-di git growth in Colombia, mid-
single-digit growth in Guatemala and low-single-digit growth in Honduras.
Operating profit increased 13%, reflecting the net revenue growth, productivity  savings and a 4-percentage-
point impact of insurance settlement recoveries related to the 2017 earthquak e in Mexico. These impacts
were partially offset by certain operating cost increases, a 14-percentage-point impact of higher commodity
costs and higher advertising and marketing expenses.
2017
Net reven ue increas ed 6%, reflecting effective net pricing, partially offset by volume declines. Favorable
foreign exchange contributed 1 percentage point to net revenue growth.
Snacks volume declined 1.5%, reflecting low-single-digit declines in Brazil and Mexico.
63
Table of Contents
Beverage volume declined 2%, reflecting a mid-single-digit decline in Brazil and a low-single-digit decline
in Argentina, partially offset by high-single-digit growth in Guatemala. Additionally , Mexico experienced a
slight decline.
Operating profit increased 2%, reflecting the effective net pricing and productivity savings. These impacts
were partially offset by certain operat ing cost increases, the volume decline s and a 16-percentage-point
impact of higher commodity costs. Higher restructuring and impairment charges reduced operating profit
growth by 3 percentage points.
Europe Sub-Saharan Africa
    % Change
 2018 2017(a)2016(a)2018  2017
Net revenue $11,523 $11,050 $10,216 4 8
Impact of foreign exchange translation  2 (3)
Impact of acquisitions and divestitures  — —
Impact of sales and certain other taxes (b) 0.5 —
Impact of 53rd reporting week  — —
Organic revenue growth (b) 7(d) 6(d) 
   
Operating profit $1,364 $1,316 $1,061 4 24
Restructuring and impairment char ges (c)63 53 60  
Merger and integration char ges (c)57 — —  
Operating profit excluding above items (b) $1,484 $1,369 $1,121 8 22
Impact of foreign exchange translation  3 —
Operating profit growth excluding above items,
on a constant currency basis (b) 11 22
(a)In 2017 and 2016, operating profit and restructuring and impairment charges reflect the retrospective adoption of guidance
requiring the presentation of non-service cost components of net periodic benefit cost below operating profit. See Note 2 to our
consolidated financial statements.
(b)See “Non-GAAP Measures.”
(c)See “Items Affecting Comparability.”
(d)Does not sum due to rounding.
2018
Net revenue increased 4%, reflecting volume growth and effective net pricing, partially offset by a 2-
percentage-point impact of unfavorable foreign exchange.
Snacks volume grew 3%, reflecting mid-single-digit growth in the Netherlands, partially offset by low-single-
digit declines in the United Kingdom and South Africa. Additionally , Russia and Turkey experienced low-
single-digit growth.
Beverage volume grew 7%, reflecting double-digit growth in Germany and Poland and high-single-digit
growth in France and Nigeria, partia lly offset by a low-single-digit decli ne in the United Kingdom.
Additionally , Russia and Turkey experienced mid-single-digit growth.
Operating profit increased 4%, reflectin g the net revenue growth, productivity savings and a 4-percentage-
point net impact of refranchising our entire beverage bottling operations and snack distribution operations in
CHS. These impacts were partially offset by certain operating cost increase s and an 8-percentage-point
impact of higher commodity costs. Additionally , a prior -year gain on the sale of our minority stake in Britvic
64
Table of Contents
and the merger and integration charges related to our acquisition of SodaStream reduced operating profit
growth by 7 percentage points and 4 percentage points, respectively .
2017
Net revenue increased 8%, reflecting volume growth and effective net pricing , as well as favorable foreign
exchange, which contributed 3 percentage points to net revenue growth.
Snacks volume grew 5%, reflecting high-single-digit growth in Russia, partially offset by a slight decline in
the United Kingdom and a low-single-digit decline in Spain. Additionally , Turkey , South Africa and the
Netherlands experienced mid-single-digit growth.
Beverage volume grew 1%, reflecting mid-single-digit growth in Poland and Nigeria and low-single-digit
growth in Turkey and France, partially offset by mid-single-digit declines in Russia and Germany , and a low-
single-digit decline in the United Kingdom.
Operating profit increased 24%, reflecting the net revenue growth and productivity savings. Additionally , a
gain on the sale of our minority stake in Britvic in 2017 contributed 8 percentage points to operating profit
growth. These impa cts were partially offset by certain operating cost increases, higher advertising and
marketing expenses and a 7-percentage-point impact of higher commodity costs.
Asia, Middle East and North Africa  
      % Change
 2018 2017  2016  2018 2017  
Net revenue $5,901 $6,030  $6,338  (2) (5)
Impact of foreign exchange translation     1 10
Impact of acquisitions and divestitures     8 —
Impact of sales and certain other taxes (a)    — —
Organic revenue growth (a)    7 5
      
Operating profit $1,172 $1,073  $ 619  9 73
Restructuring and impairment char ges (b)28 (3) 14  
Char ge related to the transaction with Tingyi (b) — —  373   
Operating profit excluding above items (a) $1,200 $1,070  $1,006  12 6
Impact of foreign exchange translation     (1) 8
Operating profit growth excluding above items,
on a constant currency basis (a)    11 15 (c) 
(a)See “Non-GAAP Measures.”
(b)See “Items Affecting Comparability.”
(c)Does not sum due to rounding.
2018
Net revenu e decline d 2%, reflecting an 8-percentage-point impact of refranchis ing a portion of our beverage
businesses in Thailand in 2018 and Jordan in 2017, partially offset by net volume growth and effective net
pricing.
Snacks volume grew  5%, reflecting double-digit growth in India, China and Pakistan, partially offset by a
mid-single-digit decline in the Middle East. Additionally , Australia experienced low-single-digit growth.
65
Table of Contents
Beverage volume declined slightly , reflecting a mid-single-digit decline in the Middle East and a double-digit
decline in the Philippines, partially offset by double-digit growth in Vietnam, mid-single-digit growth in India
and low-single-digit growth in Pakistan and China.
Operating profit grew 9%, primarily reflecting the effective net pricing, productivity savings and the net
volume growth, partially offset by certain operating cost increases, higher advertising and marketing
expenses and a 4-percentage-point impact of higher commodity costs. The net impact of refranchising a
portion of our beve rage business in Thailand in 2018 contributed 13 percentage points to operating profit
growth and was offset by a 16-percentage-point negative impact of the prior year refranchising of a portion of
our beverage business in Jordan.
2017
Net revenue decreased 5%, reflecting unfavorable foreign exchange, which negatively impacted net revenue
performance by 10 percentage points, primarily driven by a weak Egyptian pound. This impact was partially
offset by ef fective net pricing.
Snacks volume grew 5%, driven by high-single-digit growth in China and India and double-digit growth in
Pakistan. Additional ly, the Middle East experienced low-single-digit growth and Australia experienced mid-
single-digit growth.
Beverage volume declined 1%, reflecting a double-digit decline in India and a mid-single-digit decline in the
Middle East, partially offset by mid-sin gle-digit growth in China, high-single-digit growth in Pakistan and
low-single-digit growth in the Philippines.
Operating profit improvement primarily reflected a 2016 impairment charge to reduce the value of our 5%
indirect equity interest in KSFB to its estimated fair value. The effective net pricing and productivity savings
also increased operating profit growth. Additionally , the impact of refranchisi ng a portion of our beverage
business in Jordan contributed 14 perce ntage points to operating profit growth.  These impacts were partially
offset by certain operating cost increa ses and a 32-percentage-point impact of higher commodity costs,
primarily due to transaction-related foreign exchange on raw material purchases driven by the weak Egyptian
pound. Unfavorable foreign exchange translation reduced operating profit growth by 8 percentage points.
66
Table of Contents
Our Liquidity and Capital Resour ces
We believe that our cash generating capability and financial condition, together with our revolving credit
facilities and other available methods of debt financing, such as commercial paper borrowings and long-term
debt financing, will be adequate to meet our operating, investing and financing needs. Our primary sources of
cash available to fund cash outflows, such as our anticipated share repurchases, dividend payments, debt
repayments and transition tax liability under the TCJ Act, include cash from operations, proceeds obtained
from issuances of commercial paper and long-term debt and cash, cash equivalents and short-term
investments. However , there can be no assurance that volatility in the global capital and credit markets will
not impair our ability to access these markets on terms commercially acceptable to us, or at all. See Note 8 to
our consolidated financial statements for a description of our credit facilities. See also “Item 1A. Risk
Factors” and “Our Business Risks” for further discussion.
As of December 29, 2018 , we had cash, cash equivalents, short-term investments and restricted cash in our
consolidated subsidi aries of $5.7 billion  outside the United States. The restricted cash of approximately $2.0
billion held outside the United States relates to our acquisition of SodaStrea m. Refer to Note 13 to our
consolidated financial statements for further discussion of restricted cash. The TCJ Act imposed a mandatory
one-time transition tax on undistributed international earnings, including $18.9 billion held in our
consolidated subsidiaries outside the United States as of December 30, 2017. As of December 29, 2018, our
mandatory transition tax liability is $3.8 billion. Under the provisions of the TCJ Act, this transition tax
liability must be paid over eight years; we currently expect to pay approximate ly $0.4 billion of this liability
in 2019 and the remainder over the period 2020 to 2026.  See “Credit Facilities and Long-T erm Contractual
Commitments.” While our accounting for the recorded impact of the TCJ Act is deemed to be complete, this
amount is based on prevailing regulatio ns and currently available information, and any additional guidance
issued by the IRS could impact the aforementioned amount in future periods. The IRS issued additional
guidance in the first quarter of 2019 and we are currently evaluating the impact of this guidance.
In connection with the TCJ Act, during 2018 we repatriated $20.4 billion of cash, cash equivalents and short-
term inves tments held in our foreign subsidiaries without such funds being subject to further U.S. federal
income tax liability . The repatriated cash was used primarily for repayment of commercial paper and to fund
discretionary benefit plan contributions, debt repayments, dividend payments, share repurchases and our
acquisition of SodaStream. See “Item 1A. Risk Factors,” “Our Business Risks,” “Items Affecting
Comparability ,” “Our Critical Accoun ting Policies,” as well as Note 5 to our consolidated financial
statements.
As of December 29, 2018 , cash, cash equivalents and short-term investments in our consolidated subsidia ries
subject to currency controls or currency exchange restrictions were not material.
Furthermore, our cash provided from operating activities is somewhat impacted by seasonality . Working
capital needs are impacted by weekly sales, which are generally highest in the third quarter due to seasonal
and holida y-related sales patterns, and generally lowest in the first quarter . On a continuing basis, we
consider various transactions to increase shareholder value and enhance our business results, including
acquisitions, divestitures, joint venture s, dividends, share repurchases, productivity and other efficiency
initiatives, and other structural changes. These transactions may result in future cash proceeds or payments.
The table below summarizes our cash activity:  
 2018 2017  2016
Net cash provided by operating activities $9,415 $10,030  $10,663
Net cash provided by/(used for) investing activities $4,564 $(4,403 ) $(7,150 )
Net cash used for financing activities $(13,769 )$(4,186 ) $(3,21 1)
67
Table of Contents
Operating Activities
During 2018 , net cash provided by operating activities was $9.4 billion , compared to $10.0 billion  in the prior
year. The operating cash flow performance primarily reflects the discretionary contributions of $1.5 billion to
our pension and retiree medical plans in the current year, partially offset by lower net cash tax payments in
the current year .
During 2017 , net cash provided by operating activities was $10 billion , compared to $10.7 billion  in 2016.
The operating cash flow performance primarily reflects unfavorable working capital comparisons to 2016.
This decrease is mainly due to higher current year payments to vendors and customers, coupled with higher
net cash tax payments in 2017, partially offset by lower pension and retiree medical plan contributions in
2017.
See Note 7 to our consolidated financial statements for further discussion of pension contributions.
Investing Activities
During 2018 , net cash provided by investing activities was $4.6 billion , primarily reflecting net maturities
and sales of debt securities with maturities greater than three months of $8.7 billion, partially offset by net
capital spending of $3.1 billion and $1.2 billion of cash paid, net of cash and cash equivalents acquired, in
connection with our acquisition of SodaStream.
During 2017 , net cash used for investing activities was $4.4 billio n, primarily  reflecting net capital spendin g
of $2.8 billion and net purchases of debt securities with maturities greater than three months of $1.9 billion.
See Note 1 to our consolidated financial statements for further discussion of capital spending by division; see
Note 9 to our consolidated financial statements for further discussion of our investments in debt securities.
We expect 2019  net capital spending to be approximately $4.5 billion .
Financing Activities
During 2018 , net cash used for financing activities  was $13.8 billion, primarily  reflecting the return of
operating cash flow to our shareholders through dividend payments and share repurchases of $6.9 billion,
payments of long-term debt borrowings of $4.0 billion, cash tender and exchange offers of $1.6 billion and
net payments of short-term borrowings of $1.4 billion.
During 2017 , net cash used for financing activities was $4.2 billio n, primarily  reflecting the return of
operating cash flow to our shareholders through dividend payments and share repurchases of $6.5 billion and
net payments of short-term borrowings of $1.1 billion, partially offset by net proceeds from long-term debt of
$3.1 billion and proceeds from exercises of stock options of $0.5 billion.
See Note 8 to our consolidated financial statements for further discussion of debt obligations.
We annually review our capital structure with our Board of Directors, including our dividend policy and share
repurchase activity . On February 11, 2015, we announced a share repurchas e program providing for the
repurchase of up to $12.0 billion of PepsiCo common stock which commenced on July 1, 2015 and expired
on June 30, 2018 (2015 share repurchase program). The 2015 share repurchase program had approximately
$4.3 billion of authorized repurchase capacity unused at expiration. On February 13, 2018, we announced the
2018 share repurchase program providing for the repurchase of up to $15.0 billion of PepsiCo common stock
which commenced on July 1, 2018 and will expire on June 30, 2021. On Februa ry 15, 2019, we announced a
3% increa se in our annualized dividend  to $3.82 per share from $3.71 per share, effective with the dividend
expected to be paid in June 2019. We expect to return a total of approximately $8 billion to shareholders in
2019 through share repurchases of approximately $3 billion and dividends of approximately $5 billion.
68
Table of Contents
Free Cash Flow
Free cash flow is a non-GAAP  financial measure. For further information on free cash flow see “Non-GAAP
Measures.”
The table below reconciles net cash provided by operating activities, as reflected in our cash flow statement,
to our free cash flow . 
   % Change
2018 2017 2016 2018 2017
Net cash provided by operating activities $ 9,415 $10,030 $10,663 (6) (6)
Capital spending (3,282) (2,969) (3,040)  
Sales of property, plant and equipment 134 180 99  
Free cash flow (a)$ 6,267$7,241$ 7,722 (13) (6)
(a)See “Non-GAAP Measures.” In addition, when evaluating free cash flow, we also consider the following items impacting comparability: $1.5 billion,
$6 million and $459 million in discretionary pension and retiree medical contributions and associated net cash tax benefits of $473 million, $1
million and $151 million in 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively; $266 million, $113 million and $125 million of payments related to restructuring
charges and associated net cash tax benefits of $45 million, $30 million and $22 million in 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively; tax payments related
to the TCJ Act of $115 million in 2018; certain other items of $47 million in 2018; net cash tax benefit related to debt redemption charge of $83
million in 2016; and net cash received related to interest rate swaps of $5 million in 2016. We will also consider payments related to the transition tax
liability of $3.8 billion as of December 29, 2018, which we currently expect to be paid over the period 2019 to 2026 under the provisions of the TCJ
Act, as an item impacting comparability.
We use free cash flow primarily for financing activities, including debt repayments, dividends and share
repurchases. We expect to continue to return free cash flow to our shareholders through dividends and share
repurchases while maintaining Tier 1 commercial paper access, which we believe will facilitate appropriate
financial flexibility and ready access to global capital and credit markets at favorable interest rates. However ,
see “Item 1A. Risk Factors” and “Our Business Risks” for certain factors that may impact our credit ratings
or our operating cash flows.
Any downgrade of our credit ratings by a credit rating agency , especially any downgrade to below investment
grade, whether or not as a result of our actions or factors which are beyond our control, could increase our
future borrowing costs and impair our ability to access capital and credit markets on terms commercially
acceptable to us, or at all. In addition, any downgrade of our current short-ter m credit ratings could impair
our ability to access the commercial paper market with the same flexibility that we have experienced
historically , and therefore require us to rely more heavily on more expensive types of debt financing. See
“Item 1A. Risk Factors,” “Our Business Risks” and Note 8 to our consolidated financial statements for
further discussion.
Credit Facilities and Long-T erm Contractual Commitments
See Note 8 to our consolidated financial statements for a description of our credit facilities.
69
Table of Contents
The following table summarizes our long-term contractual commitments by period:
 Payments Due by Period(a)
 Total 2019 2020 –
20212022 –
2023 2024 and
beyond
Long-term debt obligations (b)$ 28,351$ — $ 7,166$ 5,093 $ 16,092
Interest on debt obligations (c)11,157 1,044 1,759 1,322 7,032
Operating leases (d)1,840 459 700 371 310
Purchasing commitments (e)2,602 982 1,221 252 147
Marketing commitments (e)1,686 452 796 234 204
 $ 45,636$ 2,937 $ 11,642$ 7,272 $ 23,785
 
(a)Based on year-end foreign exchange rates. Reserves for uncertain tax positions are excluded from the table above as we are unable to reasonably
predict the ultimate amount or timing of any such settlements. However, under the provisions of the TCJ Act, our transition tax liability of $3.8
billion, of which $3.4 billion is recorded in other liabilities on our balance sheet, must be paid over eight years. We expect to pay approximately $0.4
billion in 2019, $0.3 billion per year in 2020-2023, $0.6 billion in 2024, $0.7 billion in 2025 and $0.9 billion in 2026 and these amounts are excluded
from the table above.
(b)Excludes $3,953 million related to current maturities of debt, $56 million related to the fair value adjustments for debt acquired in acquisitions and
interest rate swaps and payments of $119 million related to unamortized net discounts.
(c)Interest payments on floating-rate debt are estimated using interest rates effective as of December 29, 2018.
(d)See Note 15 to our consolidated financial statements for additional information on operating leases.
(e)Primarily reflects non-cancelable commitments as of December 29, 2018.
Long-term contractual commitments, except for our long-term debt obligations and transition tax liability , are
generally not recorded on our balance  sheet. Operating leases primarily represent building leases. Non-
cancelable purchasin g commitments are primarily for oranges, orange juice and certain other commodities.
Non-cancelable marketing commitment s are primarily for sports marketing. Bottler funding to independent
bottlers is not reflected in our long-term contractual commitments as it is negotiated on an annual basis.
Accrued liabilities for pension and retiree medical plans are not reflected in our long-term contractual
commitments. See Note 7 to our conso lidated financial statements for additional information regarding our
pension and retiree medical obligations.
Off-Balance-Sheet Arrangements
We do not have guarantees or other off-balance-sheet financing arrangements, including variable interest
entities, that we believe could have a material impact on our financial condition or liquidity .
We coordinate, on an aggregate basis,  the contract negotiations of raw material requirements, including
sweeteners, aluminum cans and plastic bottles and closures for us and certain of our independent bottlers.
Once we have negot iated the contracts, the bottlers order and take delivery directly from the supplier and pay
the suppli ers direct ly. Consequently , transactions between our independent bottlers and suppliers are not
reflected in our consolidated financial  statements. As the contracting party , we could be liable to these
suppliers in the event of any nonpayment by our independent bottlers, but we consider this exposure to be
remote.
70
Table of Contents
Return on Invested Capital
ROIC is a non-GAAP  financial measure. For further information on ROIC, see “Non-GAAP  Measures.”
 2018  2017  2016
Net income attributable to PepsiCo $12,515(a)  $ 4,857(a)  $ 6,329
Interest expense 1,525  1,151  1,342
Tax on interest expense (339)  (415)  (483)
 $13,701  $ 5,593  $ 7,188
       
Average debt obligations (b)$38,169  $38,707  $35,308
Average common shareholders’ equity (c) 11,368  12,004  11,943
Average invested capital $49,537  $50,711  $47,251
       
Return on invested capital 27.7%(a) 11.0%(a) 15.2%
(a) Our fiscal 2018 results include other net tax benefits related to the reorganization of our international operations. Our fiscal 2018 and 2017
results include the impact of the TCJ Act. See Note 5 to our consolidated financial statements.
(b) Average debt obligations includes a quarterly average of short-term and long-term debt obligations.
(c) Average common shareholders’  equity includes a quarterly average of common stock, capital in excess of par value, retained earnings,
accumulated other comprehensive loss and repurchased common stock.
The table below reconciles ROIC as calculated above to net ROIC, excluding items af fecting comparability .
 2018 2017 2016
ROIC 27.7% 11.0% 15.2%
Impact of:      
Average cash, cash equivalents and short-term investments 7.8 7.6 6.0
Interest income (0.6) (0.5) (0.2)
Tax on interest income 0.1 0.2 0.1
Mark-to-market net impact 0.2 — (0.2)
Restructuring and impairment charges 0.4 0.3 0.1
Merger and integration charges 0.1 — —
Net tax (benefit)/expense related to the TCJ Act (1.1) 4.5 —
Other net tax benefits (9.7) 0.1 0.1
Charges related to cash tender and exchange offers (0.1) — —
Charges related to the transaction with Tingyi — (0.1) 0.6
Pension-related settlement charge — — 0.3
Venezuela impairment charges — (0.2) (0.5)
Net ROIC, excluding items affecting comparability 24.8% 22.9% 21.5%
OUR CRITICAL  ACCOUNTING POLICIES
An appreciation of our critical accounting policies is necessary to understand our financial results. These
policies may require  management to make difficult and subjective judgments regarding uncertainties, and as a
result, such estimates may significantly impact our financial results. The precision of these estimates and the
likelihood of future changes depend on a number of underlying variables and a range of possible outcomes.
Other than our accounting for pension and retiree medical plans, our critica l accounting policies do not
involve a choice between alternative methods of accounting. We applied our critical accounting policies and
estimation methods consistently in all material respects and for all periods presented. We have discussed our
critical accounting policies with our Audit Committee.
71
Table of Contents
Our critical accounting policies are:
•revenue recognition;
•goodwill and other intangible assets;
•income tax expense and accruals; and
•pension and retiree medical plans.
Revenue Recognition
We recognize revenue when our performance obligation is satisfied. Our primary performance obligation (the
distribution and sales of beverage products and food and snack products) is satisfied upon the shipment or
delivery of products to our customers, which is also when control is transferre d. The transfer of control of
products to our customers is typically based on written sales terms that do not allow for a right of return.
However , our policy for DSD and certain chilled products is to remove and replace damaged and out-of-date
products from store shelves to ensure that consumers receive the product quality and freshness they expect.
Similarly , our policy for certain warehouse-distributed products is to replace damaged and out-of-date
products. As a result, we record reser ves, based on estimates, for anticipated damaged and out-of-date
products.
Our produ cts are sold for cash or on credit terms. Our credit terms, which are established in accordance with
local and industry practices, typically require payment within 30 days of delivery in the United States, and
generally within 30 to 90 days internationally , and may allow discounts for early payment.
We estima te and reserve for our bad debt exposure based on our experience with past due accounts and
collectibility , the aging of accounts receivable and our analysis of customer data.
Our policy is to provide customers with product when needed. In fact, our commitment to freshness and
product dating serves to regulate the quantity of product shipped or delivered. In addition, DSD products are
placed on the shelf by our employees with customer shelf space and storerooms limiting the quantity of
product. For product delivered through other distribution networks, we monitor customer inventory levels.
As discussed in “Our Customers” in “Item 1. Business,” we offer sales incentives and discounts through
various programs to customers and consumers. Total marketplace spendin g includes sales incentives,
discounts, advertisin g and other marketi ng activities. Sales incentives and disco unts are primarily accounted
for as a reduction of revenue and include payments to customers for performing  activities on our behalf, such
as payments for in-store displays, payments to gain distribution of new products, payments for shelf space
and discounts to promote lower retail prices. Sales incentives and discounts also include support provided to
our independent bottlers through funding of advertising and other marketing activities.
See Note 2 to our consolidated financial statements for additional information on our revenue recognition and
related policies, including total marketplace spending.
Goodwill and Other  Intangible Assets
We sell products under a number of brand names, many of which were developed by us. Brand development
costs are expensed as incurred. We also purchase brands and other intangible assets in acquisitions. In a
business combination, the consideration  is first assigned to identifiable assets and liabilities, including brands
and other intangible assets, based on estimated fair values, with any excess recorded as goodwill.
Determining fair value requires significa nt estimates and assumptions based on an evaluation of a number of
factors, such as marketplace participan ts, product life cycles, market share,  consumer awareness, brand
history and future
72
Table of Contents
expansion expectations, amount and timing of future cash flows and the discount rate applied to the cash
flows.
We believe that a brand has an indefinite life if it has a history of strong revenu e and cash flow performance
and we have the intent and ability to support the brand with marketplace spendi ng for the foreseeable future.
If these indefinite-lived brand criteria are not met, brands are amortized over their expected useful lives,
which generally range from 20 to 40 years. Determining the expected life of a brand requires management
judgment and is based on an evaluation of a number of factors, including market share, consumer awareness,
brand history , future expansion expec tations and regulatory restrictions, as well as the macroeconomic
environment of the countries in which the brand is sold.
In connection with previous acquisitions, we reacquired certain franchise rights which provided the exclusive
and perpet ual rights to manufacture and/or distribute beverages for sale in specified territories. In determining
the useful life of these franchise rights, many factors were considered, including the pre-existing perpetual
bottling arrangements, the indefinite period expected for these franchise rights to contribute to our future cash
flows, as well as the lack of any factors that would limit the useful life of these franchise rights to us,
including legal, regulatory , contractual, competitive, economic or other factor s. Therefore, certain of these
franchise rights are considered as indefinite-lived. Franchise rights that are not considered indefinite-lived are
amortized over the remaining contractual period of the contract in which the right was granted.
Indefinite-lived intan gible assets and goodwill are not amortized and, as a result , are assessed for impairment
at least annually , using either a qualita tive or quantitative approach. We perform this annual assessment
during our third quarter . Where we use the qualitative assessment, first we determine if, based on qualitative
factors, it is more likely than not that an impairment exists. Factors considered include macroeconomic,
industry and competitive conditions, legal and regulatory environment, historical financial performance and
significant changes in the brand or reporting unit. If the qualitative assessment indicates that it is more likely
than not that an impairment exists, then a quantitative assessment is performed.
In the quantitative assessment, estimated fair value is determined using discount ed cash flows and requires an
analysis of several estimates including future cash flows or income consistent with management’ s strategic
business plans, annu al sales growth rates, perpetuity growth assumptions and the selection of assumptions
underlying a discount rate (weighted-average cost of capital) based on market data available at the time.
Significant management judgment is necessary to estimate the impact  of competitive operating,
macroeconomic and other factors to estimate future levels of sales, operating profit or cash flows. All
assumptions used in our impairment evaluations for indefinite-lived intangible assets, such as forecasted
growth rates and weighted-average cost of capital, are based on the best available market information and are
consistent with our internal forecasts and operating plans. These assumptions could be adversely impacted by
certain of the risks described in “Item 1A. Risk Factors” and “Our Business Risks.”
Amortizable intangible assets are only evaluated for impairment upon a signific ant change in the operating or
macroeconomic environment. If an evaluation of the undiscounted future cash flows indicates impairment,
the asset is written down to its estimated fair value, which is based on its discounted future cash flows.
See Note 2 and Note 4 to our consolidated financial statements.
Income Tax Expense and Accruals
Our annual tax rate is based on our income, statutory tax rates and tax planning  opportunities available to us
in the various jurisdictions in which we operate. Significant judgment is required in determining our annual
tax rate and in evaluating our tax positions. We establish reserves when, despite  our belief that our tax return
positions are fully supportable, we believe that certain positions are subject to challenge and that we likely
73
Table of Contents
will not succeed. We adjust these reserves, as well as the related interest, in light of changing facts and
circumstances, such as the progress of a tax audit. See “Item 1A. Risk Factors” for further discussion.
An estima ted annual effective tax rate is applied to our quarterly operating results. In the event there is a
significant or unusual item recognized in our quarterly operating results, the tax attributable to that item is
separately calculated  and recorded at the same time as that item. We consider the tax adjustments from the
resolution of prior year tax matters to be among such items.
Tax law requires items to be included in our tax returns at different times than the items are reflected in our
financial statements.  As a result, our annual tax rate reflected in our financial statements is different than that
reported in our tax returns (our cash tax rate). Some of these differences are perm anent, such as expenses that
are not deductible in our tax return, and some differences reverse over time, such as depreciation expense.
These temporary differences create deferred tax assets and liabilities. Deferred tax assets generally represent
items that can be used as a tax deduction or credit in our tax returns in future years for which we have already
recorded the tax benefit on our income  statement. We establish valuation allowances for our deferred tax
assets if, based on the available evidence, it is more likely than not that some portion or all of the deferred tax
assets will not be realized. Deferred tax liabilities generally represent tax expen se recognized in our financial
statements for which payment has been deferred, or expense for which we have already taken a deduction in
our tax return but have not yet recognized as expense in our financial statements.
During the fourth quarter of 2017, the TCJ Act was enacted in the United States . Among its many provisions,
the TCJ Act imposed a mandatory one-t ime transition tax on undistributed intern ational earnings and reduced
the U.S. corporate income tax rate from 35% to 21%, ef fective January 1, 2018. As a result of the enactment
of the TCJ Act, we recognized a provis ional net tax expense of $2.5 billion ($1.70 per share) in the fourth
quarter of 2017.
Included in the provisional net tax expense of $2.5 billion recognized in 2017 is a provisional mandatory one-
time trans ition tax of approximately $4 billion on undistributed internationa l earnings, included in other
liabilities. This provisional mandatory one-time transition tax was partially offset by a provisional $1.5
billion benefit resulting from the required remeasurement of our deferred tax assets and liabilities to the new,
lower U.S. corporate income tax rate, effective January 1, 2018. The effect of the remeasurement was
recorded in the fourt h quarter of 2017, consistent with the enactment date of the TCJ Act and reflected in our
provision for income taxes.
During 2018, we recognized a net tax benefit of $28 million  ($0.02 per share) in connection with the TCJ
Act. See further information in “Items Affecting Comparability .”
While our accounting for the recorded impact of the TCJ Act is deemed to be complete, these amounts are
based on prevailing regulations and currently available information, and any additional guidance issued by
the IRS could impact the aforementioned amounts in future periods.  As a result of the TCJ Act, we currently
expect our annual tax rate, excluding items affecting comparability , in percentage terms, to be in the low
twenties in 2019. However , we continue  to evaluate the impact of the TCJ Act on our annual tax rate due to
certain provisions, such as the global intangible low-tax income (GIL TI) provision, which may impact our tax
rate in future years.
In 2018 , our annu al tax rate was (36.7)%  compared to 48.9%  in 2017 , as discus sed in “Other Consolidated
Results.” The tax rate decreased 85.6 percentage points compared to 2017, reflecting both other net tax
benefits related to the reorganization of our international operations, which reduced the reported tax rate by
45 percentage points, and the prior year provisional net tax expense related to the TCJ Act, which reduced the
current year reported tax rate by 25 percentage points. Additionally , the favorable conclusion of certain
international tax audits and the favorable resolution with the IRS of all open matters related to the audits of
74
Table of Contents
taxable years 2012 and 2013, collectively , reduced the reported tax rate by 7 percentage points.  See Note 5 to
our consolidated financial statements.
Pension and Retir ee Medical Plans
Our pensio n plans cover certain employ ees in the United States and certain international employees. Benefits
are determined based on either years of service or a combination of years of service and earnings. Certain
U.S. and Canada retirees are also eligible for medical and life insurance benefits (retiree medical) if they
meet age and service requirements. Generally , our share of retiree medical costs is capped at specified dollar
amounts, which vary based upon years of service, with retirees contributing the remainder of the cost. In
addition, we have been phasing out certain subsidies of retiree medical benefits.
In 2016, we approved an amendment to reorganize the U.S. qualified define d benefit pension plans that
resulted in the combination of two plans effective December 31, 2016, and the spinof f of a portion of the
combined plan into a pre-existing plan effective January 1, 2017. The benefits offered to the plans’
participants were unchanged. The result of the reorganization was the creation of Plan A and the PepsiCo
Employees Retirement Plan I (Plan I). The reorganization was made to facilitate a targeted investment
strategy over time and to provide additional flexibility in evaluating opportunities to reduce risk and
volatility . Actuarial gains and losses associated with Plan A are amortized over the average remaining service
life of the active participants, while the actuarial gains and losses associated with Plan I are amortized over
the remaining life expectancy of the inactive participants. As a result of these changes, the pre-tax net
periodic benefit cost decreased by $42 million ($27 million after-tax, reflecting tax rates effective for the
2017 tax year, or $0.02 per share) in 2017, primarily impacting corporate unallocated expenses. See Note 7 to
our consolidated financial statements.
In 2016, the U.S. qualified defined benefit pension plans purchased a group annuity contract whereby an
unrelated insurance company assumed the obligation to pay and administer future annuity payments for
certain retirees. In 2016, we made discretionary contributions of $452 million primarily to fund the transfer of
the obligation. This transaction triggered a pre-tax settlement charge of $242 million ($162 million after-tax
or $0.1 1 per share). See “Items Affecting Comparability” and Note 7 to our consolidated financial statements.
Our Assumptions
The determ ination of pension and retiree medical expenses and obligations requires the use of assumptions to
estimate the amount of benefits that employees earn while working, as well as the present value of those
benefits. Annual pension and retiree medical expense amounts are principally based on four components:
(1) the value of benefits earned by employees for working during the year (service cost), (2) the increase in
the projected benefit obligation due to the passage of time (interest cost), and (3) other gains and losses as
discussed in Note 7 to our consolidated financial statements, reduced by (4) the expected return on assets for
our funded plans.
Significant assumptions used to measure our annual pension and retiree medical expenses include:
•certain employee-related demographic factors, such as turnover , retirement age and mortality;
•the expected return on assets in our funded plans;
•for pension expense, the rate of salary increases for plans where benefits are based on earnings;
•for retiree medical expense, health care cost trend rates; and
•for pensio n and retiree medical expense, the spot rates along the yield curve used to determine
service and interest costs and the present value of liabilities.
75
Table of Contents
Certain assumptions reflect our historical experience and management’ s best judgment regarding future
expectations. All actuarial assumptions are reviewed annually , except in the case of an interim remeasurement
due to a significant event such as a curtailment or settlement. Due to the significant management judgment
involved, our assumptions could have a material impact on the measurement of our pension and retiree
medical expenses and obligations.
At each measurement date, the discount  rates are based on interest rates for high-quality , long-term corporate
debt securities with maturities comparable to those of our liabilities. Our U.S. obligation and pension and
retiree medical expense is based on the discount rates determined using the Mercer Above Mean Curve. This
curve includes bonds that closely match the timing and amount of our expected benefit payments and reflects
the portfolio of investments we would consider to settle our liabilities.
See Note 7 to our consolidated financia l statements for information about the expected rate of return on plan
assets and our plans’  investment strategy . Although we review our expected long-term rates of return on an
annual basis, our asset returns in a given year do not significantly influence our evaluation of long-term rates
of return.
The health care trend rate used to determine our retiree medical plans’  liability and expense is reviewed
annually . Our review is based on our claims experience, information provid ed by our health plans and
actuaries, and our knowledge of the health care industry . Our review of the trend rate considers factors such
as demographics, plan design, new medical technologies and changes in medical carriers.
Weighted-average assumptions for pension and retiree medical expense are as follows:  
 2019 2018  2017
Pension  
Service cost discount rate 4.4% 3.7% 4.3%
Interest cost discount rate 3.9% 3.2% 3.5%
Expected rate of return on plan assets 6.8% 6.9% 7.2%
Expected rate of salary increases 3.2% 3.2% 3.2%
Retiree medical  
Service cost discount rate 4.3% 3.6% 4.0%
Interest cost discount rate 3.8% 3.0% 3.2%
Expected rate of return on plan assets 6.6% 6.5% 7.5%
Current health care cost trend rate 5.7% 5.8% 5.9%
Based on our assumptions, we expect our total pension and retiree medical expense to increase in 2019
primarily driven by the recognition of prior experience losses on return on plan assets, partially offset by the
impact of higher discount rates and discretionary plan contributions.
Sensitivity of Assumptions
A decrease in each of the collective discount rates or in the expected rate of return assumptions would
increase expense for our benefit plans. A 25-basis-point decrease in each of the above discount rates and
expected rate of return assumptions would individually increase 2019  pre-tax pension and retiree medical
expense as follows:
Assumption Amount
Discount rates used in the calculation of expense $42
Expected rate of return $40
76
Table of Contents
Funding
We make contributions to pension trusts that provide plan benefits for certain pension plans. These
contributions are made in accordance with applicable tax regulations that provi de for current tax deductions
for our contributions and taxation to the employee only upon receipt of plan benefits. Generally , we do not
fund our pension plans when our contributions would not be currently tax deductible. As our retiree medical
plans are not subject to regulatory funding requirements, we generally fund these plans on a pay-as-you-go
basis, although we periodically review available options to make additional contributions toward these
benefits.
Our pensi on and retiree medical contributions are subject to change as a result of many factors, such as
changes in interest rates, deviations between actual and expected asset returns and changes in tax or other
benefit laws. We regularly evaluate different opportunities to reduce risk and volatility associated with our
pension and retiree medical plans. See Note 7 to our consolidated financial statements for our past and
expected contributions and estimated future benefit payments.
77
Table of Contents
Consolidated Statement of Income
PepsiCo, Inc. and Subsidiaries
Fiscal years ended December 29, 2018 , December 30, 2017  and December 31, 2016
(in millions except per share amounts)
 
 2018  2017 2016
Net Revenue $ 64,661  $ 63,525 $ 62,799
Cost of sales 29,381  28,796 28,222
Gross profit 35,280  34,729 34,577
Selling, general and administrative expenses 25,170  24,453 24,773
Operating Pr ofit 10,110  10,276 9,804
Other pension and retiree medical benefits income/(expense) 298  233 (19)
Interest expense (1,525 ) (1,151 ) (1,342 )
Interest income and other 306  244 110
Income before income taxes 9,189  9,602 8,553
(Benefit from)/provision for income taxes (See Note 5) (3,370 ) 4,694 2,174
Net income 12,559  4,908 6,379
Less: Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests 44  51 50
Net Income Attributable to PepsiCo $ 12,515  $ 4,857 $ 6,329
Net Income Attributable to PepsiCo per  Common Shar e   
Basic $ 8.84  $ 3.40 $ 4.39
Diluted $ 8.78  $ 3.38 $ 4.36
Weighted-average common shares outstanding   
Basic 1,415  1,425 1,439
Diluted 1,425  1,438 1,452
See accompanying notes to the consolidated financial statements.
78
Table of Contents
Consolidated Statement of Compr ehensive Income
PepsiCo, Inc. and Subsidiaries
Fiscal years ended December 29, 2018 , December 30, 2017  and December 31, 2016
(in millions)
 2018 2017  2016
Net income $ 12,559 $ 4,908  $ 6,379
Other comprehensive income/(loss), net of taxes:    
Net currency translation adjustment (1,641 ) 1,109  (302)
Net change on cash flow hedges 40 (36) 46
Net pension and retiree medical adjustments (467) (159) (316)
Net change on available-for -sale securities 6 (68) (24)
Other — 16  —
 (2,062 ) 862  (596)
Comprehensive income 10,497 5,770  5,783
Comprehensive income attributable to noncontrolling
interests (44) (51) (54)
Compr ehensive Income Attributable to PepsiCo $ 10,453 $ 5,719  $ 5,729
See accompanying notes to the consolidated financial statements.
79
Table of Contents
Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows
PepsiCo, Inc. and Subsidiaries
Fiscal years ended December 29, 2018 , December 30, 2017  and December 31, 2016
(in millions)
 2018 2017  2016
Operating Activities    
Net income $ 12,559 $ 4,908  $ 6,379
Depreciation and amortization 2,399 2,369  2,368
Share-based compensation expense 256 292  284
Restructuring and impairment char ges 308 295  160
Cash payments for restructuring char ges (255) (113) (125)
Char ge related to the transaction with Tingyi — — 373
Pension and retiree medical plan expenses 221 221  501
Pension and retiree medical plan contributions (1,708 ) (220) (695)
Deferred income taxes and other tax char ges and credits (531) 619  452
Other net tax benefits related to international reor ganizations (4,347 ) — —
Net tax (benefit)/expense related to the TCJ Act (28) 2,451  —
Change in assets and liabilities:    
Accounts and notes receivable (253) (202) (349)
Inventories (174) (168) (75)
Prepaid expenses and other current assets 9 20 10
Accounts payable and other current liabilities 882 201  981
Income taxes payable 333 (338) 329
Other , net (256) (305) 70
Net Cash Pr ovided by Operating Activities 9,415 10,030  10,663
    
Investing Activities    
Capital spending (3,282 ) (2,969 ) (3,040 )
Sales of property , plant and equipment 134 180  99
Acquisition of SodaStream, net of cash and cash equivalents acquired (1,197 ) — —
Other acquisitions and investments in noncontrolled af filiates (299) (61) (212)
Divestitures 505 267  85
Short-term investments, by original maturity:    
More than three months - purchases (5,637 ) (18,385 ) (12,504 )
More than three months - maturities 12,824 15,744  8,399
More than three months - sales 1,498 790  —
Three months or less, net 16 2 16
Other investing, net 2 29 7
Net Cash Pr ovided by/(Used for) Investing Activities 4,564 (4,403 ) (7,150 )
    
Financing Activities    
Proceeds from issuances of long-term debt — 7,509  7,818
Payments of long-term debt (4,007 ) (4,406 ) (3,105 )
Cash tender and exchange of fers/debt redemptions (1,589 ) — (2,504 )
Short-term borrowings, by original maturity:    
More than three months - proceeds 3 91 59
More than three months - payments (17) (128) (27)
Three months or less, net (1,352 ) (1,016 ) 1,505
Cash dividends paid (4,930 ) (4,472 ) (4,227 )
Share repurchases - common (2,000 ) (2,000 ) (3,000 )
Share repurchases - preferred (2) (5) (7)
Proceeds from exercises of stock options 281 462  465
Withholding tax payments on RSUs, PSUs and PEPunits converted (103) (145) (130)
Other financing (53) (76) (58)
Net Cash Used for  Financing Activities (13,769 ) (4,186 ) (3,21 1)
Effect of exchange rate changes on cash and cash equivalents and restricted cash (98) 47 (252)
Net Incr ease in Cash and Cash Equivalents and Restricted Cash 112 1,488  50
Cash and Cash Equivalents and Restricted Cash, Beginning of Year 10,657 9,169  9,119
Cash and Cash Equivalents and Restricted Cash, End of Year $ 10,769 $ 10,657  $ 9,169
See accompanying notes to the consolidated financial statements.
80
Table of Contents
Consolidated Balance Sheet
PepsiCo, Inc. and Subsidiaries
December 29, 2018  and December 30, 2017
(in millions except per share amounts)
 2018 2017
ASSETS  
Current Assets  
Cash and cash equivalents $ 8,721$ 10,610
Short-term investments 272 8,900
Restricted cash 1,997 —
Accounts and notes receivable, net 7,142 7,024
Inventories 3,128 2,947
Prepaid expenses and other current assets 633 1,546
Total Current Assets 21,893 31,027
Property, Plant and Equipment, net 17,589 17,240
Amortizable Intangible Assets, net 1,644 1,268
Goodwill 14,808 14,744
Other indefinite-lived intangible assets 14,181 12,570
Indefinite-Lived Intangible Assets 28,989 27,314
Investments in Noncontrolled Affiliates 2,409 2,042
Deferred Income Taxes 4,364 —
Other Assets 760 913
Total Assets $ 77,648$ 79,804
  
LIABILITIES AND EQUITY  
Current Liabilities  
Short-term debt obligations $ 4,026$ 5,485
Accounts payable and other current liabilities 18,112 15,017
Total Current Liabilities 22,138 20,502
Long-Term Debt Obligations 28,295 33,796
Deferred Income Taxes 3,499 3,242
Other Liabilities 9,114 11,283
Total Liabilities 63,046 68,823
Commitments and contingencies
Preferred Stock, no par value — 41
Repurchased Preferred Stock — (197)
PepsiCo Common Shareholders’ Equity  
Common stock, par value 12/3¢ per share (authorized 3,600 shares; issued, net of repurchased
common stock at par value: 1,409 and 1,420 shares, respectively) 23 24
Capital in excess of par value 3,953 3,996
Retained earnings 59,947 52,839
Accumulated other comprehensive loss (15,119) (13,057)
Repurchased common stock, in excess of par value (458 and 446 shares, respectively) (34,286) (32,757)
Total PepsiCo Common Shareholders’ Equity 14,518 11,045
Noncontrolling interests 84 92
Total Equity 14,602 10,981
Total Liabilities and Equity $ 77,648$ 79,804
See accompanying notes to the consolidated financial statements.
81
Table of Contents
Consolidated Statement of Equity
PepsiCo, Inc. and Subsidiaries
Fiscal years ended December 29, 2018 , December 30, 2017  and December 31, 2016
(in millions)  
 2018 2017 2016
 Shares Amount Shares Amount Shares Amount
Preferred Stock     
Balance, beginning of year0.8 $ 41 0.8 $ 41 0.8 $ 41
Conversion to common stock(0.1) (6) — — — —
Retirement of preferred stock(0.7) (35) — — — —
Balance, end of year— — 0.8 41 0.8 41
Repurchased Preferred Stock      
Balance, beginning of year(0.7) (197) (0.7) (192) (0.7) (186)
Redemptions— (2) — (5) — (6)
Retirement of preferred stock0.7 199 — — — —
Balance, end of year— — (0.7) (197) (0.7) (192)
Common Stock      
Balance, beginning of year1,420 24 1,428 24 1,448 24
Share issued in connection with preferred stock conversion to
common stock 1 — — — — —
Change in repurchased common stock(12) (1) (8) — (20) —
Balance, end of year1,409 23 1,420 24 1,428 24
Capital in Excess of Par Value      
Balance, beginning of year 3,996  4,091  4,076
Share-based compensation expense 250  290  289
Equity issued in connection with preferred stock conversion to
common stock  6  —   —
Stock option exercises, RSUs, PSUs and PEPunits converted (a) (193)  (236)  (138)
Withholding tax on RSUs, PSUs and PEPunits converted (103)  (145)  (130)
Other (3)  (4)  (6)
Balance, end of year 3,953  3,996  4,091
Retained Earnings      
Balance, beginning of year 52,839  52,518  50,472
Cumulative effect of accounting changes (145)  —   —
Net income attributable to PepsiCo 12,515  4,857  6,329
Cash dividends declared - common (b) (5,098)  (4,536)  (4,282)
Cash dividends declared - preferred —  —   (1)
Retirement of preferred stock (164)  —   —
Balance, end of year 59,947  52,839  52,518
Accumulated Other Comprehensive Loss      
Balance, beginning of year (13,057)  (13,919)  (13,319)
Other comprehensive (loss)/income attributable to PepsiCo (2,062)  862  (600)
Balance, end of year (15,119)  (13,057)  (13,919)
Repurchased Common Stock      
Balance, beginning of year(446) (32,757) (438) (31,468) (418) (29,185)
Share repurchases(18) (2,000) (18) (2,000) (29) (3,000)
Stock option exercises, RSUs, PSUs and PEPunits converted6 469 10 708 9 712
Other— 2 — 3 — 5
Balance, end of year(458) (34,286) (446) (32,757) (438) (31,468)
Total PepsiCo Common Shareholders’ Equity 14,518  11,045  11,246
Noncontrolling Interests      
Balance, beginning of year 92  104  107
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests 44  51  50
Distributions to noncontrolling interests (49)  (62)  (55)
Currency translation adjustment —  —   4
Other, net (3)  (1)  (2)
Balance, end of year 84  92  104
Total Equity  $ 14,602  $ 10,981  $ 11,199
(a) Includes total tax benefits of $110 million in 2016.
(b) Cash dividends declared per common share were $3.5875, $3.1675 and $2.96 for 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively.
See accompanying notes to the consolidated financial statements.
82
Table of Contents
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
Note 1 — Basis of Pr esentation and Our  Divisions
Basis of Presentation
The accompanying financial statements  have been prepared in accordance with U.S. GAAP  and include the
consolidated accounts of PepsiCo, Inc. and the affiliates that we control. In addition, we include our share of
the results of certain other affiliates using the equity method based on our economic ownership interest, our
ability to exercise significant influence  over the operating or financial decisions of these affiliates or our
ability to direct their economic resources. We do not control these other affiliates, as our ownership in these
other affiliates is generally 50% or less. Intercompany balances and transactions are eliminated. As a result of
exchange restrictions and other operating restrictions, we do not have control over our Venezuelan
subsidiaries. As such, our Venezuelan subsidiaries are not included within our consolidated financial results
for any period presented.
Raw materials, direct labor and plant overhead, as well as purchasing and receiving costs, costs directly
related to production planning, inspectio n costs and raw materials handling facilities, are included in cost of
sales. The costs of moving, storing and delivering finished product, including merchandising activities, are
included in selling, general and administrative expenses.
The preparation of our consolidated financial statements requires us to make estimates and assumptions that
affect reported amounts of assets, liabilities, revenues, expenses and disclosure of contingent assets and
liabilities. Estimates are used in determ ining, among other items, sales incentives accruals, tax reserves,
share-based compen sation, pension and retiree medical accruals, amounts and useful lives for intangible
assets and future cash flows associated  with impairment testing for perpetua l brands, goodwill and other
long-lived assets. We evaluate our estimates on an ongoing basis using our historical experience, as well as
other factors we believe appropriate under the circumstances, such as current economic conditions, and adjust
or revise our estimates as circumstances change. As future events and their effect cannot be determined with
precision, actual results could dif fer significantly from these estimates.
Our fiscal  year ends on the last Saturday of each December , resulting in an additional week of results every
five or six years. Our fiscal 2016 results included an extra week. While our North America results are
reported on a weekly calendar basis, most of our international operations report on a monthly calendar basis.
Certain operations in our ESSA  segment report on a weekly calendar basis. The following chart details our
quarterly reporting schedule:
Quarter United States and Canada  International
First Quarter 12 weeks  January , February
Second Quarter 12 weeks  March, April and May
Third Quarter 12 weeks  June, July and August
Fourth Quarter 16 weeks (17 weeks for 2016)  September , October , November and December
See “Our Divisions” below , and for additional unaudited information on items affecting the comparability of
our consolidated results, see further unaudited information in “Items Affecting Comparability” in
Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations.
Unless otherwise noted, tabular dollars  are in millions, except per share amounts. All per share amounts
reflect common per share amounts, assume dilution unless otherwise noted, and are based on unrounded
amounts. Certain reclassifications were made to the prior years’  financial statements to conform to the current
year prese ntation, including the adoption of the recently issued accounting pronouncements disclosed in Note
2.
83
Table of Contents
Our Divisions
Through our operations, authorized bottlers, contract manufacturers and other third parties, we make, market,
distribute and sell a wide variety of convenient beverages, foods and snacks, serving customers and
consumers in more than 200 coun tries and territories with our largest operations in North America, Mexico ,
Russia, the United Kingdom and Braz il. Division results are based on how our Chief Executive Officer
assesses the perform ance of and allocates resources to our divisions and are considered our reportable
segments. For additional unaudited information on our divisions, see “Our Operations” contained in “Item 1.
Business.” The accounting policies for the divisions are the same as those described in Note 2, except for the
following allocation methodologies:
•share-based compensation expense;
•pension and retiree medical expense; and
•derivatives.
Share-Based Compensation Expense
Our divisi ons are held accountable for share-based compensation expense and, therefore, this expense is
allocated to our divisions as an incremental employee compensation cost.
The allocation of share-based compensation expense of each division is as follows:
 2018 2017 2016
FLNA 13% 13% 14%
QFNA 1% 1% 2%
NAB 18% 18% 22%
Latin America 8% 7% 7%
ESSA 9% 9% 11%
AMENA 8% 9% 10%
Corporate unallocated expenses 43% 43% 34%
The expense allocated to our divisions excludes any impact of changes in our assumptions during the year
which reflect market conditions over which division management has no control. Therefore, any variances
between allocated expense and our actual expense are recognized in corporate unallocated expenses.
Pension and Retir ee Medical Expense
Pension and retiree medical service costs measured at fixed discount rates are reflected in division results.
The variance between the fixed discount rate used to determine the service cost reflected in division results
and the discount rate as disclosed in Note 7 is reflected in corporate unallocated expenses.
Derivatives
We centrally manage commodity derivatives on behalf of our divisions. These commodity derivatives include
energy, agricultural products and metal s. Commodity derivatives that do not qualify for hedge accounting
treatment are marked to market each period with the resulting gains and losses recorded in corporate
unallocated expense s as either cost of sales or selling, general and administrativ e expenses, depending on the
underlying commod ity. These gains and losses are subsequently reflected in division results when the
divisions recognize the cost of the unde rlying commodity in operating profit. Therefore, the divisions realize
the econom ic effects of the derivative without experiencing any resulting mark-to-market volatility , which
remains in corporat e unallocated expenses. These derivatives hedge underlying commodity price risk and
were not entered into for trading or speculative purposes.
84
Table of Contents
Net revenue and operating profit of each division are as follows:
 Net Revenue Operating Profit(b)
 2018(a)2017 2016 2018 2017(c) 2016(c)
FLNA $ 16,346$ 15,798 $ 15,549 $ 5,008$ 4,793 $ 4,612
QFNA 2,465 2,503 2,564 637 640 649
NAB 21,072 20,936 21,312 2,276 2,700 2,947
Latin America 7,354 7,208 6,820 1,049 924 904
ESSA 11,523 11,050 10,216 1,364 1,316 1,061
AMENA 5,901 6,030 6,338 1,172 1,073 619
Total division 64,661 63,525 62,799 11,506 11,446 10,792
Corporate unallocated expenses — — — (1,396) (1,170) (988)
 $ 64,661$ 63,525 $ 62,799 $ 10,110$ 10,276 $ 9,804
(a) Our primary performance obligation is the distributio n and sales of beverage products and food and snack products to our customers, each
comprising approximately 50% of our conso lidated net revenue. Internationally , our Latin America segment is predominantly a food and
snack business, ESSA ’s beverage business and food and snack business are each approximately 50% of the segment’ s net revenue and
AMENA ’s beverage business and food and snack business are approximately 35% and 65%, respe ctively , of the segment’ s net revenue.
Beverage revenue from company-owned bottlers, which primarily includes our consolidated bottling operations in our NAB and ESSA
segments, is approximately 40% of our consolidated net revenue. Generally , our finished goods beverage operations produce higher net
revenue, but lower operating margins as compared to concentrate sold to authorized bottling partners for the manufacture of finished goods
beverages. See Note 2 for additional information.
(b) For further unaudited information on certain items that impacted our financial performance, see “Item 6. Selected Financial Data.”
(c) Reflects the retrospective adoption of guidance requiring the presentation of non-service cost components  of net periodic benefit cost below
operating profit. See Note 2 for additional information.
Corporate Unallocated Expenses
Corporate unallocated expenses include costs of our corporate headquarters, centrally managed initiatives
such as commodity derivative gains and losses, foreign exchange transaction gains and losses, our ongoing
business transforma tion initiatives, unallocated research and development costs, unallocated insurance and
benefit programs, and certain other items.
Other Division Information  
Total assets and capital spending of each division are as follows:
 Total Assets Capital Spending
 2018 2017 2018 2017 2016
FLNA $ 6,577$ 5,979 $ 840$ 665 $ 801
QFNA 870 804 53 44 41
NAB 29,878 28,592 945 904 769
Latin America 6,458 4,976 492 481 507
ESSA (a)17,410 13,556 479 481 439
AMENA 6,433 5,668 323 308 381
Total division 67,626 59,575 3,132 2,883 2,938
Corporate (b)10,022 20,229 150 86 102
$ 77,648$ 79,804 $ 3,282$ 2,969 $ 3,040
(a) In 2018, the change in assets was primarily related to our acquisition of SodaStream.
(b) Corporate assets consist principally of certain cash and cash equivalents, restricted cash, short-term investments, derivative instruments,
property , plant and equipment and tax assets. In 2018 , the change in assets was primarily due to a decreas e in short-term investments and
cash and cash equivalents. Refer to the cash flow statement for additional information.
85
Table of Contents
Amortization of intangible assets and depreciation and other amortization of each division are as follows:
 Amortization of 
Intangible AssetsDepreciation and
Other Amortization
 2018 2017 2016 2018 2017 2016
FLNA $ 7$ 7 $ 7 $ 457$ 449$ 435
QFNA — — — 45 47 50
NAB 31 31 37 821 780 809
Latin America 5 5 5 253 245 211
ESSA 23 22 18 331 329 321
AMENA 3 3 3 237 257 294
Total division 69 68 70 2,144 2,107 2,120
Corporate — — — 186 194 178
$ 69$ 68 $ 70 $ 2,330$ 2,301$ 2,298
Net revenue and long-lived assets by country are as follows:
 Net Revenue Long-Lived Assets(a)
 2018 2017 2016 2018 2017
United States $ 37,148 $ 36,546 $ 36,732$ 29,169 $ 28,418
Mexico 3,878 3,650 3,431 1,404 1,205
Russia (b)3,191 3,232 2,648 3,926 4,708
Canada 2,736 2,691 2,692 2,565 2,739
United Kingdom 1,743 1,650 1,737 759 817
Brazil 1,335 1,427 1,305 639 777
All other countries (c)14,630 14,329 14,254 12,169 9,200
$ 64,661 $ 63,525 $ 62,799$ 50,631 $ 47,864
(a) Long-lived assets represent property , plant and equipment, indefinite-lived intangible assets, amortizable intangible assets and investments in
noncontrolled af filiates. These assets are reported in the country where they are primarily used.
(b) Change in net revenue in 2017 primarily reflects appreciation of the Russian ruble. Change in long-lived assets in 2018 primarily reflects
depreciation of the Russian ruble.
(c) Change in long-lived assets in 2018 primarily related to our acquisition of SodaStream.
Note 2 — Our  Significant Accounting Policies
Revenue Recognition
We recognize revenue when our performance obligation is satisfied. Our primary performance obligation (the
distribution and sales of beverage products and food and snack products) is satisfied upon the shipment or
delivery of products to our customers, which is also when control is transferred. Merchandising activities are
performed after a customer obtains control of the product, are accounted for as fulfillment of our performance
obligation to ship or deliver product to our customers and are recorded in selling, general and administrative
expenses. Merchandising activities are immaterial in the context of our contracts.
The transfer of control of products to our customers is typically based on written  sales terms that do not allow
for a right of return. However , our policy for DSD and certain chilled produ cts is to remove and replace
damaged and out-of -date products from store shelves to ensure that consumers receive the product quality
and freshness they expect. Similarly , our policy for certain warehouse-distributed products is to replace
damaged and out-of-date products. As a result, we record reserves, based on estimates, for anticipated
damaged and out-of-date products.
In addition, upon adoption of the revenue recognition guidance (see subsequent discussion of “Recently
Issued Accounting Pronouncements - Adopted”), we exclude from net revenue and cost of sales, all sales,
86
Table of Contents
use, value -added and certain excise taxes assessed by governmental autho rities on revenue-producing
transactions.
Our produ cts are sold for cash or on credit terms. Our credit terms, which are established in accordance with
local and industry practices, typically require payment within 30 days of delivery in the United States, and
generally within 30 to 90 days internationally , and may allow discounts for early payment.
We estima te and reserve for our bad debt exposure based on our experience with past due accounts and
collectibility , the aging of accounts receivable and our analysis of custome r data. Bad debt expense is
classified within selling, general and administrative expenses on our income statement.
We are exposed to concentration of credit risk from our major customers, including Walmart. In 2018 , sales
to Walmart (including Sam’ s) represented approximately 13% of our consolidated net revenue, including
concentrate sales to our independent bottlers, which were used in finished goods sold by them to Walmart.
We have not experienced credit issues with these customers.
Total Marketplace Spending
We offer sales incentives and discoun ts through various programs to customers and consumers. Total
marketplace spendin g includes sales incentives, discounts, advertising and other marketing activities. Sales
incentives and discounts are primarily accounted for as a reduction of reven ue and include payments to
customers for performing activities on our behalf, such as payments for in-store displays, payments to gain
distribution of new products, payments for shelf space and discounts to prom ote lower retail prices. Sales
incentives and discounts also include support provided to our independent bottlers through funding of
advertising and other marketing activities.
A number of our sales incentives, such as bottler funding to independent bottlers and customer volume
rebates, are based on annual targets, and accruals are established during the year for the expected payout.
These accruals are based on contract terms and our historical experience with similar programs and require
management judgment with respect to estimating customer participation and performance levels. Differences
between estimated expense and actual incentive costs are normally insignif icant and are recognized in
earnings in the period such differences are determined. In addition, certain advertising and marketing costs
are also based on annual tar gets and recognized during the year as incurred.
The terms  of most of our incentive arrangements do not exceed a year, and, therefore, do not require highly
uncertain long-term estimates. Certain arrangements, such as fountain pouring rights, may extend beyond one
year. Upfront payments to customers under these arrangements are recognized over the shorter of the
economic or contractual life, primarily as a reduction of revenue, and the remaining balances of $218 million
as of December 29, 2018  and $262 milli on as of December 30, 2017  are includ ed in prepaid expenses and
other current assets and other assets on our balance sheet. For additional unaudited information on our sales
incentives, see “Our Customers” in “Item 1. Business.”
For interim reporting, our policy is to allocate our forecasted full-year sales incentives for most of our
programs to each of our interim reporting periods in the same year that bene fits from the programs. The
allocation methodolo gy is based on our forecasted sales incentives for the full year and the proportion of each
interim period’ s actual gross revenue or volume, as applicable, to our forecasted annual gross revenue or
volume, as applicable. Based on our review of the forecasts at each interim period, any changes in estimates
and the related allocation of sales incentives are recognized beginning in the interim period that they are
identified. In addition, we apply a similar allocation methodology for interim reporting purposes for certain
advertising and other marketing activiti es. Our annual financial statements are not impacted by this interim
allocation methodology .
87
Table of Contents
Advertising and other marketing activit ies, reported as selling, general and administrative expenses, totaled
$4.2 billio n in 2018 , $4.1 billio n in 2017  and $4.2 billio n in 2016 , including  advertisi ng expenses of $2.6
billion  in 2018 , $2.4 billio n in 2017  and $2.5 billio n in 2016 . Deferred  advertising costs are not expensed
until the year first used and consist of:
•media and personal service prepayments;
•promotional materials in inventory; and
•production costs of future media advertising.
Deferred advertising  costs of $47 million  and $46 million  as of December 29, 2018  and December 30, 2017 ,
respectively , are classified as prepaid expenses and other current assets on our balance sheet.
Distribution Costs
Distribution costs, including the costs of shipping and handling activi ties, which include certain
merchandising activ ities, are reported as selling, general and administrative expenses. Shipping and handling
expenses were $10.5 billion  in 2018 , $9.9 billion  in 2017  and $9.7 billion  in 2016 .
Cash Equivalents
Cash equivalents are highly liquid investments with original maturities of three months or less.
Software Costs
We capitalize certain computer softw are and software development costs incurred in connection with
developing or obtaining computer software for internal use when both the preliminary project stage is
completed and it is probable that the software will be used as intended. Capitalized software costs include
(i) external direct costs of materials and services utilized in developing or obtaining computer software,
(ii) compensation and related benefits for employees who are directly associated with the software projects
and (iii) interest costs incurred while developing internal-use computer softwar e. Capitalized software costs
are included in property , plant and equipment on our balance sheet and amortized on a straight-line basis
when placed into service over the estim ated useful lives of the software, which approximate five to 10 years.
Software amortization totaled $204 million  in 2018 , $224 million  in 2017  and $214 million  in 2016 . Net
capitalized software and development costs were $577 million  and $686 million  as of December 29, 2018  and
December 30, 2017 , respectively .
Commitments and Contingencies
We are subject to various claims and contingencies related to lawsuits, certain taxes and environmental
matters, as well as commitments under contractual and other commercial obligations. We recognize liabilities
for contin gencies and commitments when a loss is probable and estimable. For additional unaudited
information on our commitments, see “Our Liquidity and Capital Resources” in Management’ s Discussion
and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations.
Research and Development
We engage in a variety of research and development activities and continue to invest to accelerate growth and
to drive innovation  globally . Consumer research is excluded from research and development costs and
included in other marketing costs. Research and development costs were $680 million , $737 million  and
$760 million  in 2018 , 2017  and 2016 , respectively , and are reported within selling, general and administrative
expenses.
See “Research and Development” in “Item 1. Business” for additional unaudited information about our
research and development activities.
88
Table of Contents
Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets
Indefinite-lived intan gible assets and goodwill are not amortized and, as a result , are assessed for impairment
at least annually , using either a qualita tive or quantitative approach. We perform this annual assessment
during our third quarter . Where we use the qualitative assessment, first we determine if, based on qualitative
factors, it is more likely than not that an impairment exists. Factors considered include macroeconomic,
industry and competitive conditions, legal and regulatory environment, historical financial performance and
significant changes in the brand or reporting unit. If the qualitative assessment indicates that it is more likely
than not that an impairment exists, then a quantitative assessment is performed.
In the quantitative assessment of indefin ite lived-intangible assets and goodwill, an assessment is performed
to determine the fair value of the indefinite-lived intangible asset and the reporting unit, respectively .
Estimated fair value is determined using discounted cash flows and requires an analysis of several estimates
including future cash flows or income consistent with management’ s strategic business plans, annual sales
growth rates, perpetuity growth assumptions and the selection of assumption s underlying a discount rate
(weighted-average cost of capital) based on market data available at the time. Significant management
judgment is necessary to estimate the impact of competitive operating, macroeconomic and other factors to
estimate future levels of sales, operating profit or cash flows. All assumptions used in our impairment
evaluations for indefinite-lived intangibl e assets and goodwill, such as forecasted growth rates and weighted-
average cost of capital, are based on the best available market information and are consistent with our internal
forecasts and operating plans. These assumptions could be adversely impa cted by certain of the risks
described in “Item 1A. Risk Factors” and “Our Business Risks” in Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of
Financial Condition and Results of Operations.
Amortizable intangible assets are only evaluated for impairment upon a signific ant change in the operating or
macroeconomic environment. If an evaluation of the undiscounted future cash flows indicates impairment,
the asset is written down to its estimated fair value, which is based on its discounted future cash flows.
See also Note 4, and for additional unaudited information on goodwill and other intangible assets, see “Our
Critical Accounting Policies” in Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results
of Operations.
Other Significant Accounting Policies
Our other significant accounting policies are disclosed as follows:
•Basis of Presentation  – Note 1 includes a description of our policies regarding use of estimates, basis
of presentation and consolidation.
•Property , Plant and Equipment – Note 4.
•Income Taxes – Note 5, and for additional unaudited information, see “Our Critical Accounting
Policies” in Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations.
•Share-Based Compensation –  Note 6.
•Pension, Retir ee Medical and Savings Plans  – Note 7, and for additional unaudited information, see
“Our Critical Accounting Policies” in Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition
and Results of Operations.
•Financial Instruments  – Note 9, and for additional unaudited information, see “Our Business Risks”
in Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations.
•Inventories – Note 15. Inventor ies are valued at the lower of cost or net realizable value. Cost is
determined using the average; first-in, first-out (FIFO) or, in limited instances, last-in, first-out (LIFO)
methods.
•Translation of Financial Statements of Foreign Subsidiaries  – Financial statem ents of foreign
subsidiaries are translated into U.S. dollars using period-end exchange rates for assets and liabilities
89
Table of Contents
and weighted-average exchange rates for revenues and expenses. Adjustments resulting from
translating net assets are reported as a separate component of accumulated other comprehensive loss
within common shareholders’  equity as currency translation adjustment.
Recently Issued Accounting Pronouncements - Adopted
In 2017, the Financ ial Accounting Standards Board (FASB) issued guidance to retrospectively present the
service cost component of net periodic benefit cost for pension and retiree medical plans along with other
compensation costs in operating profit and present the other components of net periodic benefit cost
separately below operating profit in the income statement. The guidance also allows only the service cost
component of net periodic benefit cost to be eligible for capitalization within inventory or fixed assets on a
prospective basis. We adopted the provisions of this guidance retrospectively  in the first quarter of 2018,
using historical information previously disclosed in our pension and retiree medical benefits footnote as the
estimation basis. We also updated our allocation of service costs to our divisions to better approximate actual
service cost. The impact from retrospective adoption of this guidance resulted in an increase to cost of sales
and selling, general and administrative expenses of $11 million  and $222 million , respectively , for the year
ended December 30, 2017 and an increase of $13 million  and a decrease of $32 million , respectively , for the
year ended December 31, 2016. We recorded a corresponding increase of $233 million  and decrease of $19
million  for the years ended December 30, 2017 and December 31, 2016, respectively , to other pension and
retiree medical benefits income/(expense) below operating profit.
The (decreases)/incr eases to operating profit for each division and to corporate unallocated expenses are as
follows:
 2017(a)2016(b)
FLNA $ (30)$ (47)
QFNA (2) (4)
NAB (7) (12)
Latin America 16 17
ESSA (38) (47)
AMENA — —
Corporate unallocated expenses (172) 112(c) 
Total $ (233)$ 19
(a) Includes restructuring charges of $66 million, includ ing $13 million in our FLNA  segment, $2 million in our QFNA  segment, $11 million in
our NAB segment, $7 million  in our Latin America segment and $33 million  in corporate unallocated expenses. See “Items Affecting
Comparability” in Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations.
(b) Includes restructuring charges of $5 million , including $1 million  in our FLNA  segment, $2 million  in our NAB segment and $2 million  in
corporate unallocated expenses. See “Items Affecting Comparability” in Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and
Results of Operations.
(c) Reflects a settlement charge of $242 million  related to a group annuity contract purchase. See “Items Affecting Comparability” in
Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations.
The changes described above had no impact on our consolidated net revenue, net income or earnings per
share. See Note 7 for further information on our service cost and other compo nents of net periodic benefit
cost for pension and retiree medical plans.
In 2016, the FASB issued guidance to clarify how restricted cash should be presented in the cash flow
statement. We adopted the provisions of this guidance retrospectively during the first quarter of 2018; the
adoption did not have a material impact on our financial statements and primarily related to collateral posted
against our derivative asset or liability positions. See Note 9 and Note 13 for further information.
90
Table of Contents
In 2016, the FASB issued guidance that requires companies to account for the income tax effects of
intercompany transf ers of assets, other than inventory , when the transfer occurs versus deferring income tax
effects until the transferred asset is sold to an outside party or otherwise recognized. We adopted the
provisions of this guidance during the first quarter of 2018; the adoption did not have a material impact on
our financial statements and we recorded an adjustment of $8 million  to beginning retained earnings.
In 2016, the FASB  issued guidance that requires companies to measure investments in certain equity
securities at fair value and recognize any changes in fair value in net income. We adopted the provisions of
this guida nce during the first quarter of 2018; the adoption did not have an impact on our financial
statements. See Note 9 for further information on our investments in equity securities.
In 2014, the FASB issued guidance on revenue recognition, with final amendments issued in 2016. The
guidance provides for a five-step model to determine the revenue recognized for the transfer of goods or
services to customers that reflects the expected entitled consideration in exchang e for those goods or services.
It also provides clarification for principal versus agent considerations and identifying performance
obligations. In addition, the FASB introduced practical expedients related to disclosures of remaining
performance obligations, as well as other amendments related to guidance on collectibility , non-cash
consideration and the presentation of sales and other similar taxes. Financial statement disclosures required
under the guidance will enable users to understand the nature, amount, timing, judgments and uncertainty of
revenue and cash flows relating to customer contracts. The two permitted transition methods under the
guidance are the full retrospective approach or a cumulative effect adjustm ent to the opening retained
earnings in the year of adoption (cumulative effect approach). We adopted  the guidance applied to all
contracts using the cumulative effect approach during the first quarter of 2018 ; the adoption did not have a
material impact on our financial statements.
We utilized a comprehensive approach to assess the impact of the guidance on our contract portfolio by
reviewing our current accounting policies and practices to identify potential differences that would result
from applying the new requirements to our revenue contracts, including evaluation of our performance
obligations, principal versus agent considerations and variable consideration. We completed our contract and
business process reviews and implemented changes to our controls and disclosures under the new guidance.
As a resul t of the implementation of the guidance, which did not have a material impact on our accounting
policies upon adoption, in the first quarter of 2018, we recorded an adjustment of $137 million  to beginning
retained earnings to reflect marketplace spending that our customers and independent bottlers expect to be
entitled to in line with revenue recognition. In addition, we excluded from net revenue and cost of sales all
sales, use, value-add ed and certain excise taxes assessed by governmental authorities on revenue-producing
transactions that were not already excluded. The impact of these taxes previously recognized in net revenue
and cost of sales was approximately $75 millio n for the fiscal year ended December 30, 2017, with no impact
on operating profit.
Recently Issued Accounting Pronouncements - Not Yet Adopted
In 2018, the FASB issued guidance related to the TCJ Act for the optional reclassification of the residual tax
effects, arising from the change in corporate tax rate, in accumulated other comprehensive loss to retained
earnings. The reclassification is the difference between the amount previously recorded in other
comprehensive income at the histor ical U.S. federal tax rate that remains in accumulated other
comprehensive loss at the time the TCJ Act was effective and the amount that would have been recorded
using the newly enacted rate. If elected, the guidance can be applied retrospectively to each period during
which the impact of the TCJ Act is recognized or in the period of adoption. We will adopt the guidance when
it becomes ef fective in the first quarter of 2019, but we are not planning to make the optional reclassification.
91
Table of Contents
In 2017, the FASB issued guidance to amend and simplify the application of hedge accounting guidance to
better portray the economic results of risk management activities in the financial statements. The guidance
expands the ability to hedge nonfinanc ial and financial risk components, reduces complexity in fair value
hedges of interest rate risk, eliminates the requirement to separately measure and report hedge
ineffectiveness, as well as eases certain hedge effectiveness assessment requir ements. Under this guidance,
certain of our derivatives used to hedge commodity price risk that did not previously qualify for hedge
accounting treatmen t will qualify prospe ctively . We will adopt the guidance when it becomes effective in the
first quarter of 2019 . The guidance is not expected to have a material impact on our financial statements or
disclosures. See Note 9 for further information.
In 2016, the FASB issued guidance on leases, with amendments issued in 2018. The guidance requires lessees
to recogni ze most leases on the balance sheet but record expenses in the income statement in a manner
similar to current accounting. For lessors, the guidance modifies the classification criteria and the accounting
for sales-type and direct financing lease s. The two permitted transition method s under the guidance are the
modified retrospective transition approa ch, which requires application of the guidance for all comparative
periods presented, and the cumulative effect adjustment approach, which requires prospective application at
the adoption date.
We continue to utilize a comprehensive approach to assess the impact of this guidance on our financial
statements and related disclosures, including the increase in the assets and liabilities on our balance sheet and
the impact on our current lease portfolio from both a lessor and lessee perspective. We are substantially
complete with our comprehensive review  of our lease portfolio including significant leases by geography and
by asset type that will be impacted by the new guidance, and enhancing our controls. In addition, we are
progressing on the implementation of a new software platform, and correspondi ng controls, for administering
our leases and facilitating compliance with the new guidance.
As part of our adoption, we will not reassess historical lease classification, will not recognize short-term
leases on our balance sheet, will utilize the portfolio approach to group leases with similar characteristics and
will not separate lease and non-lease components for our real estate leases. We will adopt the guidance
prospectively when it becomes effective in the first quarter of 2019. The guidance is not expected to have a
material impact on our financial statements, with an expected increase of approximately 2% to each of our
total assets and total liabilities on our balance sheet, subject to completion of our assessment. See Note 15 for
our minimum lease payments under non-cancelable operating leases.
Note 3 — Restructuring and Impairment Charges
A summary of our restructuring and impairment char ges and other productivity initiatives is as follows:
 2018 2017 2016
2019 Productivity Plan $ 138$ — $ —
2014 Productivity Plan 170 295 160
Total restructuring and impairment charges 308 295 160
Other productivity initiatives 8 16 12
Total restructuring and impairment charges and other
productivity initiatives $ 316$ 311$ 172
2019 Multi-Y ear Productivity Plan
The 2019 Productiv ity Plan, publicly announced on February 15, 2019, will levera ge new technology and
business models to further simplify , harmonize and automate processes; re-engineer our go-to-market and
information systems , including deploying the right automation for each market; simplify our organization and
optimize our manufacturing and supply chain footprint.
92
Table of Contents
A summary of our 2019 Productivity Plan char ges is as follows:
 2018
Costs of sales $ 3
Selling, general and administrative expenses 100
Other pension and retiree medical benefits expense 35
Total restructuring and impairment charges $ 138
After-tax amount $ 109
Net income attributable to PepsiCo per common share $ 0.08
 2018
FLNA $ 31
QFNA 5
NAB 40
Latin America 9
ESSA 8
AMENA 3
Corporate 7
 103
Other pension and retiree medical benefits expense 35
 $ 138
A summary of our 2019 Productivity Plan activity is as follows:
 Severance
and Other
Employee Costs Asset
Impairments  Other Costs(a) Total
2018 restructuring charges $ 137 $ — $ 1 $ 138
Non-cash charges and translation (32) — — (32)
Liability as of December 29, 2018 $ 105 $ — $ 1 $ 106
(a) Includes other costs associated with the implementation of our initiatives, including consulting and other professional fees.
Substantially all of the restructuring accrual at December 29, 2018  is expected to be paid by the end of 2019 .
2014 Multi-Y ear Productivity Plan
The 2014 Productivity Plan, publicly announced on February 13, 2014, includes the next generation of
productivity initiati ves that we believ e will strengthen our beverage, food and snack businesses by:
accelerating our investment in manuf acturing automation; further optimizin g our global manufacturing
footprint, including  closing certain manufacturing facilities; re-engineering our go-to-market systems in
developed markets; expanding shared services; and implementing simplified organization structures to drive
efficiency . To build on the 2014 Productivity Plan, in the fourth quarter of 2017 , we expanded and extended
the program through the end of 2019 to take advantage of additional oppor tunities within the initiatives
described above to further strengthen our beverage, food and snack businesses.
93
Table of Contents
A summary of our 2014 Productivity Plan char ges is as follows:
 2018 2017 2016
Selling, general and administrative expenses $ 169$ 229 $ 155
Other pension and retiree medical benefits expense 1 66 5
Total restructuring and impairment charges $ 170$ 295 $ 160
After-tax amount $ 143$ 224 $ 134
Net income attributable to PepsiCo per common share $ 0.10$ 0.16 $ 0.09
 2018 2017 2016 Plan to Date
FLNA $ 8$ 67 $ 13 $ 171
QFNA 2 11 1 34
NAB 51 54 35 352
Latin America 30 63 27 182
ESSA 55 53 60 282
AMENA (a)25 (3) 14 69
Corporate (b)(1) 50 10 114
 $ 170$ 295 $ 160 $ 1,204
(a) In 2017, income amount primarily reflects a gain on the sale of property , plant and equipment.
(b) In 2018, income amount primarily relates to other pension and retiree medical benefits.
 Severance
and Other
Employee CostsAsset
Impairments Other Costs(a) Total
Plan to Date $ 713$ 182$ 309 $ 1,204
(a) Includes other costs associated with the implementation of our initiatives, including certain consulting and contract termination costs.
A summary of our 2014 Productivity Plan activity is as follows:
 Severance
and Other
Employee CostsAsset
Impairments Other Costs  Total
Liability as of December 26, 2015 $ 61$ —  $ 20 $ 81
2016 restructuring charges 88 36 36 160
Cash payments (46) —  (49) (95)
Non-cash charges and translation (15) (36) 1 (50)
Liability as of December 31, 2016 88 —  8 96
2017 restructuring charges 280 21 (6)(a) 295
Cash payments (91) —  (22) (113)
Non-cash charges and translation (65) (21) 34 (52)
Liability as of December 30, 2017 212 —  14 226
2018 restructuring charges 86 28 56 170
Cash payments (b)(203) —  (52) (255)
Non-cash charges and translation (4) (28) 5 (27)
Liability as of December 29, 2018 $ 91$ —  $ 23 $ 114
(a) Income amount represents adjustments for changes in estimates and a gain on the sale of property , plant, and equipment.
(b) Excludes cash expenditures of $1 1 million reported in the cash flow statement in pension and retiree medical plan contributions.
Substantially all of the restructuring accrual at December 29, 2018  is expected to be paid by the end of 2019 .
94
Table of Contents
Other Productivity Initiatives
There were no material charges related to other productivity and efficiency initiatives outside the scope of the
2019 and 2014 Productivity Plans.
We regula rly evalua te different productivity initiatives beyond the productivity plans and other initiatives
described above.
See additi onal unau dited information in “Items Affecting Comparability” and “Results of Operations –
Division Review” in Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financia l Condition and Results of
Operations. 
Note 4 — Pr operty , Plant and Equipment and Intangible Assets
A summary of our property , plant and equipment is as follows:
Average
Useful Life
(Years) 2018 2017  2016
Property, plant and equipment, net    
Land $ 1,078 $ 1,148  
Buildings and improvements 15 - 44 8,941 8,796  
Machinery and equipment, including fleet and software 5 - 15 27,715 27,018  
Construction in progress 2,430 2,144  
40,164 39,106  
Accumulated depreciation (22,575 ) (21,866 ) 
$17,589 $17,240  
Depreciation expense $ 2,241 $ 2,227  $ 2,217
Property , plant and equipment is recorde d at historical cost. Depreciation and amortization are recognized on
a straight-line basis over an asset’ s estimated useful life. Land is not depreciated and construction in progress
is not depreciated until ready for service.
A summary of our amortizable intangible assets is as follows:
 2018 2017 2016
Amortizable intangible assets,
netAverage
Useful Life
(Years) Gross  Accumulated
Amortization  Net Gross  Accumulated
Amortization  Net
Acquired franchise rights 56 – 60 $ 838  $ (140) $ 698 $ 858  $ (128) $ 730
Reacquired franchise rights 5 – 14 106  (105) 1 106  (104) 2
Brands 20 – 40 1,306  (1,032 ) 274 1,322  (1,026 ) 296
Other identifiable intangibles (a)10 – 24 959  (288) 671 521  (281) 240
$3,209  $ (1,565 ) $1,644 $2,807  $ (1,539 ) $1,268
Amortization expense    $ 69   $ 68 $70
(a) The change in 2018 is primarily related to our acquisition of SodaStream.
Amortization of intangible assets for each of the next five years, based on existing intangible assets as of
December 29, 2018  and using average 2018  foreign exchange rates, is expected to be as follows:
 2019 2020 2021  2022 2023
Five-year projected amortization $ 89 $ 89 $ 87 $ 85 $ 83
Depreciable and amortizable assets are evaluated for impairment upon a significant change in the operating
or macroeconomic environment. In these circumstances, if an evaluation of the undiscounted cash flows
indicates impairment, the asset is written down to its estimated fair value, which is based on discounted
future
95
Table of Contents
cash flows. Useful lives are periodica lly evaluated to determine whether events or circumstances have
occurred which indicate the need for revision. For additional unaudited information on our policies for
amortizable brands,  see “Our Critical Accounting Policies” in Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of
Financial Condition and Results of Operations.
Indefinite-Lived Intangible Assets
We did not recogniz e any impairment charges for goodwill in each of the fiscal years ended December 29,
2018 , December 30, 2017  and December 31, 2016 . We recognized no material impairm ent charges
for indefinite-lived intangible assets in each of the fiscal years ended December 29, 2018 , December 30, 2017
and December 31, 2016 . As of December 29, 2018 , the estimated fair values of our indefinite-lived
reacquired and acquired franchise right s recorded at NAB exceeded their carrying values. However , there
could be an impairment of the carrying value of NAB’ s reacquired and acquired franchise rights if future
revenues and their contribution to the operating results of NAB’ s CSD business do not achieve our expected
future cash flows or if macroeconomic conditions result in a future increase in the weighted-average cost of
capital used to estimate fair value. We have also analyzed the impact of the macroeconomic conditions in
Russia and Brazil on the estimated fair value of our indefinite-lived intangible assets in these countries and
have conc luded that there were no material impairments for the year ended December 29, 2018 . However ,
there could be an impairment of the carrying value of certain brands in these countries if there is a
deterioration in these conditions, if future revenues and their contributions to the operating results do not
achieve our expected future cash flows, if there are significant changes in the decisions regarding assets that
do not perform consistent with our expectations, or if macroeconomic conditions result in a future increase in
the weighted-average cost of capital used to estimate fair value. For additional information on our policies for
indefinite-lived intangible assets, see Note 2.
96
Table of Contents
The change in the book value of indefinite-lived intangible assets is as follows:
Balance,
Beginning
2017  Translation
and OtherBalance,
End of
2017  Acquisitions/
(Divestitur es)  Translation
and OtherBalance,
End of
2018
FLNA    
Goodwill $ 270  $ 10 $ 280  $ 28 $ (11)$ 297
Brands 23 2 25 138  (2) 161
293  12 305  166  (13) 458
QFNA    
Goodwill 175  — 175  9 — 184
Brands — — — 25 — 25
 175  — 175  34 — 209
NAB  (a)   
Goodwill 9,843  11 9,854  — (41) 9,813
Reacquired franchise rights 7,064  62 7,126  — (68) 7,058
Acquired franchise rights 1,512  13 1,525  — (15) 1,510
Brands 314  39 353  — — 353
18,733  125 18,858  — (124) 18,734
Latin America    
Goodwill 553  2 555  — (46) 509
Brands 150  (9) 141  — (14) 127
703 (7) 696  — (60) 636
ESSA  (b)   
Goodwill 3,177  275 3,452  526  (367) 3,611
Reacquired franchise rights 488  61 549  (1) (51) 497
Acquired franchise rights 184  11 195  (25) (9) 161
Brands 2,358  187 2,545  1,993  (350) 4,188
6,207  534 6,741  2,493  (777) 8,457
AMENA     
Goodwill 412  16 428  — (34) 394
Brands 103  8 111 — (10) 101
515  24 539  — (44) 495
       
Total goodwill 14,430  314 14,744  563  (499) 14,808
Total reacquired franchise rights 7,552  123 7,675  (1) (119) 7,555
Total acquired franchise rights 1,696  24 1,720  (25) (24) 1,671
Total brands 2,948  227 3,175  2,156  (376) 4,955
$ 26,626  $ 688 $ 27,314  $ 2,693  $ (1,018 )$ 28,989
(a) The change in translation and other in 2018 primarily reflects the depreciation of the Canadian dollar .
(b) The change in acquisitions /(divestitures) in 2018 is primarily related to the preliminary allocation of the purchase price for our acquisition
of SodaStream . See Note 14 for further information. The change in translation and other in 2018 primarily reflects the depreciation of
the Russian ruble, euro and Pound sterling. The change in translation and other in 2017 primarily reflects the appreciation of the
Russian ruble and euro.
97
Table of Contents
Note 5 — Income Taxes
The components of income before income taxes are as follows:
  2018  2017 2016
United States  $ 3,864  $ 3,452 $ 2,630
Foreign  5,325  6,150 5,923
  $ 9,189  $ 9,602 $ 8,553
The (benefit from)/provision for income taxes consisted of the following:
 2018  2017 2016
Current: U.S. Federal $ 437  $ 4,925 $ 1,219
 Foreign 378  724 824
 State 63  136 77
  878  5,785 2,120
Deferred: U.S. Federal 140  (1,159 ) 109
 Foreign (4,379 ) (9) (33)
 State (9) 77 (22)
  (4,248 ) (1,091 ) 54
  $(3,370 ) $ 4,694 $ 2,174
A reconciliation of the U.S. Federal statutory tax rate to our annual tax rate is as follows:
 2018 2017  2016
U.S. Federal statutory tax rate 21.0 % 35.0 % 35.0 %
State income tax, net of U.S. Federal tax benefit 0.5 0.9  0.4
Lower taxes on foreign results (2.2) (9.4) (8.0)
One-time mandatory transition tax - TCJ Act 0.1 41.4  —
Remeasurement of deferred taxes - TCJ Act (0.4) (15.9 ) —
International reor ganizations (47.3 ) —  —
Tax settlements (7.8) —  —
Other , net (0.6) (3.1) (2.0)
Annual tax rate (36.7 )% 48.9 % 25.4 %
Tax Cuts and Jobs Act
During the fourth quarter of 2017, the TCJ Act was enacted in the United States . Among its many provisions,
the TCJ Act imposed a mandatory one-t ime transition tax on undistributed intern ational earnings and reduced
the U.S. corporate income tax rate from  35% to 21%, effective  January 1, 2018. As a result of the enactment
of the TCJ Act, we recognized a provis ional net tax expense of $2.5 billio n ($1.70  per share ) in the fourth
quarter of 2017. See further unaudited information in “Items Affecting Comparability” in Management’ s
Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations.
Included in the provisional net tax expense of $2.5 billio n recognize d in the fourth quarter of 2017, was a
provisional mandato ry one-time transition tax of approximately $4 billion  on undistributed international
earnings, included in other liabilities. This provisional mandatory one-time transition tax was partially offset
by a provisional $1.5 billion  benefit resulting from the required remeasurement of our deferred tax assets and
liabilities to the new, lower U.S. corporate income tax rate, effective Januar y 1, 2018. The effect of the
remeasurement was recorded in the fourth quarter of 2017, consistent with the enactment date of the TCJ Act,
and reflected in our provision for income taxes.
98
Table of Contents
During 2018, we recognized a net tax benefit of $28 millio n ($0.02  per share) primarily reflecting the impa ct
of the final analysis  of certain foreign exchange gains or losses, substantiation of foreign tax credits, as well
as cash and cash equivalents as of Nove mber 30, 2018, the tax year-end of our foreign subsidiaries, partially
offset by additional transition tax guidan ce issued by the United States Department of Treasury , as well as the
TCJ Act impact of both the conclusion of certain international tax audits and the resolution with the IRS of all
open matters related to the audits of taxable years 2012 and 2013, each discussed below .
As of December 29, 2018, our mandato ry transition tax liability is $3.8 billion . Under the provisio ns of the
TCJ Act, this transit ion tax liability must be paid over eight years; we currently  expect to pay approximately
$0.4 billion  of this liability in 2019 and the remainder over the period 2020 to 2026.
The TCJ Act also created a requirement that certain income earned by foreign subsidiaries, known as GILTI,
must be included in the gross income of their U.S. shareholder . The FASB allows an accounting policy
election of either recognizing deferred taxes for temporary differences expected to reverse as GILTI in future
years or recognizing such taxes as a current-period expense when incurred. During the first quarter of 2018,
we elected to treat the tax ef fect of GIL TI as a current-period expense when incurred.
In 2017, the SEC issued guidance related to the TCJ Act which allowed recording of provisional tax expense
using a measuremen t period, not to exceed one year, when information necessar y to complete the accounting
for the effects of the TCJ Act is not available. We elected to apply the measurement period provisions of this
guidance to certain income tax effects of the TCJ Act when it became effective in the fourth quarter of 2017.
The provisional measurement period ended in the fourth quarter of 2018. While our accounting for the
recorded impact of the TCJ Act is deemed to be complete, these amounts are based on prevailing regulations
and currently available information, and any additional guidance issued by the IRS could impact the
aforementioned amounts in future periods.
For further unaudited information and discussion, refer to “Item 1A. Risk Factors,” “Our Business Risks,”
“Our Liqu idity and Capital Resources” and “Our Critical Accounting Policies”  in Management’ s Discussion
and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations. 
International Reorganizations
During the fourth quarter of 2018, we reorganized certain of our international operations, including the
intercompany transfer of certain intangible assets. As a result, we recognized other net tax benefits of $4.3
billion  ($3.05  per share). The related deferred tax asset of $4.4 billion  is expected to be amortized over a
period of 15 years  beginning in 2019. Additionally , the reorganization generated significant net operating loss
carryforwards and related deferred tax assets that are not expected to be realized , resulting in the recording of
a full valuation allowance.
99
Table of Contents
Deferred tax liabilities and assets are comprised of the following:
Deferred T ax Liabilities
 2018  2017
Debt guarantee of wholly-owned subsidiary $ 578  $ 578
Property , plant and equipment 1,303  1,397
Intangible assets other than nondeductible goodwill —  3,169
Recapture of net operating losses 414  —
Other 71  50
Gross deferred tax liabilities 2,366  5,194
Deferred tax assets  
Net carryforwards 4,353  1,400
Intangible assets other than nondeductible goodwill 985  —
Share-based compensation 106  107
Retiree medical benefits 167  198
Other employee-related benefits 303  338
Pension benefits 221  22
Deductible state tax and interest benefits 110  157
Other 739  893
Gross deferred tax assets 6,984  3,115
Valuation allowances (3,753 ) (1,163 )
Deferred tax assets, net 3,231  1,952
Net deferred tax (assets)/liabilities $ (865) $ 3,242
A summary of our valuation allowance activity is as follows:
 2018 2017 2016
Balance, beginning of year $ 1,163 $ 1,110 $ 1,136
Provision 2,639 33 13
Other (deductions)/additions (49) 20 (39)
Balance, end of year $ 3,753 $ 1,163 $ 1,110
For additional unaudited information on our income tax policies, including our reserves for income taxes, see
“Our Critical Accounting Policies” in Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and
Results of Operations.
Reserves
A number of years may elapse before a particular matter , for which we have established a reserve, is audited
and finally  resolved. The number of years with open tax audits varies dependin g on the tax jurisdiction. Our
major taxing jurisdictions and the related open tax audits are as follows:
Jurisdiction  Years Open to AuditYears Currently
Under Audit
United States  2014-2017 2014-2016
Mexico  2017 None
United Kingdom  2016-2017 None
Canada (Domestic)  2014-2017 2014-2015
Canada (International)  2010-2017 2010-2015
Russia  2014-2017 2014-2017
100
Table of Contents
During 2018, we recognized a non-cash tax benefit of $364 million  ($0.26  per share) resulting from the
conclusion of certain international tax audits. Additionally , during 2018, we recognized non-cash tax benefits
of $353 milli on ($0.24  per share)  as a result of our agreement with the IRS resolving all open matters related
to the audits of taxable years 2012 and 2013, including the associated state impact.
While it is often difficult to predict the final outcome or the timing of resolution  of any particular tax matter ,
we believe that our reserves reflect the probable outcome of known tax contingencies. We adjust these
reserves, as well as the related interest, in light of changing facts and circumstances. Settlement of any
particular issue would usually require  the use of cash. Favorable resolution would be recognized as a
reduction to our annual tax rate in the year of resolution. For further unaudited  information on the impact of
the resolution of open tax issues, see “Other Consolidated Results” in Management’ s Discussion and Analysis
of Financial Condition and Results of Operations.
As of December 29, 2018 , the total gross amount of reserves for income taxes, reported in other liabilit ies,
was $1.4 billion . We accrue interest related to reserves for income taxes in our provision for income taxes and
any associated penalties are recorded in selling, general and administrative expenses. The gross amount of
interest accrued, reported in other liabilities, was $179 million  as of December 29, 2018 , which reflects a
reduction of the prior year liability of $64 millio n of tax benefit that was recognized in 2018 . The gross
amount of interest accrued, reported in other liabilities, was $283 million  as of December 30, 2017 , of which
$89 million  of expense was recognized in 2017 .
A reconciliation of unrecognized tax benefits is as follows:
 2018  2017
Balance, beginning of year $ 2,212  $ 1,885
Additions for tax positions related to the current year 142  309
Additions for tax positions from prior years 197  86
Reductions for tax positions from prior years (822) (51)
Settlement payments (233) (4)
Statutes of limitations expiration (42) (33)
Translation and other (14) 20
Balance, end of year $ 1,440  $ 2,212
Carryforwards and Allowances
Operating loss carryforwards totaling $24.9 billion  at year-end 2018  are being carried forward in a number of
foreign and state jurisdictions where we are permitted to use tax operating losses from prior periods to reduce
future taxable income. These operating losses will expire as follows: $0.2 billio n in 2019 , $20.5 billion
between 2020  and 2038 and $4.2 billio n may be carried forward indefinitely . We establish valuation
allowances for our deferred tax assets if, based on the available evidence, it is more likely than not that some
portion or all of the deferred tax assets will not be realized.
Undistributed International Earnings
In connec tion with the enactment of the TCJ Act, during 2018, we repatriate d $20.4 billion of cash, cash
equivalents and short-term investments held in our foreign subsidiaries without such funds being subject to
further U.S. federal income tax liability . As of December 29, 2018 , we had approximately $24 billion  of
undistributed intern ational earnings. We intend to continue to reinvest $24 billio n of earnings outside the
United States for the foreseeable future and while U.S. federal tax expense has been recognized as a result of
the TCJ Act, no deferred tax liabilities with respect to items such as certain foreign exchange gains or
101
Table of Contents
losses, foreign withholding taxes or state taxes have been recognized. It is not practicable for us to determine
the amount of unrecognized tax expense on these reinvested international earnings.
Note 6 — Shar e-Based Compensation
Our share-based compensation program  is designed to attract and retain employees while also aligning
employees’  interests with the interests of our shareholders. PepsiCo has granted stock options, restricted stock
units (RSUs), performance stock units (PSUs), PepsiCo equity performance units (PEPunits) and long-term
cash awar ds to employees under the shareholder -approved PepsiCo, Inc. Long -Term Incentive Plan (LTIP).
Executives who are awarded long-term incentives based on their performance may generally elect to receive
their grant in the form of stock option s or RSUs, or a combination thereof. Executives who elect stock
options receive four stock options for every one RSU that would have otherwise been granted. Certain
executive officers and other senior executives do not have a choice and were granted 66% PSUs and 34%
long-term cash, each of which are subject to pre-established performance tar gets.
The Company may use authorized and unissued shares to meet share requirements resulting from the exercise
of stock options and the vesting of RSUs, PSUs and PEPunits.
As of December 29, 2018 , 66 million  shares were availab le for future share-b ased compensation grants under
the L TIP.
The following table summarizes our total share-based compensation expense and excess tax benefits
recognized:
 2018 2017  2016
Share-based compensation expense - equity awards $ 256 $ 292  $ 284
Share-based compensation expense - liability awards 20 13  5
Restructuring and impairment char ges (6) (2) 5
Total $ 270 $ 303  $ 294
Income tax benefits recognized in earnings related to share-based
compensation $ 45 $ 89(a) $ 91
Excess tax benefits related to share-based compensation (b)$ 48 $ 115  $ 110
(a) Reflects tax rates ef fective for the 2017 tax year .
(b) Included in provision for income taxes in the income statement in 2018 and 2017; included in capital in excess of par value in the equity
statement in 2016.
As of December 29, 2018 , there was $282 million of total unrecognized compensation cost related to
nonvested share-based compensation grants. This unrecognized compensation cost is expected to be
recognized over a weighted-average period of two years.
Method of Accounting and Our Assumptions
The fair value of share-based award grants is amortized to expense over the vesting period, primarily three
years. Awards to employees eligible for retirement prior to the award becoming fully vested are amortized to
expense over the period through the date that the employee first becomes eligible to retire and is no longer
required to provide service to earn the award. In addition, we use historical data to estimate forfeiture rates
and record share-based compensation expense only for those awards that are expected to vest.
We do not backdate , reprice or grant share-based compensation awards retroa ctively . Repricing of awards
would require shareholder approval under the L TIP.
102
Table of Contents
Stock Options
A stock option permits the holder to purchase shares of PepsiCo common stock at a specified price. We
account for our employee stock option s under the fair value method of accou nting using a Black-Scholes
valuation model to measure stock option  expense at the date of grant. All stock option grants have an exercise
price equal to the fair market value of our common stock on the date of grant and generally have a 10-year
term.
Our weighted-average Black-Scholes fair value assumptions are as follows:
2018 2017 2016
Expected life 5 years 5 years 6 years
Risk-free interest rate 2.6% 2.0% 1.4%
Expected volatility 12% 11% 12%
Expected dividend yield 2.7% 2.7% 2.7%
The expected life is the period over which our employee groups are expected to hold their options. It is based
on our historical experience with similar grants. The risk-free interest rate is based on the expected U.S.
Treasury rate over the expected life. Volatility reflects movements in our stock price over the most recent
historical period equivalent to the expected life. Dividend yield is estimated over the expected life based on
our stated dividend policy and forecasts of net income, share repurchases and stock price.
A summary of our stock option activity for the year ended December 29, 2018  is as follows:
 Options(a)Weighted-
Average
Exer cise
PriceWeighted-
Average
Contractual
Life
Remaining
(years)Aggr egate
Intrinsic
Value(b)
Outstanding at December 30, 2017 19,013 $ 74.23  
Granted 1,429 $ 108.88  
Exercised (4,377 )$ 62.95  
Forfeited/expired (476)$ 94.85  
Outstanding at December  29, 2018 15,589 $ 79.94 4.29 $474,746
Exer cisable at December  29, 2018 11,547 $ 70.74 2.92 $457,529
Expected to vest as of December  29, 2018 3,713 $ 106.02 8.17 $ 16,606
(a) Options are in thousands and include options previously granted under the PBG plan. No additional option s or shares were granted under the
PBG plan after 2009.
(b) In thousands.
Restricted Stock Units and Performance Stock Units
Each RSU represents our obligation to deliver to the holder one share of Peps iCo common stock when the
award vests at the end of the service period. PSUs are awards pursuant to which a number of shares are
delivered to the holder upon vesting at the end of the service period based on PepsiCo’ s performance against
specified financial and/or operational performance metrics. The number of shares may be increased to the
maximum or reduced to the minimum threshold based on the results of these performance metrics in
accordance with the terms established at the time of the award. During the vesting period, RSUs and PSUs
accrue dividend equivalents that pay out in cash (without interest) if and when the applicable RSU or PSU
vests and becomes payable.
The fair value of RSUs is measured at the market price of the Company’ s stock on the date of grant. The fair
103
Table of Contents
value of PSUs is measured at the market price of the Company’ s stock on the date of grant with the
exception of awards with market conditions, for which we use the Monte-Carlo simulation model to
determine the fair value. The Monte-Carlo simulation model uses the same input assumptions as the Black-
Scholes model; however , it also further incorporates into the fair-value determination the possibility that the
market condition may not be satisfied. Compensation costs related to these awards are recognized regardless
of whether the market condition is satisfied, provided that the requisite service has been provided.
A summary of our RSU and PSU activity for the year ended December 29, 2018 is as follows:
RSUs/PSUs(a)Weighted-
Average
Grant-Date
Fair ValueWeighted-
Average
Contractual
Life
Remaining
(years)Aggr egate
Intrinsic
Value(a)
Outstanding at December 30, 2017 7,293 $ 102.30   
Granted (b)2,634 $ 108.75   
Converted (2,362 )$ 99.73   
Forfeited (647)$ 105.21   
Actual performance change (c)257 $ 98.92   
Outstanding at December  29, 2018 (d)7,175 $ 105.13 1.22 $791,878
Expected to vest as of December  29, 2018 6,667 $ 104.90 1.15 $735,813
(a) In thousands.
(b) Grant activity for all PSUs are disclosed at tar get.
(c) Reflects the net number of PSUs above and below tar get levels based on actual performance measured at the end of the performance period.
(d) The outstanding PSUs for which the performance period has not ended as of December 29, 2018 , at the threshold, target and maximum
award levels were zero, 0.9 million  and 1.6 million , respectively .
PEPunits
PEPunits provide an opportunity to earn shares of PepsiCo common stock with a value that adjusts based
upon changes in PepsiCo’ s absolute stock price as well as PepsiCo’ s Total Shareholder Return relative to the
S&P 500 over a three -year performance period.
The fair value of PEPunits is measured using the Monte-Carlo simulation model.
PEPunits were last granted in 2015 and all 248,000  units outstanding at December 30, 2017 , with a weighted
average grant date fair value of $68.94 , were converted to 278,000  shares during fiscal year 2018.
Long-T erm Cash
Certain executive officers and other senior executives were granted long-term  cash awards for which final
payout is based on PepsiCo’ s Total Shareholder Return relative to a specific set of peer companies and
achievement of a specified performance tar get over a three-year performance period.
Long-term cash awards that qualify as liability awards under share-based comp ensation guidance are valued
through the end of the performance period on a mark-to-market basis using the Monte Carlo simulation
model until actual performance is determined.
104
Table of Contents
A summary of our long-term cash activity for the year ended December 29, 2018  is as follows:
 Long-T erm
Cash
Award(a)Balance Sheet
Date Fair
Value(a)Contractual
Life
Remaining
(years)
Outstanding at December 30, 2017 $ 33,200   
Granted (b)20,926   
Forfeited (2,292 )  
Actual performance change (c)2,876   
Outstanding at December  29, 2018 (d) $ 54,710 $ 55,809 1.22
Expected to vest as of December  29, 2018 $ 51,159 $ 52,148 1.17
(a) In thousands.
(b) Grant activity for all long-term cash awards are disclosed at tar get.
(c) Reflects the net number of long-term cash awards above and below target levels based on actual performance measured at the end of the
performance period.
(d) The outstandi ng long-term  cash awards for which the performance period has not ended as of December 29, 2018, at the threshold, target and
maximum award levels were zero, 37.3 million and 74.5 million, respectively .
Other Share-Based Compensation Data
The following is a summary of other share-based compensation data:
 2018  2017 2016
Stock Options    
Total number of options granted (a)1,429  1,481 1,743
Weighted-average grant-date fair value of options granted $ 9.80  $ 8.25 $ 6.94
Total intrinsic value of options exercised (a)$224,663  $327,860 $290,131
Total grant-date fair value of options vested (a)$15,506  $23,122 $18,840
RSUs/PSUs    
Total number of RSUs/PSUs granted (a)2,634  2,824 3,054
Weighted-average grant-date fair value of RSUs/PSUs granted $108.75  $109.92 $ 99.06
Total intrinsic value of RSUs/PSUs converted (a)$260,287  $380,269 $359,401
Total grant-date fair value of RSUs/PSUs vested (a)$232,141  $264,923 $257,648
PEPunits    
Total intrinsic value of PEPunits converted (a)$30,147  $39,782 $38,558
Total grant-date fair value of PEPunits vested (a)$ 9,430  $18,833 $16,572
(a) In thousands.
As of December 29, 2018  and December 30, 2017 , there were approximately 248,000  and 250,000
outstanding awards,  respectively , consisting primarily of phantom stock units that were granted under the
PepsiCo Director Deferral Program and will be settled in shares of PepsiCo common stock pursuant to the
LTIP at the end of the applicable deferral period, not included in the tables above.
Note 7 — Pension, Retir ee Medical and Savings Plans
Effective January 1, 2017, the U.S. qualified defined benefit pension plans were reorganized into Plan A and
Plan I. Actuarial gains and losses associated with Plan A are amortized over the average remaining service
life of the active participants, while the actuarial gains and losses associated with Plan I are amortized over
the remaining life expectancy of the inactive participants. As a result of this change, the pre-tax net periodic
105
Table of Contents
benefit cost decreased by $42 million  ($27 million  after-tax, reflecting tax rates effective for the 2017 tax
year, or $0.02 per share ) in 2017, primarily impacting corporate unallocated expenses. See “Our Critical
Accounting Policies ” in Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financi al Condition and Results of
Operations.
In 2016, the U.S. qualified defined benefit pension plans purchased a group annuity contract whereby an
unrelated insurance company assumed the obligation to pay and administer future annuity payments for
certain retirees. In 2016, we made discretionary contributions of $452 million  primarily to fund the transfer of
the obliga tion. This transaction triggere d a pre-tax settlement charge of $242 milli on ($162 milli on after-tax
or $0.11 per share). See additional unaudit ed information in “Items Affecting Comparability” in
Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations.
Gains and losses resulting from actual experience differing from our assumpti ons, including the difference
between the actual return on plan assets and the expected return on plan assets, as well as changes in our
assumptions, are determined at each measurement date. These differences are recognized as a component of
net gain or loss in accumulated other comprehensive loss. If this net accumulated gain or loss exceeds 10% of
the greate r of the market-related value of plan assets or plan liabilities, a portion of the net gain or loss is
included in other pension and retiree medical benefits income/(expense) for the following year based upon
the average remaining service life for participants in Plan A (approximately 10 years) and retiree medical
(approximately 7 years), or the remaining life expectancy for participants in Plan I (approximate ly 25 years).
The cost or benefit of plan changes that increase or decrease benefits for prior employee service (prior service
cost/(credit)) is included in other pension and retiree medical benefits income/(expense) on a straight-line
basis over the average remaining servic e life for participants in Plan A or the remaining life expectancy for
participants in Plan I.
106
Table of Contents
Selected financial information for our pension and retiree medical plans is as follows:  
 Pension Retir ee Medical
 U.S. International   
 2018  2017 2018 2017 2018 2017
Change in projected benefit liability     
Liability at beginning of year $14,777  $13,192 $ 3,490 $ 3,124 $ 1,187 $ 1,208
Service cost 431  401 92 91 32 28
Interest cost 482  468 93 89 34 36
Plan amendments 83 10 2 2 — (5)
Participant contributions — — 2 2 — —
Experience (gain)/loss (972) 1,529 (230) 5 (147) 21
Benefit payments (956) (825) (114) (104) (108) (107)
Settlement/curtailment (74) (58) (35) (22) — —
Special termination benefits 36 60 2 — 1 2
Other , including foreign currency adjustment — — (204) 303 (3) 4
Liability at end of year $13,807  $14,777 $ 3,098 $ 3,490 $ 996 $ 1,187
     
Change in fair value of plan assets     
Fair value at beginning of year $12,582  $11,458 $ 3,460 $ 2,894 $ 321 $ 320
Actual return on plan assets (789) 1,935 (136) 288 (21) 52
Employer contributions/funding 1,495  60 120 104 93 56
Participant contributions — — 2 2 — —
Benefit payments (956) (825) (114) (104) (108) (107)
Settlement (74) (46) (32) (18) — —
Other , including foreign currency adjustment — — (210) 294 — —
Fair value at end of year $12,258  $12,582 $ 3,090 $ 3,460 $ 285 $ 321
Funded status $ (1,549 ) $ (2,195 )$ (8)$ (30)$ (711)$ (866)
 
Amounts recognized      
Other assets $ 185  $ 286  $ 81 $ 85 $ — $ —
Other current liabilities (107) (74) (1) (1) (41) (75)
Other liabilities (1,627 ) (2,407 ) (88) (114) (670) (791)
Net amount recognized $ (1,549 ) $ (2,195 ) $ (8)$ (30)$ (711)$ (866)
      
Amounts included in accumulated other comprehensive loss (pre-tax)    
Net loss/(gain) $ 4,093  $ 3,520  $ 780 $ 782 $ (287)$ (189)
Prior service cost/(credit) 109  29 (1) (3) (51) (71)
Total $ 4,202  $ 3,549  $ 779 $ 779 $ (338)$ (260)
      
Changes recognized in net loss/(gain) included in other comprehensive loss  
Net loss/(gain) arising in current year $ 760  $ 431  $ 103 $ (115)$ (107)$ (9)
Amortization and settlement recognition (187) (131) (56) (60) 8 12
Foreign currency translation (gain)/loss — — (49) 73 1 1
Total $ 573  $ 300  $ (2)$ (102)$ (98)$ 4
      
Accumulated benefit obligation at end of year $12,890  $13,732  $ 2,806 $ 2,985   
The net loss/(gain) arising in the current year is attributed to actual asset returns different from expected
returns, partially of fset by the change in discount rate.
107
Table of Contents
The amount we report in operating profit as pension and retiree medical cost is service cost, which is the
value of benefits earned by employees for working during the year .
The amounts we report below operating profit as pension and retiree medical cost consist of the following
components:
•Interest cost is the accrued interest on the projected benefit obligation due to the passage of time.
•Expected return on plan assets is the long-term return we expect to earn on plan investments for our
funded plans that will be used to settle future benefit obligations.
•Amortization of prior service cost/(cre dit) represents the recognition in the income statement of
benefit changes resulting from plan amendments.
•Amortization of net loss/(gain) represen ts the recognition in the income statement of changes in the
amount of plan asset s and the projected benefit obligation based on changes in assumptions and actual
experience.
•Settlement/curtailment loss/(gain) represents the result of actions that effectiv ely eliminate all or a
portion of related projected benefit obligations. Settlements are triggered when payouts to settle the
projected benefit obligation of a plan due to lump sums or other events exceed the annual service and
interest cost. Settlements are recognize d when actions are irrevocable and we are relieved of the
primary responsibility and risk for projected benefit obligations. Curtailments are due to events such
as plant closures or the sale of a business resulting in a reduction of future service or benefits.
Curtailment losses are recognized when  an event is probable and estimable, while curtailment gains
are recognized when an event has occur red (when the related employees terminate or an amendment
is adopted).
•Special termination benefits are the additional benefits offered to employees upon departure due to
actions such as restructuring.
The components of total pension and retiree medical benefit costs are as follows:
 Pension  Retir ee Medical
 U.S. International       
 2018  2017  2016 2018 2017  2016  2018  2017  2016
Service cost $431  $401  $393 $ 92 $ 91 $ 80 $ 32 $ 28 $ 31
Interest cost 482  468  484 93 89 94 34 36 41
Expected return on plan assets (943) (849) (834) (197) (176) (163) (19) (22) (24)
Amortization of prior service cost/(credits) 3 1 (1) — — — (20) (25) (38)
Amortization of net losses/(gains) 179  123  168 45 53 40 (8) (12) (1)
 152  144  210 33 57 51 19 5 9
Settlement/curtailment losses/(gain) (a)8 8 245 6 11 9 — — (14)
Special termination benefits 36 60 11 2 — 1 1 2 1
Total $196  $212  $466 $ 41 $ 68 $ 61 $ 20 $ 7 $ (4)
(a) U.S. includes  a settlement charge of $242 million  related to the group annuity contract purchase in 2016. See additional unaudited
information in “Items Affecting Comparability” in Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations.
108
Table of Contents
The following table provides the weighted-average assumptions used to determine projected benefit liability
and net periodic benefit cost for our pension and retiree medical plans:
 Pension  Retir ee Medical
 U.S. International      
 2018  2017 2016 2018  2017 2016  2018 2017  2016
Liability discount rate 4.4% 3.7% 4.4% 3.4% 3.0% 3.1% 4.2% 3.5% 4.0%
Service cost discount rate 3.8% 4.5% 4.6% 3.5% 3.6% 4.1% 3.6% 4.0% 4.3%
Interest cost discount rate 3.4% 3.7% 3.8% 2.8% 2.8% 3.5% 3.0% 3.2% 3.3%
Expected return on plan
assets 7.2% 7.5% 7.5% 6.0% 6.0% 6.2% 6.5% 7.5% 7.5%
Liability rate of salary
increases 3.1% 3.1% 3.1% 3.7% 3.7% 3.6%   
Expense rate of salary
increases 3.1% 3.1% 3.1% 3.7% 3.6% 3.6%   
The following table provides selected information about plans with accumulated benefit obligation and total
projected benefit liability in excess of plan assets:
 Pension Retir ee Medical
 U.S. International   
 2018  2017 2018 2017 2018 2017
Selected information for plans with accumulated benefit obligation in excess of plan assets   
Liability for service to date $ (8,040 ) $ (8,355 )$ (155)$ (161)  
Fair value of plan assets $ 7,223  $ 6,919 $ 121 $ 119   
Selected information for plans with projected benefit liability in excess of plan assets   
Benefit liability $ (8,957 ) $ (9,400 )$ (514)$ (1,273 )$ (996)$ (1,187 )
Fair value of plan assets $ 7,223  $ 6,919 $ 426 $ 1,158 $ 285 $ 321
Of the total projecte d pension benefit liability as of December 29, 2018 , approximately $830 milli on relates
to plans that we do not fund because the funding of such plans does not receive favorable tax treatment.
Future Benefit Payments
Our estimated future benefit payments are as follows:
 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 - 2028
Pension $ 1,060 $ 960 $ 875 $ 915 $ 950$ 5,265
Retiree medical (a)$ 115 $ 105 $ 100 $ 100 $ 95$ 395
(a) Expected future benefit payments for our retiree medical plans do not reflect any estimated subsidies expected to be received under the 2003
Medicare Act. Subsidies are expected to be approximately $2 milli on for each of the years from 2019  throug h 2023  and approxim ately $6
million  in total for 2024 through 2028.
These future benefit payments to beneficiaries include payments from both funded and unfunded plans.
Funding
Contributions to our pension and retiree medical plans were as follows:
 Pension Retiree Medical
 2018 2017 2016 2018 2017 2016
Discretionary (a)$ 1,417$ 6$ 459$ 37 $ — $ —
Non-discretionary 198 158 200 56 56 36
Total $ 1,615$ 164$ 659$ 93 $ 56 $ 36
(a) Includes $1.4 billion contribution in 2018 to fund Plan A in the United States. Includes $452 million in 2016 relating to the funding of the
group annuity contract purchase from an unrelated insurance company .
109
Table of Contents
In January  2019, we made discretionar y contributions of $150 millio n to Plan A in the United States. In
addition, in 2019, we expect to make non-discretionary contributions of approximately $205 million  to our
U.S. and international pension benefit plans and approximately $40 million  for retiree  medical benefits. We
regularly evaluate opportunities to reduce risk and volatility associated with our pension and retiree medical
plans.
Plan Assets
Our pension plan investment strategy  includes the use of actively managed accounts and is reviewed
periodically in conjunction with plan liabilities, an evaluation of market cond itions, tolerance for risk and
cash requirements for benefit payments. This strategy is also applicable to funds held for the retiree medical
plans. Our investment objective includes ensuring that funds are available  to meet the plans’  benefit
obligations when they become due. Assets contributed to our pension plans are no longer controlled by us,
but become the property of our individual pension plans. However , we are indirectly impacted by changes in
these plan assets as compared to changes in our projected liabilities. Our overall investment policy is to
prudently invest plan assets in a well-diversified portfolio of equity and high-quality debt securities and real
estate to achieve our long-term return expectations. Our investment policy also permits the use of derivative
instruments, such as futures and forward contracts, to reduce interest rate and foreign currency risks. Futures
contracts represent commitments to purchase or sell securities at a future date and at a specified price.
Forward contracts consist of currency forwards.
For 2019  and 2018 , our expected long- term rate of return on U.S. plan assets is 7.1%  and 7.2% , respectiv ely.
Our tar get investment allocations for U.S. plan assets are as follows:
 2019 2018
Fixed income 47% 47%
U.S. equity 29% 29%
International equity 20% 20%
Real estate 4% 4%
Actual investment allocations may vary from our target investment allocations due to prevailing market
conditions. We regularly review our actual investment allocations and periodically rebalance our investments.
The expected return on plan assets is based on our investment strategy and our expectations for long-term
rates of return by asset class, taking into account volatility and correlation among asset classes and our
historical experience . We also review current levels of interest rates and inflation  to assess the reasonableness
of the long-term rates. We evaluate our expected return assumptions annually to ensure that they are
reasonable. To calculate the expected return on plan assets, our market-related value of assets for fixed
income is the actual  fair value. For all other asset categories, such as equity securities, we use a method that
recognizes investme nt gains or losses (the difference between the expected and actual return based on the
market-related value of assets) over a five-year period. This has the ef fect of reducing year -to-year volatility .
110
Table of Contents
Plan assets measured at fair value as of fiscal year-end 2018  and 2017  are categorized consistently by level,
and are as follows:
 2018 2017
 Total  Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical Assets
(Level 1)  Significant
Other
Observable
Inputs (Level 2)  Significant
Unobservable
Inputs (Level 3) Total
U.S. plan assets (a)      
Equity securities, including preferred stock (b)$ 5,605  $ 5,595  $ 10 $ — $ 6,904
Government securities (c)1,674  — 1,674  — 1,365
Corporate bonds (c)4,145  — 4,145  — 3,429
Mortgage-backed securities (c)212  — 212  — 217
Contracts with insurance companies (d)9 — — 9 8
Cash and cash equivalents 215  215  — — 236
Sub-total U.S. plan assets 11,860  $ 5,810  $ 6,041  $ 9 12,159
Real estate commingled funds measured at net
asset value (e)618     675
Dividends and interest receivable, net of
payables 65    69
Total U.S. plan assets $ 12,543     $ 12,903
International plan assets       
Equity securities (b)$ 1,651  $ 1,621  $ 30 $ — $ 1,928
Government securities (c)433  — 433  — 492
Corporate bonds (c)478  — 478  — 493
Fixed income commingled funds (f)356  356  — — 383
Contracts with insurance companies (d)36 — — 36 36
Cash and cash equivalents 27 27 — — 19
Sub-total international plan assets 2,981  $ 2,004  $ 941  $ 36 3,351
Real estate commingled funds measured at net
asset value (e)102     102
Dividends and interest receivable 7    7
Total international plan assets $ 3,090     $ 3,460
(a)2018 and 2017 amounts include $285 million and $321 million, respectively, of retiree medical plan assets that are restricted for purposes of
providing health benefits for U.S. retirees and their beneficiaries.
(b)The equity securities portfolio was invested in U.S. and international common stock and commingled funds, and the preferred stock portfolio in the
U.S. was invested in domestic and international corporate preferred stock investments. The common stock is based on quoted prices in active
markets. The U.S. commingled funds are based on fair values of the investments owned by these funds that are benchmarked against various U.S.
large, mid-cap and small company indices, and includes one large-cap fund that represents 15% and 19% of total U.S. plan assets for 2018 and 2017,
respectively. The international commingled funds are based on the fair values of the investments owned by these funds that track various non-U.S.
equity indices. The preferred stock investments are based on quoted bid prices for comparable securities in the marketplace and broker/dealer quotes
in active markets.
(c)These investments are based on quoted bid prices for comparable securities in the marketplace and broker/dealer quotes in active markets. Corporate
bonds of U.S.-based companies represent 28% and 23% of total U.S. plan assets for 2018 and 2017, respectively.
(d)Based on the fair value of the contracts as determined by the insurance companies using inputs that are not observable. The changes in Level 3
amounts were not significant in the years ended December 29, 2018 and December 30, 2017.
(e)The real estate commingled funds include investments in limited partnerships. These funds are based on the net asset value of the appraised value of
investments owned by these funds as determined by independent third parties using inputs that are not observable. The majority of the funds are
redeemable quarterly subject to availability of cash and have notice periods ranging from 45 to 90 days.
(f)Based on the fair value of the investments owned by these funds that track various government and corporate bond indices.
Retiree Medical Cost T rend Rates
 2019  2018
Average increase assumed 6% 6%
Ultimate projected increase 5% 5%
Year of ultimate projected increase 2039 2039
111
Table of Contents
These assumed health care cost trend rates have an impact on the retiree medic al plan expense and liability ,
however the cap on our share of retiree medical costs limits the impact.
Savings Plan
Certain U.S. employees are eligible to participate in a 401(k) savings plan, which is a voluntary defined
contribution plan. The plan is designed to help employees accumulate savings for retirement, and we make
Company matching contributions for certain employees on a portion of eligible pay based on years of service.
Certain U.S. salaried employees, who are not eligible to participate in a defined benefit pension plan, are also
eligible to receive an employer contribution to the 401(k) savings plan based on age and years of service
regardless of employee contribution.
In 2018 , 2017  and 2016 , our total Company contributions were $180 million , $176 million  and $164 million ,
respectively .
For additional unaudited information on our pension and retiree medical plans and related accounting policies
and assumptions, see “Our Critical Accounting Policies” in Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of
Financial Condition and Results of Operations.
Note 8 — Debt Obligations
The following table summarizes the Company’ s debt obligations:
 2018(a) 2017(a)
Short-term debt obligations (b) 
Current maturities of long-term debt $ 3,953  $ 4,020
Commercial paper (1.3%) —  1,385
Other borrowings (6.0% and 4.7%) 73  80
 $ 4,026  $ 5,485
Long-term debt obligations (b) 
Notes due 2018 (2.4%) $ —  $ 4,016
Notes due 2019 (3.1% and 2.1%) 3,948  3,933
Notes due 2020 (3.9% and 3.1%) 3,784  3,792
Notes due 2021 (3.1% and 2.4%) 3,257  3,300
Notes due 2022 (2.8% and 2.6%) 3,802  3,853
Notes due 2023 (2.9% and 2.4%) 1,270  1,257
Notes due 2024-2047 (3.7% and 3.8%) 16,161  17,634
Other , due 2018-2026 (1.3% and 1.3%) 26  31
 32,248  37,816
Less: current maturities of long-term debt obligations (3,953 ) (4,020 )
Total $28,295  $33,796
(a) Amounts are shown net of unamortized net discounts of $119 million  and $155 million  for 2018 and 2017, respectively .
(b) The interest rates presente d reflect weighted-average effective interest rates at year-end. Certain of our fixed rate indebtedness have been
swapped to floating rates through the use of interest rate derivative instruments. See Note 9 for additional  information regarding our interest
rate derivative instruments.
As of December 29, 2018 , our international debt of $62 million  was related to borrowings from external
parties including various lines of credit. These lines of credit are subject to normal banking terms and
conditions and are fully committed at least to the extent of our borrowings.
112
Table of Contents
In 2018 , we comp leted a cash tender offer for certain notes issued by PepsiCo and predecessors to a PepsiCo
subsidiary for $1.6 billion  in cash to redeem the following amounts:
Inter est
Rate Maturity Date  Amount
Tender ed
7.290 %September
2026  $ 11
7.440 %September
2026  $ 4
7.000 % March 2029  $ 357
5.500 % May 2035  $ 138
4.875 %November
2040  $ 410
5.500 % January 2040  $ 408
We also completed an exchange offer for certain notes issued by predecessors to a PepsiCo subsidiary for the
following newly issued PepsiCo notes. These notes were issued in an aggregate principal amount equal to the
exchanged notes:
Inter est
Rate  Maturity Date Amount
7.290 % September
2026 $ 88
7.440 % September
2026 $ 21
7.000 % March 2029 $ 516
5.500 % May 2035 $ 107
As a resul t of the above transactions, we recorded a pre-tax charge of $253 milli on ($191 milli on after-tax or
$0.13  per share) to interest expense, primarily representing the tender price paid over the carrying value of
the tendered notes. See further unaudited information in “Items Affecting Comparability” in Management’ s
Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations.
In 2018, we entered into a new five-year  unsecured revolving credit agreement (Five-Y ear Credit Agreement)
which expires on June 4, 2023. The Five-Y ear Credit Agreement enables us and our borrowing subsidiaries to
borrow up to $3.75 billion , subject to customary terms and conditions. We may request that commitments
under this agreement be increased up to $4.5 billion . Additionally , we may, once a year, request renewal of
the agreement for an additional one-year period.
Also in 2018, we entered into a new 364-day unsecured revolving credit agreement (364-Day Credit
Agreement) which expires on June 3, 2019. The 364-Day Credit Agreement enables us and our borrowing
subsidiaries to borrow up to $3.75 billion , subject to customary terms and conditions. We may request that
commitments under this agreement be increased up to $4.5 billion . We may request renewal of this facility
for an additional 364-day period or convert any amounts outstanding into a term loan for a period of up to
one year, which would mature no later than the anniversary of the then effective termination date. The Five-
Year Cred it Agreem ent and the 364-Day Credit Agreement together replaced our $3.75 billion five-year
credit agreement and our $3.75 billion  364-day credit agreement, both dated as of June 5, 2017. Funds
borrowed under the Five-Y ear Credit Agreement and the 364-Day Credit Agree ment may be used for general
corporate purposes. Subject to certain conditions, we may borrow , prepay and reborrow amounts under these
agreements. As of December 29, 2018 , there were no outstanding borrowing s under the Five-Y ear Credit
Agreement or the 364-Day Credit Agreement.
In 2016, we paid $2.5 billio n to redeem  all of our outstanding 7.900%  senior notes due 2018 and 5.125%
senior notes due 2019 for the principal amounts of $1.5 billion  and $750 million , respectively , and terminated
certain interest rate swaps. As a result, we recorded a pre-tax charge of $233 milli on ($156 milli on after-tax
or $0.11 per share) to interest expense, primarily representing the premium paid in accordance with the
113
Table of Contents
“make-whole” redemption provisions. See further unaudited information in “Items Affecting Comparability”
in Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations.
See “Our Liquidity and Capital Resources” in Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition
and Results of Operations for further unaudited information on our borrowings and long-term contractual
commitments.
Note 9 — Financial Instruments
Derivatives and Hedging
We are exposed to market risks arising from adverse changes in:
•commodity prices, af fecting the cost of our raw materials and ener gy;
•foreign exchange rates and currency restrictions; and
•interest rates.
In the normal course of business, we manage commodity price, foreign exchange and interest rate risks
through a variety of strategies, including productivity initiatives, global purch asing programs and hedging.
Ongoing productivity initiatives involve  the identification and effective implementation of meaningful cost-
saving opportunities or efficiencies, including the use of derivatives. Our global purchasing programs include
fixed-price contracts and purchase orders and pricing agreements.
Our hedging strategies include the use of derivatives and, in the case of our net investment hedges, debt
instruments. Certain derivatives are designated as either cash flow or fair value hedges and qualify for hedge
accounting treatmen t, while others do not qualify and are marked to market through earnings. Cash flows
from derivatives used to manage comm odity price, foreign exchange or intere st rate risks are classified as
operating activities in the cash flow statement. We classify both the earnings and cash flow impact from these
derivatives consiste nt with the under lying hedged item. See “Our Busine ss Risks” in Management’ s
Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations for further unaudited information
on our business risks.
We do not use derivative instruments for trading or speculative purposes. We perform assessments of our
counterparty credit risk regularly , inclu ding reviewing netting agreements, if any, and a review of credit
ratings, credit default swap rates and potential nonperformance of the counterparty . Based on our most recent
assessment of our counterparty credit risk, we consider this risk to be low. In addition, we enter into
derivative contracts with a variety of financial institutions that we believe are creditworthy in order to reduce
our concentration of credit risk.
Commodity Prices
We are subject to commodity price risk because our ability to recover increased costs through higher pricing
may be limited in the competitive environment in which we operate. This risk is managed through the use of
fixed-price contracts and purchase orders, pricing agreements and derivative instruments, which primarily
include swaps and futures. In addition, risk to our supply of certain raw materials is mitigated through
purchases from multiple geographies and suppliers. We use derivatives, with terms of no more than three
years, to economica lly hedge price fluctuations related to a portion of our anticipated commodity purchases,
primarily for energy, agricultural products and metals . Ineffectiv eness for those derivatives that qualify for
hedge accounting treatment was not material for all periods presented. Derivativ es used to hedge commodity
price risk that do not qualify for hedge accounting treatment are marked to market each period with the
resulting gains and losses recorded in corporate unallocated expenses as either cost of sales or selling, general
and administrative expenses, depending on the underlying commodity . These gains and losses are
114
Table of Contents
subsequently reflect ed in division result s when the divisions recognize the cost of the underlying commodity
in operating profit.
Our commodity derivatives had a total notional value of $1.1 billion  as of December 29, 2018  and $0.9
billion  as of December 30, 2017 .
Foreign Exchange
Our opera tions outside of the United States generated 43% of our net revenue in 2018 , with Mexico, Russia,
Canada, the United Kingdom and Brazil  comprising approximately 20% of our net revenue in 2018 . As a
result, we are exposed to foreign exchan ge risks in the international markets in which our products are made,
manufactured, distributed or sold.
Additionally , we are exposed to foreign  exchange risk from net investments in foreign subsidiaries, foreign
currency purchases and foreign currency assets and liabilities created in the normal course of business. We
manage this risk through sourcing purchases from local suppliers, negotiating contracts in local currencies
with foreign suppliers and through the use of derivatives, primarily forward contracts with terms of no more
than two years. Exchange rate gains or losses related to foreign currency transaction s are recognized as
transaction gains or losses on our income statement as incurred. We also use net investment hedges to
partially of fset the ef fects of foreign currency on our investments in certain of our foreign subsidiaries.
Our foreign currency derivatives had a total notional value of $2.0 billion  as of December 29, 2018  and $1.6
billion  as of December 30, 2017 . The total notional amount of our debt instruments designated as net
investment hedges was $0.9 billion  as of December 29, 2018  and $1.5 billion  as of December 30, 2017 .
Ineffectiveness for derivatives and non-derivatives that qualify for hedge accounting treatment was not
material for all periods presented. For foreign currency derivatives that do not qualify for hedge accounting
treatment, all gains and losses were offset by changes in the underlying hedged items, resulting in no material
net impact on earnings.
Inter est Rates
We centra lly manag e our debt and investment portfolios considering investment opportunities and risks, tax
consequences and overall financing strategies. We use various interest rate derivative instruments including,
but not limited to, interest rate swaps, cross-currency interest rate swaps, Treasury locks and swap locks to
manage our overall interest expense and foreign exchange risk. These instruments effectively change the
interest rate and currency of specific debt issuances. Certain of our fixed rate indebtedness have been
swapped to floating rates. The notional amount, interest payment and maturity date of the interest rate and
cross-currency interest rate swaps match the principal, interest payment and maturity date of the related debt.
Our Treasury locks and swap locks are entered into to protect against unfavorable interest rate changes
relating to forecasted debt transactions.
Our interest rate derivatives had a total notional value of $10.5 billion  as of December 29, 2018  and $14.2
billion  as of December 30, 2017 . Ineffectiveness for derivatives that qualify for cash flow hedge accounting
treatment was not material for all periods presented.
As of December 29, 2018 , approximately 29% of total debt, after the impact of the related interest rate
derivative instruments, was subject to variable rates, compared to approximately 43% as of December 30,
2017 .
Available-for-Sale Securities
Investments in debt securities are classi fied as available-for -sale. All highly liquid investments with original
maturities of three months or less are classified as cash equivalents. Our investments in available-for -sale
115
Table of Contents
debt securities are reported at fair value. Unrealized gains and losses related to changes in the fair value of
available-for -sale debt securities are recognized in accumulated other comprehensive loss within common
shareholders’  equity . Unrealized gains and losses on our investments in debt securities as of December 29,
2018  and December 30, 2017  were not material. Changes in the fair value of available-for -sale debt securities
impact net income only when such securities are sold or an other -than-temporary impairment is recognized.
We regularly review our investment portfolio to determine if any debt security is other -than-temporarily
impaired. In making this judgment, we evaluate, among other things, the duration and extent to which the fair
value of a debt security is less than its cost; the financial condition of the issuer and any changes thereto; and
our intent to sell, or whether we will more likely than not be required to sell, the debt security before recovery
of its amortized cost basis. Our assess ment of whether a debt security is other -than-temporarily impaired
could chan ge in the future due to new developments or changes in assumptions related to any particular debt
security . We recorded no other -than-temporary impairment charges on our available-for -sale debt securities
for the years ended December 29, 2018 , December 30, 2017  and December 31, 2016 .
In 2017, we recorded a pre-tax gain of $95 millio n ($85 millio n after-tax or $0.06  per share), net of discount
and fees, associated with the sale of our minority stake in Britvic. The gain on the sale of this equity
investment was recorded in our ESSA  segment in selling, general and administrative expenses. See Note 2 for
additional information on investments in certain equity securities.
KSF Beverage Holding Co., Ltd.
During 2016, we concluded that the decline in estimated fair value of our 5% indirect equity interest in KSFB
was other than temp orary based on signi ficant negative economic trends in Chin a and changes in assumptions
associated with KSFB’ s future financial performance arising from the disclosure  by KSFB’ s parent company ,
Tingyi, regarding the operating results of its beverage business. As a result, we recorded a pre- and after-tax
impairment charge of $373 million  ($0.26  per share) in 2016 in the AMENA  segment. This charge was
recorded in selling, general and administrative expenses on our income statement and reduced the value of
our 5% indirect equity interest in KSFB to its estimated fair value. The estimated fair value was derived using
both an income and market approach, and is considered a non-recurring Level 3 measurement within the fair
value hierarchy . The carrying value of the investment in KSFB was $166 million  as of December 29, 2018
and December 30, 2017 . We continue to monitor the impact of economic and other developments on the
remaining value of our investment in KSFB.
See furthe r unaudited information in “Items Affecting Comparability” in Management’ s Discussion and
Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations.
116
Table of Contents
Fair V alue Measurements
The fair values of our financial assets and liabilities as of December 29, 2018  and December 30, 2017  are
categorized as follows:
  2018 2017
 Fair Value
Hierar chy
Levels(a)Assets(a) Liabilities(a)Assets(a) Liabilities(a)
Available-for -sale debt securities
(b)2$ 3,658  $ — $ 14,510  $ —
Short-term investments (c)1 $ 196  $ — $ 228  $ —
Prepaid forward contracts (d)2 $ 22 $ — $ 27 $ —
Deferred compensation (e)2 $ — $ 450 $ — $ 503
Derivatives designated as fair
value hedging instruments:        
Interest rate (f)2 $ 1 $ 108 $ 24 $ 130
Derivatives designated as cash
flow hedging instruments:        
Foreign exchange (g)2 $ 44 $ 14 $ 15 $ 31
Interest rate (g)2 — 323 — 213
Commodity (h)1 — 1 — 2
Commodity (i)2 — 3 2 —
  $ 44 $ 341 $ 17 $ 246
Derivatives not designated as
hedging instruments:        
Foreign exchange (g)2 $ 3 $ 10 $ 10 $ 3
Commodity (h)1 2 17 — 19
Commodity (i)2 5 92 85 12
  $ 10 $ 119 $ 95 $ 34
Total derivatives at fair value (j) $ 55 $ 568 $ 136  $ 410
Total  $ 3,931  $ 1,018 $ 14,901  $ 913
(a) Fair value hierarchy levels  are defined in Note 7. Unless otherwise noted, financial assets are classified on our balance sheet within prepaid
expenses and other current assets and other assets. Financial liabilities are classified on our balance sheet within accounts payable and other
current liabilities and other liabilities.
(b) Based on quoted broker prices or other significant inputs derived from or corroborated by observable mark et data. As of December 29, 2018 ,
these debt securities were primarily classified as cash equivalents. As of December 30, 2017 , $5.8 billion  and $8.7 billion  of debt securities
were classified as cash equivalents and short-term investments, respectively . The decrease primarily reflec ts net maturities and sales of debt
securities with maturities greater than three months. Refer to the cash flow statement and “Our Liquidity and Capital Resources” in
Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations for further discussion on use of these proceeds.
(c) Based on the price of index funds. These investments are classified as short-term investments and are used to manage a portion of market
risk arising from our deferred compensation liability .
(d) Based primarily on the price of our common stock.
(e) Based on the fair value of investments corresponding to employees’  investment elections.
(f) Based on LIBOR forward rates.
(g) Based on recently reported market transactions of spot and forward rates.
(h) Based on quoted contract prices on futures exchange markets.
(i) Based on recently reported market transactions of swap arrangements.
(j) Derivative assets and liabilities are presented on a gross basis on our balance sheet. Amounts subject to enforceable master netting
arrangements or similar agreements which are not offset on the balance sheet as of December 29, 2018  and December 30, 2017  were not
material. Collateral received or posted against any of our asset or liability positions were not material. Collateral posted is classified as
restricted cash. See Note 13 for further information.
The carrying amounts of our cash and cash equivalents and short-term investments approximate fair value
due to their short-term maturity . The fair value of our debt obligations as of December 29, 2018  and
117
Table of Contents
December 30, 2017  was $32 billion  and $41 billion , respectively , based upon prices of similar instruments in
the marketplace, which are considered Level 2 inputs.
Losses/(gains) on our hedging instruments are categorized as follows:
 Fair Value/Non-
designated Hedges  Cash Flow and Net Investment Hedges
 Losses/(Gains)
Recognized in
Income Statement(a) Losses/(Gains)
Recognized in
Accumulated Other
Comprehensive LossLosses/(Gains)
Reclassified from
Accumulated Other
Comprehensive Loss
into Income
Statement(b)
2018 2017 2018 2017 2018 2017
Foreign exchange $ 9 $ (15) $ (52)$ 62$ (8)$ 10
Interest rate 53 101 110 (195) 119 (184)
Commodity 117 (48) 3 3 — 3
Net investment — —  (77) 157 — —
Total $ 179 $ 38 $ (16)$ 27$ 111$ (171)
 
(a) Foreign exchange derivative losses/gains are primarily included in selling, general and administrative expenses. Interest rate derivative
losses/gains are primarily from fair value hedges and are included in interest expense. These losses /gains are substantially offset by
decreases/increases in the value of the underlying debt, which are also included in interest expense. Commodity derivative losses/gains are
included in either cost of sales or selling, general and administrative expenses, depending on the underlying commodity .
(b) Foreign excha nge derivative losses/gains are primarily included in cost of sales. Interest rate derivative losses/gains are included in interest
expense. Commodity derivative losses/gains are inclu ded in either cost of sales or selling, general and administrative expenses, depending on
the underlying commodity .
Based on current market conditions, we expect to reclassify net gains of $5 million  related to our cash flow
hedges from accumulated other comprehensive loss into net income during the next 12 months.
118
Table of Contents
Note 10 — Net Income Attributable to PepsiCo per  Common Shar e
The computations of basic and diluted net income attributable to PepsiCo per common share are as follows:
 2018 2017  2016
 Income  Shar es(a)Income Shares(a) Income Shares(a)
Net income attributable to PepsiCo $12,515  $4,857   $6,329
Preferred shares:      
Dividends —  —   (1)
Redemption premium (2) (4)  (5)
Net income available for PepsiCo
   common shareholders $12,513  1,415 $4,853 1,425  $6,323 1,439
Basic net income attributable to
   PepsiCo per common share $8.84  $3.40   $4.39
Net income available for PepsiCo
   common shareholders $12,513  1,415 $4,853 1,425  $6,323 1,439
Dilutive securities:      
Stock options, RSUs, PSUs,
PEPunits and Other —  10 — 12 1 12
Employee stock ownership plan
(ESOP) convertible preferred stock 2 — 4 1 5 1
Diluted $12,515  1,425 $4,857 1,438  $6,329 1,452
Diluted net income attributable to
   PepsiCo per common share $8.78  $3.38   $4.36
(a) Weighted-average common shares outstanding (in millions).
Out-of-the-money options excluded from the calculation of diluted earnings per common share are as
follows: 
 2018  2017  2016
Out-of-the-money options (a)0.7  0.4  0.7
Average exercise price per option $ 109.83  $ 110.12  $ 99.98
(a) In millions.
Note 1 1 — Pr eferr ed Stock
In connection with our merger with The Quaker Oats Company (Quaker) in 2001, shares of our convertible
preferred stock were authorized and issued to an ESOP  fund established by Quaker . Quaker made the final
award to its ESOP  in June 2001.
In 2018, all of the outstanding shares of our convertible preferred stock were converted into an aggregate of
550,102  shares of our common stock at the conversion ratio set forth in Exhibit A to our amended and
restated articles of incorporation. As a result, there are no shares of our convertible preferred stock
outstanding as of December 29, 2018 and our convertible preferred stock is retired for accounting purposes.
As of December 30, 2017 , there were 3 million  shares of convertible preferred stock authorized, 803,953
preferred shares issued and 114,753  shares outstanding. The outstanding preferred shares had a fair value of
$68 million  as of December 30, 2017 .
Activities of our preferred stock are included in the equity statement.
119
Table of Contents
Note 12 — Accumulated Other  Compr ehensive Loss Attributable to PepsiCo
The changes in the balances of each component of accumulated other comp rehensive loss attributable to
PepsiCo are as follows:
 Curr ency
Translation
AdjustmentCash Flow
Hedges  Pension and
Retir ee
MedicalAvailable-
For-Sale
Securities Other  Accumulated Other
Compr ehensive Loss
Attributable to
PepsiCo
Balance as of December 26, 2015 (a)$ (11,080 )$ 37 $ (2,329 )$ 88 $ (35) $ (13,319 )
Other comprehensive (loss)/income
before reclassifications (313) (74) (750) (43) — (1,180 )
Amounts reclassified from
accumulated other comprehensive
loss — 150  407 — — 557
Net other comprehensive (loss)/income (313) 76 (343) (43) — (623)
Tax amounts 7 (30) 27 19 — 23
Balance as of December 31, 2016 (a)(11,386 ) 83 (2,645 ) 64 (35) (13,919 )
Other comprehensive (loss)/income
before reclassifications (b)1,049 130  (375) 25 — 829
Amounts reclassified from
accumulated other comprehensive
loss — (171) 158 (99) — (112)
Net other comprehensive (loss)/income 1,049 (41) (217) (74) — 717
Tax amounts 60 5 58 6 16 145
Balance as of December 30, 2017 (a)(10,277 ) 47 (2,804 ) (4) (19) (13,057 )
Other comprehensive (loss)/income
before reclassifications (c)(1,664 ) (61) (813) 6 — (2,532 )
Amounts reclassified from
accumulated other comprehensive
loss 44 111 218 — — 373
Net other comprehensive (loss)/income (1,620 ) 50 (595) 6 — (2,159 )
Tax amounts (21) (10) 128 — — 97
Balance as of December 29, 2018 (a) $ (11,918 )$ 87 $ (3,271 )$ 2 $ (19) $ (15,1 19)
(a) Pension and retiree medical amounts are net of taxes  of $1,253 millio n as of December 26, 2015, $1,280 millio n as of December 31, 2016,
$1,338 million  as of December 30, 2017 and $1,466 million  as of December 29, 2018.
(b) Currency translation adjustment primarily reflects the appreciation of the euro, Russian ruble, Pound sterling and Canadian dollar .
(c) Currency translation adjustment primarily reflects the depreciation of the Russian ruble, Canadian dollar , Pound sterling and Brazilian real.
120
Table of Contents
The follow ing table  summarizes the reclassifications from accumulated other comprehensive loss to the
income statement:
 Amount Reclassified from
Accumulated Other Comprehensive
LossAffected Line Item in the Income
Statement
 2018 2017  2016
Currency translation:   
    Divestitures $ 44$ — $ —Selling, general and administrative
expenses
   
Cash flow hedges:   
    Foreign exchange contracts $ (1)$ — $ 2Net revenue
    Foreign exchange contracts (7) 10 (46)Cost of sales
    Interest rate derivatives 119 (184) 187Interest expense
    Commodity contracts 3 4 3Cost of sales
    Commodity contracts (3) (1) 4Selling, general and administrative
expenses
    Net losses/(gains) before tax 111 (171) 150
    Tax amounts (27) 64 (63)
    Net losses/(gains) after tax $ 84$ (107) $ 87
   
Pension and retiree medical items:   
    Amortization of net prior service credit $ (17)$ (24) $ (39)Other pension and retiree medical
benefits income/(expense)
    Amortization of net losses 216 167 209Other pension and retiree medical
benefits income/(expense)
    Settlement/curtailment 19 15 237Other pension and retiree medical
benefits income/(expense)
    Net losses before tax 218 158 407
    Tax amounts (45) (44) (144)
    Net losses after tax $ 173$ 114 $ 263
   
Available-for-sale securities:   
Sale of Britvic securities $ — $ (99) $ —Selling, general and administrative
expenses
Tax amount — 10 —
Net gain after tax $ — $ (89) $ —
   
Total net losses/(gains) reclassified for the
year, net of tax $ 301$ (82) $ 350
121
Table of Contents
Note 13 — Restricted Cash
The follow ing table  provides a reconci liation of cash and cash equivalents and restricted cash as reported
within the balance sheet to the same items as reported in the cash flow statement.
 2018 2017
Cash and cash equivalents $ 8,721 $ 10,610
Restricted cash (a)1,997 —
Restricted cash included in other assets (b)51 47
Total cash and cash equivalents and restricted cash $ 10,769 $ 10,657
(a) Represents consideration held by our paying agent in connection with our acquisition of SodaStream.
(b) Restricted cash included in other assets primarily relates to collateral posted against our derivative asset or liability positions.
Note 14 — Acquisitions and Divestitur es
Acquisition of SodaStream International Ltd.
On Decem ber 5, 2018, we acquired all of the outstanding shares of Soda Stream, a manufacturer and
distributor of sparkling water makers, for $144.00  per share in cash, in a transaction valued at approximately
$3.3 billio n. The total consideration transferred was approximately $3.3 billio n (or $3.2 billio n, net of cash
and cash equivalents acquired), including $2.0 billion  of consi deration held by our paying agent in
connection with this acquisition and reported as restricted cash as of December 29, 2018.
We accounted for the transaction as a business combination. We recognized and measured the identifiable
assets acquired and liabilities assumed at their estimated fair values on the date of acquisition. The
preliminary estimat es of the fair value of the identifiable assets acquired and liabilities assumed in
SodaStream as of the acquisition date include goodwill and other intangible assets of $3.0 billion  and
property , plant and equipment of $0.2 billion , all of which are recorded in our ESSA  segment. The
preliminary estimate s of the fair value of identifiable assets acquired and liabilities assumed are subject to
revisions, which may result in adjustments to the preliminary values discussed above as valuations are
finalized. We expect to finalize these amounts as soon as possible, but no later than the end of 2019.
Under the guidance on accounting for business combinations, merger and integration costs are not included
as components of consideration transferred but are accounted for as expenses in the period in which the costs
are incurred. In 2018 , we incurred  merger and integration charges of $75 million  ($0.05  per share) , includin g
$57 million  in our ESSA  segment and $18 million  in corporate unalloc ated expenses. These charges include
closing costs, advisory fees and employee-related costs  and were recorded in selling, gene ral and
administrative expenses. See “Item 6. Selected Financial Data” and “Items Affecting Comparability” in
Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations.
Refranchising in Thailand
In 2018, we refranchised our beverage business in Thailand by selling a controlling interest in our Thailand
bottling operations to form a joint venture, where we now have an equity metho d investment. We recorded a
pre-tax gain of $144 million  ($126 million  after-tax or $0.09  per share) in selling, general and administrative
expenses in our AMENA  segment as a result of this transaction.
Refranchising in Czech Republic, Hungary , and Slovakia
In 2018, we refranchised our entire beverage bottling operations and snack distribution operations in CHS
(included within our ESSA  segment). We recorded a pre-tax gain of $58 million  ($46 million  after-tax or
$0.03  per share) in sellin g, general and administrative expenses in our ESSA  segment as a result of this
transaction.
122
Table of Contents
Refranchising in Jordan
In 2017, we refranchised our beverage business in Jordan by selling a controlling interest in our Jordan
bottling operations to form a joint venture, where we now have an equity metho d investment. We recorded a
pre-tax gain of $140 million  ($107 million  after-tax or $0.07  per share) in selling, general and administrative
expenses in our AMENA  segment as a result of this transaction.
123
Table of Contents
Note 15 — Supplemental Financial Information
Balance Sheet
 2018 2017 2016
Accounts and notes receivable     
Trade receivables $ 6,079$ 5,956  
Other receivables 1,164 1,197  
 7,243 7,153  
Allowance, beginning of year 129 134 $ 130
Net amounts charged to expense 16 26 37
Deductions (a)(33) (35) (30)
Other (b) (11) 4 (3)
Allowance, end of year 101 129 $ 134
Net receivables $ 7,142$ 7,024  
     
Inventories (c)    
Raw materials and packaging $ 1,312$ 1,344  
Work-in-process 178 167  
Finished goods 1,638 1,436  
 $ 3,128$ 2,947  
     
Other assets     
Noncurrent notes and accounts receivable $ 86$ 59  
Deferred marketplace spending 112 134  
Pension plans (d)269 374  
Other 293 346  
 $ 760$ 913  
     
Accounts payable and other current liabilities     
Accounts payable $ 7,213$ 6,727  
Accrued marketplace spending 2,541 2,390  
Accrued compensation and benefits 1,755 1,785  
Dividends payable 1,329 1,161  
SodaStream consideration payable 1,997 —  
Other current liabilities 3,277 2,954  
 $ 18,112$ 15,017  
(a) Includes accounts written of f.
(b) Includes adjustments related primarily to currency translation and other adjustments.
(c) Approximately 5% of the invent ory cost in 2018 and 2017 were comput ed using the LIFO method. The differences between LIFO and FIFO
methods of valuing these inventories were not material.
(d) See Note 7 for additional information regarding our pension plans.
124
Table of Contents
Statement of Cash Flows
 2018 2017 2016
Interest paid (a)$ 1,388 $ 1,123$ 1,102
Income taxes paid, net of refunds (b)$ 1,203 $ 1,962$ 1,393
(a) In 2018 and 2016, excludes the premiums paid in accordance with the debt transactions discussed in Note 8.
(b) In 2018, includes tax payments of $1 15 million related to the TCJ Act.
Lease Information
 2018 2017 2016
Rent expense $ 771 $ 742 $ 701
 
Minimum lease payments under non-cancelable operating leases by period
 Operating Lease Payments
2019 $ 459
2020 406
2021 294
2022 210
2023 161
2024 and beyond 310
Total minimum operating lease payments $ 1,840
125
Table of Contents
Management’ s Responsibility for  Financial Reporting
To Our Shareholders:
At PepsiCo, our actions – the actions of all our associates – are governed by our Global Code of Conduct.
This Code is clearly aligned with our stated values – a commitment to deliver sustained growth through
empowered people acting with responsibility and building trust. Both the Code and our core values enable us
to operate  with integrity – both within the letter and the spirit of the law. Our Code of Conduct is reinforced
consistently at all levels and in all countries. We have maintained strong governance policies and practices for
many years.
The management of PepsiCo is responsible for the objectivity and integrity of our consolidated financial
statements. The Audit Committee of the Board of Directors has engaged independent registered public
accounting firm, KPMG LLP, to audit  our consolidated financial statements, and they have expressed an
unqualified opinion.
We are committed to providing timely , accurate and understandable information to investors. Our
commitment encompasses the following:
Maintaining strong contr ols over financial reporting.  Our system of internal control is based on the
control criteria fram ework of the Com mittee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission
published in their report titled Internal Control – Integrated Framework (2013). The system is designed to
provide reasonable assurance that transactions are executed as authorized and accurately recorded; that assets
are safeguarded; and that accounting records are sufficiently reliable to permi t the preparation of financial
statements that conform in all material respects with accounting principles generally accepted in the United
States. We maintain disclosure controls and procedures designed to ensure that information required to be
disclosed in reports under the Securiti es Exchange Act of 1934 is recorded, processed, summarized and
reported within the specified time periods. We monitor these internal controls through self-assessments and
an ongoin g program of internal audits . Our internal controls are reinforced through our Global Code of
Conduct, which sets forth our commitment to conduct business with integrity , and within both the letter and
the spirit of the law .
Exerting rigor ous oversight of the business.  We continuously review our business results and strategies.
This encompasses financial discipline in our strategic and daily business decisions. Our Executive Committee
is actively involved – from understandin g strategies and alternatives to reviewin g key initiatives and financial
performance. The intent is to ensure we remain objective in our assessments, constructively challenge our
approach to potential business opportunities and issues, and monitor results and controls.
Engaging strong and effective Corporate Governance from our Board of Directors.  We have an active,
capable and diligent Board that meets the required standards for independence, and we welcome the Board’ s
oversight as a representative of our shareholders. Our Audit Committee is comprised of independent directors
with the financial literacy , knowledge and experience to provide appropriate oversight. We review our critical
accounting policies,  financial reporting and internal control matters with them  and encourage their direct
communication with KPMG LLP, with our Internal Auditor and with our General Counsel. We also have a
Compliance & Ethics Department, led by our Chief Compliance & Ethics Officer, who coordinates our
compliance policies and practices.
Providing investor s with financial results that are complete, transpar ent and understandable.  The
consolidated financial statements and financial information included in this report are the responsibility of
management. This includes preparing the financial statements in accordance with accounting principles
generally accepted in the United States, which require estimates based on management’ s best judgment.
126
Table of Contents
PepsiCo has a strong history of doing what’ s right.  We realize that great companies are built on trust,
strong ethical standards and principles. Our financial results are delivered from that culture of accountability ,
and we take responsibility for the quality and accuracy of our financial reporting.
February 15, 2019
 
  
 /s/ MARIE T. GALLAGHER
 Marie T. Gallagher
 Senior Vice President and Controller
(Principal Accounting Of ficer)
  
 /s/ HUGH F . JOHNST ON
 Hugh F . Johnston
 Vice Chairman, Executive Vice President and
Chief Financial Of ficer
  
 /s/ RAMON L. LAGUAR TA
 Ramon L. Laguarta
 Chairman of the Board of Directors and
Chief Executive Of ficer
127
Table of Contents
Report of Independent Register ed Public Accounting Firm
To the Shareholders and Board of Directors
PepsiCo, Inc.:
Opinions on the Consolidated Financial Statements and Internal Contr ol over  Financial Reporting
We have audited the accompanying Consolidated Balance Sheets of PepsiCo, Inc. and Subsidiaries (the
“Company”) as of December 29, 2018 and December 30, 2017, and the related Consolidated Statements of
Income, Comprehensive Income, Cash Flows, and Equity for each of the fiscal years in the three-year period
ended December 29, 2018 and the related notes (collectively , the “consolidated financial statements”). We
also have audited the Company’ s internal control over financial reporting as of December 29, 2018, based on
criteria established in Internal Control - Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring
Organizations of the Treadway Commission.
In our opinion, the consolidated financi al statements referred to above present fairly , in all material respects,
the financial position of the Company as of December 29, 2018 and December 30, 2017, and the results of its
operations and its cash flows for each of the fiscal years in the three-year perio d ended December 29, 2018,
in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles. Also in our opinion, the Company
maintained, in all material respects, effective internal control over financial reporting as of December 29,
2018, based on criteria established in Internal Control – Integrated Frame work (2013) issued by the
Committee of Sponsoring Or ganizations of the Treadway Commission.
As permitted by SEC guidance, the scope of management’ s assessment of the effectiveness of internal control
over financial reporting as of December 29, 2018 excluded SodaStream International Ltd. and its subsidiaries
(“SodaStream”), which the Company acquired in December 2018. SodaStream’ s total assets and net revenue
represented approximately 5% and 1%, respectively , of the consolidated total assets and net revenue of
PepsiCo, Inc. as of and for the year ended December 29, 2018.  Our audit  of internal control over finan cial
reporting of PepsiCo, Inc. also exclud ed an evaluation of the internal control over financial reporting of
SodaStream.
Basis for  Opinions
The Company’ s management is responsible for these consolidated financial statements, for maintaining
effective internal control over financial reporting, and for its assessment of the effectiveness of internal
control over financi al reporting, included in the accompanying Management’ s Report on Internal Control
over Financial Reporting. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the Company’ s consolidated
financial statements  and an opinion on the Company’ s internal control over financial reporting based on our
audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board
(United States) (PCAOB) and are required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with
the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange
Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we
plan and perform the audits to obtai n reasonable assurance about whether the consolidated financial
statements are free of material misstate ment, whether due to error or fraud, and whether effective internal
control over financial reporting was maintained in all material respects.
Our audits  of the consolidated financial statements included performing procedures to assess the risks of
material misstatement of the consolidated financial statements, whether due to error or fraud, and performing
procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence
regarding the amounts and disclosures in the consolidated financial statements. Our audits also included
evaluating the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as
evaluating the overall presentation of the consolidated financial statements. Our audit of internal control over
128
Table of Contents
financial reporting included obtaining an understanding of internal control over financial reporting, assessing
the risk that a material weakness exists, and testing and evaluating the design and operating effectiveness of
internal control based on the assessed risk. Our audits also included performing such other procedures as we
considered necessary in the circumstances. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our
opinions.
Definition and Limitations of Internal Contr ol over  Financial Reporting
A compan y’s interna l control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance
regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of finan cial statements for external
purposes in accorda nce with generally accepted accounting principles. A company’ s internal control over
financial reporting includes those polici es and procedures that (1) pertain to the maintenance of records that,
in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispo sitions of the assets of the
company; (2) provide reasonable assura nce that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation
of financial statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and
expenditures of the company are being  made only in accordance with authorizations of management and
directors of the company; and (3) provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of
unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company’ s assets that could have a material effect on the
financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect
misstatements. Also , projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk
that controls may become inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with
the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
/s/ KPMG LLP
We have served as the Company’ s auditor since 1990.
New York, New York
February 15, 2019
129
Table of Contents
GLOSSAR Y
Acquisitions and divestitur es: all mergers and acquisitions activity , including the impact of acquisitions,
divestitures and changes in ownership or control in consolidated subsidiaries  and nonconsolidated equity
investees.
Bottler  Case Sales (BCS) : measure of physi cal beverage volume shipped to retailers and independen t
distributors from both PepsiCo and our independent bottlers.
Bottler  funding : financial incentives we give to our independent bottlers to assist in the distribution and
promotion of our beverage products.
Concentrate Shipments and Equivalents (CSE) : measure of our physical beverage volume shipments to
independent bottlers, retailers and independent distributors.
Constant currency : financial results assuming constant foreign currency exchange rates used for translation
based on the rates in effect for the comparable prior -year period. In order to compute our constant currency
results, we multiply or divide, as appropriate, our current year U.S. dollar resul ts by the current year average
foreign exchange rates and then multiply or divide, as appropriate, those amounts by the prior year average
foreign exchange rates.
Consumers : people who eat and drink our products.
CSD : carbonated soft drinks.
Customers : authorized independent bottlers, distributors and retailers.
Derivatives : financial  instrumen ts, such as futures, swaps, Treasury locks, cross currency swaps and forward
contracts that we use to manage our risk arising from changes in commodity prices, interest rates and foreign
exchange rates.
Direct-Stor e-Delivery (DSD) : delivery system used by us and our independent bottlers to deliver snacks and
beverages directly to retail stores where our products are merchandised.
Effective net pricing : reflects the year-over-year impact of discrete pricing actions, sales incentive activities
and mix resulting from selling varying products in dif ferent package sizes and in dif ferent countries.
Free cash flow: net cash provided by operating activities less capital spending plus sales of property , plant
and equipment.
Hedge accounting : treatmen t for qualifying hedges that allows fluctuations in a hedging instrument’ s fair
value to offset corresponding fluctuation s in the hedged item in the same reporting period. Hedge accounting
is allowed only in cases where the hedging relationship between the hedging instruments and hedged items is
highly ef fective, and only prospectively from the date a hedging relationship is formally documented.
Independent bottlers : custome rs to whom we have granted exclusive contracts to sell and manufacture
certain beverage products bearing our trademarks within a specific geographical area.
Mark-to-market net gain or loss: change in market value for commodity derivative contracts that we
purchase to mitigate  the volatility in costs of energy and raw materials that we consume. The market value is
determined based on prices on national exchanges and recently reported transactions in the marketplace.
130
Table of Contents
Organic : a measure that adjusts for impacts of acquisitions, divestitures and other struc tural changes, and
foreign exchange translation. In excluding the impact of foreign exchange translation, we assume constant
foreign exchange rates used for translation based on the rates in effect for the comparable prior -year period.
See the definition of “Constant currency” for additional information. Our 2018 reported results reflect the
accounting policy election taken in conjunction with the adoption of the revenue recognition guidance to
exclude from net revenue and cost of sales all sales, use, value-added and certain excise taxes assessed by
governmental autho rities on revenue-producing transactions not already exclude d. Our 2018 organic revenue
growth excludes the impact of these taxes previously recognized in net revenue. In addition, our fiscal 2016
reported results included an extra week of results. Our 2017 organic revenue growth excludes the impact of
the 53rd reporting week from our 2016 results.
Servings : common  metric reflecting our consolidated physical unit volume. Our divisions’  physical unit
measures are converted into servings based on U.S. Food and Drug Administration guidelines for single-
serving sizes of our products.
Total marketplace spending : includes sales incentives and discounts offered through various programs to
our customers, consumers or independent bottlers, as well as advertising and other marketing activities.
Transaction gains and losses : the impa ct on our consolidated financial statements of exchange rate changes
arising from specific transactions.
Translation adjust ment : the impact of converting our foreign affiliates’  financial statements into U.S.
dollars for the purpose of consolidating our financial statements.
131
Table of Contents
Item 7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosur es About Market Risk.
Included in “Item 7. Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financia l Condition and Results of
Operations – Our Business Risks.”
Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data.
See “Item 15. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules.”
Item 9. Changes in and Disagr eements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosur e.
Not applicable.
Item 9A. Contr ols and Pr ocedur es.
(a) Disclo sure Controls and Procedures.  As of the end of the period covered by this report, we carried out an
evaluation, under the supervision and with the participation of our management, including our Chief
Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, of the effectiveness of the design and operation of our
disclosure controls and procedures, as such term is defined in Rules 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e) of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the Exchange Act). Based upon that evaluation, our Chief Executive
Officer and Chief Financial Officer concluded that as of the end of the period covered by this report our
disclosure controls and procedures were effective to ensure that information required to be disclosed by us in
reports we file or submit under the Exchange Act is (1) recorded, processed, summarized and reported within
the time periods specified in Securities and Exchange Commission rules and forms, and (2) accumulated and
communicated to our management, including our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, as
appropriate, to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure.
(b) Mana gement’ s Annual Report on Internal Control over Financial Reporting.  Our management is
responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over financial reporting, as such term
is defined  in Rule 13a-15(f) of the Exchange Act. Under the supervision and with the participation of our
management, including our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, we conducted an evaluation
of the effectiveness of our internal control over financial reporting based upon criteria established in Internal
Contr ol – Integrate d Framework  (2013) by the Committee of Sponsori ng Organizations of the Treadway
Commission. Based  on that evaluation, our management concluded that our internal control over financial
reporting was ef fective as of December 29, 2018 .
As permitted by SEC guidance, the scope of management’ s assessment of the effectiveness of our internal
control over financi al reporting as of December 29, 2018 excluded SodaStream International Ltd. and its
subsidiaries (SodaSt ream), which we acquired in December 2018. SodaStream’ s total assets and net revenu e
represented approximately 5% and 1%, respectively , of the consolidated total assets and net revenue of
PepsiCo, Inc. as of and for the year ended December 29, 2018.
Attestation Report of the Registered Public Accounting Firm . KPM G LLP, an independent registered public
accounting firm, has audited the consolidated financial statements included in this Annual Report on Form
10-K and, as part of their audit, has issued their report, included herein, on the effectiveness of our internal
control over financial reporting.
(c) Changes in Internal Control over Financial Reporting.  Except as discussed, there have been no changes
in our internal control over financial reporting during our fourth fiscal quarter of 2018  that have materially
affected, or are reasonably likely to materially af fect, our internal control over financial reporting.
During our fourth fiscal quarter of 2018 , we continued migrating certain of our financial processing systems
to an enterprise-wide systems solution . These systems implementations are part of our ongoing global
business
132
Table of Contents
transformation initiative, and we plan to continue implementing such systems throughout other parts of our
businesses. In addition, in connection with our 2019 multi-year productivity program, we continue to migrate
to shared business models across our operations to further simplify , harmonize and automate processes. In
connection with these implementations and resulting business process changes , we continue to enhance the
design and documentation of our internal control over financial reporting processes to maintain effective
controls over our financial reporting. These transitions have not materially affected, and we do not expect
them to materially af fect, our internal control over financial reporting.
Item 9B. Other  Information.
Not applicable.
PART III
Item 10. Dir ectors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance.
Information about our directors and persons nominated to become directors is contained under the caption
“Election of Directors” in our Proxy Statement for our 2019  Annual Meeting of Shareholders to be filed with
the SEC within 120 days of the fiscal year ended December 29, 2018  (the 2019  Proxy Statement) and is
incorporated herein  by reference. Information about our executive officers is reported under the caption
“Executive Of ficers of the Registrant” in Part I of this report.
Information on beneficial ownership reporting compliance is contained under the caption “Ownership of
PepsiCo Common Stock – Section 16(a) Beneficial Ownership Reporting Compliance” in our 2019  Proxy
Statement and is incorporated herein by reference.
We have a written code of conduct that applies to all of our employees, including our Chairman of the Board
of Directors and Chief Executive Officer, Chief Financial Officer and Controller , and to our Board of
Directors. Our Global Code of Conduc t is distributed to all employees and is available on our website at
http://www .pepsico.com . A copy of our Glob al Code of Conduct may be obtained free of charge by writi ng to
Investor Relations, PepsiCo, Inc., 700 Anderson Hill Road, Purchase, New York 10577. Any amendment to
our Global Code of Conduct and any waiver applicable to our executive officers or senior financial officers
will be posted on our website within the time period required by the SEC and applicable rules of The Nasdaq
Stock Market LLC.
Information about the procedures by which security holders may recommend nominees to our Board of
Directors can be found in our 2019  Prox y Statement under the caption “Board Composition and Refreshment
– Shareho lder Reco mmendations and Nominations of Director Candidates” and is incorporated herein by
reference.
Information concern ing the composition of the Audit Committee and our Audit Committee financial experts
is contained in our 2019  Prox y Statement under the caption “Cor porate Governance at PepsiCo – Comm ittees
of the Board of Directors – Audit Committee” and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 1 1. Executive Compensation.
Information about director and executiv e officer compensation, Compensation Committee interlocks and the
Compensation Committee Report is contained in our 2019  Proxy Statement under the captions “2018
Director Compensation,” “Executive Compensation,” “Corporate Governance at PepsiCo – Committees of
the Board of Direc tors – Compensation Committee – Compensation Comm ittee Interlocks and Insider
Participation” and “Executive Compensation – Compensation Committee Report” and is incorporated herein
by reference.
133
Table of Contents
Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder
Matters.
Information with respect to securities authorized for issuance under equity compensation plans can be found
under the caption “Executive Compensation – Securities Authorized for Issuance Under Equity
Compensation Plans” in our 2019  Proxy Statement and is incorporated herein by reference.
Information on the number of shares of PepsiCo Common Stock beneficially owned by each director and
named executive officer, by all directors and executive officers as a group and on each beneficial owner of
more than 5% of PepsiCo Common Stock is contained under the caption “Ownership of PepsiCo Common
Stock” in our 2019  Proxy Statement and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Dir ector  Independence.
Information with respect to certain relationships and related transactions and director independence is
contained under the captions “Corporate Governance at PepsiCo – Related Person Transactions” and
“Corporate Govern ance at PepsiCo – Director Independence” in our 2019  Proxy Statement and is
incorporated herein by reference.
Item 14. Principal Accounting Fees and Services.
Information on our Audit Committee’ s pre-approval policy and procedures for audit and other services and
information on our principal accountant fees and services is contained in our 2019  Proxy Statement under the
caption “Ratification of Appointment of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm – Audit and Other
Fees” and is incorporated herein by reference.
134
Table of Contents
PART IV
Item 15. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules.
(a)1. Financial Statements
The follow ing conso lidated financial statements of PepsiCo, Inc. and its affiliates are included herein
by reference to the pages indicated on the index appearing in “Item 7. Management’ s Discussion and
Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations”:
Consolidated Statem ent of Income – Fiscal years ended December 29, 2018, December 30, 2017 and
December 31, 2016
Consolidated Statement of Comprehe nsive Income – Fiscal years ended December 29, 2018,
December 30, 2017 and December 31, 2016
Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows – Fiscal years ended December 29, 2018, December 30, 2017
and December 31, 2016
Consolidated Balance Sheet – December 29, 2018 and December 30, 2017
Consolidated Statement of Equity – Fiscal years ended December 29, 2018, December 30, 2017 and
December 31, 2016
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements, and
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm.
(a)2. Financial Statement Schedules
These schedules are omitted because they are not required or because the information is set forth in
the financial statements or the notes thereto.
(a)3. Exhibits
See Index to Exhibits.
135
Table of Contents
Item 16. Form 10-K Summary .
None.
INDEX TO EXHIBITS
ITEM 15(a)(3)
The follow ing is a list of the exhibits filed as part of this Form 10-K. The documents incorporated by
reference can be viewed on the SEC’ s website at http://www .sec.gov .
EXHIBIT
3.1 Articles of Incorporation of PepsiCo, Inc., as amended and restated, effective  as of May 9, 2011,
which are incorpora ted herein by referen ce to Exhibit 3.1 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form
8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on May 9, 201 1.
3.2 By-laws of PepsiCo, Inc., as amended and restated, effective as of January 11, 2016, which are
incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 3.2 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed
with the Securities and Exchange Commission on January 1 1, 2016.
4.1 PepsiCo, Inc. agrees to furnish to the Securities and Exchange Commission, upon request, a copy of
any instru ment, not otherwise filed herewith, defining the rights of holders of long-term debt of
PepsiCo, Inc. and its consolidated subsidiaries and for any of its unconsolidated subsidiaries for
which financial statements are required to be filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
4.2 Indenture dated May 21, 2007 between PepsiCo, Inc. and The Bank of New York Mellon (formerly
known as The Bank of New York), as trustee, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit
4.3 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Registration Statement on Form S-3ASR (Registration No. 333-154314) filed
with the Securities and Exchange Commission on October 15, 2008.
4.3 Form of 4.50% Senior Note due 2020, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
January 13, 2010.
4.4 Form of 5.50% Senior Note due 2040, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
January 13, 2010.
4.5 Form of 3.125% Senior Note due 2020, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
October 25, 2010.
4.6 Form of 4.875% Senior Note due 2040, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
October 25, 2010.
4.7 Form of 3.600% Senior Note due 2024, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
February 28, 2014.
4.8 Form of 1.750% Senior Note due 2021, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
April 28, 2014.
4.9 Form of 2.625% Senior Note due 2026, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
April 28, 2014.
4.10 Form of 4.250% Senior Note due 2044, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.1 of
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
October 22, 2014.
4.11Form of 1.850% Senior Note due 2020, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
April 30, 2015.
136
Table of Contents
4.12 Form of 2.750% Senior Note due 2025, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
April 30, 2015.
4.13 Form of 3.100% Senior Note due 2022, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
July 17, 2015.
4.14 Form of 3.500% Senior Note due 2025, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
July 17, 2015.
4.15 Form of 4.600% Senior Note due 2045, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.5 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
July 17, 2015.
4.16 Form of 2.150% Senior Note due 2020, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
October 14, 2015.
4.17 Form of 4.450% Senior Note due 2046, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
October 14, 2015.
4.18 Form of Floating Rate Note due 2019, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
February 24, 2016.
4.19 Form of 1.500% Senior Note due 2019, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
February 24, 2016.
4.20 Form of 2.850% Senior Note due 2026, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
February 24, 2016.
4.21 Form of 4.450% Senior Note due 2046, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
February 24, 2016.
4.22 Form of 0.875% Senior Note due 2028, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
July 18, 2016.
4.23 Form of Floating Rate Note due 2019, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
October 6, 2016.
4.24 Form of Floating Rate Note due 2021, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
October 6, 2016.
4.25 Form of 1.350% Senior Note due 2019, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
October 6, 2016.
4.26 Form of 1.700% Senior Note due 2021, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
October 6, 2016.
4.27 Form of 2.375% Senior Note due 2026, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.5 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
October 6, 2016.
4.28 Form of 3.450% Senior Note due 2046, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.6 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
October 6, 2016.
137
Table of Contents
4.29 Form of Floating Rate Note due 2019, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
May 2, 2017.
4.30 Form of Floating Rate Note due 2022, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
May 2, 2017.
4.31 Form of 1.550% Senior Note due 2019, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
May 2, 2017.
4.32 Form of 2.250% Senior Note due 2022, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
May 2, 2017.
4.33 Form of 4.000% Senior Note due 2047, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.5 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
May 2, 2017.
4.34 Form of 2.150% Senior Note due 2024, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
May 4, 2017.
4.35 Form of 2.000% Senior Note due 2021, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
October 10, 2017.
4.36 Form of 3.000% Senior Note due 2027, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
October 10, 2017.
4.37 Board of Directors Resolutions Author izing PepsiCo, Inc.’s Officers to Establish the Terms of the
4.50% Senior Notes due 2020, 5.50% Senior Notes due 2040, 3.125% Senior Notes due 2020 and
4.875% Senior Notes due 2040, which are incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’ s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the 24 weeks ended June 12, 2010.
4.38 Board of Directors Resolutions Author izing PepsiCo, Inc.’s Officers to Establish the Terms of the
3.000% Senior Notes due 2021, the 2.750% Senior Notes due 2022, the 4.000% Senior Notes due
2042, the 3.600% Senior Notes due 2042 and the 2.500% Senior Notes due 2022, which are
incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed
with the Securities and Exchange Commission on May 6, 201 1.
4.39 Form of 3.000% Senior Note due 2021, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
August 25, 201 1.
4.40 Form of 2.750% Senior Note due 2022, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
March 2, 2012.
4.41 Form of 4.000% Senior Note due 2042, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
March 2, 2012.
4.42 Form of 3.600% Senior Note due 2042, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
August 13, 2012.
4.43 Form of 2.500% Senior Note due 2022, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
October 30, 2012.
138
Table of Contents
4.44 Form of 2.750% Senior Note due 2023, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
February 28, 2013.
4.45 Form of 7.00% Senior Note due 2029, Series A, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit
4.3 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange
Commission on November 8, 2018.
4.46 Form of 5.50% Senior Note due 2035, Series A, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit
4.4 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange
Commission on November 8, 2018.
4.47 Form of 7.29% Senior Note due 2026, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Registration Statement on Form S-4 (Registration No. 333-22 8466) filed with the
Securities and Exchange Commission on November 19, 2018.
4.48 Form of 7.44% Senior Note due 2026, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Registration Statement on Form S-4 (Registration No. 333-22 8466) filed with the
Securities and Exchange Commission on November 19, 2018.
4.49 Form of 7.00% Senior Note due 2029, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.5 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Registration Statement on Form S-4 (Registration No. 333-22 8466) filed with the
Securities and Exchange Commission on November 19, 2018.
4.50 Form of 5.50% Senior Note due 2035, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.6 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Registration Statement on Form S-4 (Registration No. 333-22 8466) filed with the
Securities and Exchange Commission on November 19, 2018.
4.51 Board of Directors Resolutions Author izing PepsiCo, Inc.’s Officers to Establish the Terms of the
2.750% Senior Note due 2023, the 3.600% Senior Notes due 2024, the 1.750% Senior Notes due
2021, the 2.625% Senior Notes due 2026, the 4.250% Senior Notes due 2044 , the 1.850% Senior
Notes due 2020, the 2.750% Senior Notes due 2025, the 3.100% Senior Notes due 2022, the 3.500%
Senior Notes due 2025, the 4.600% Senior Notes due 2045, the 2.150% Senior Notes due 2020, the
4.450% Senior Notes due 2046, the Floating Rate Note due 2019, the 1.500% Senior Notes due
2019, the 2.850% Senior Notes due 2026, the 0.875% Senior Note due 2028, the Floating Rate Note
due 2019, the Floating Rate Note due 2021, the 1.350% Senior Notes due 2019, the 1.700% Senior
Notes due 2021, the 2.375% Senior Notes due 2026, the 3.450% Senior Notes due 2046, the Floating
Rate Notes due 2019, the Floating Rate Notes due 2022, the 1.550% Senior Notes due 2019, the
2.250% Senior Notes due 2022, the 4.000% Senior Notes due 2047, the 2.150% Senior Notes due
2024, the 2.000% Senior Notes due 2021, the 3.000% Senior Notes due 2027, the 7.00% Senior
Notes due 2029, Series A, the 5.50% Senior Notes due 2035, Series A, the 7.29% Senior Notes due
2026, the 7.44% Senior Notes due 2026, the 7.00% Senior Notes due 2029 and the 5.50% Senior
Notes due 2035 which are incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on February 28, 2013.
4.52 Second Supplemental Indenture, dated  as of October 24, 2018, among Pepsi-Cola Metropolitan
Bottling Company , Inc., Bottling Group, LLC, and The Bank of New York Mellon, as trustee, to the
Indenture dated March 8, 1999 among The Pepsi Bottling Group, Inc., Bottling Group, LLC and The
Chase Manhattan Bank, as trustee, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
October 25, 2018.
4.53 First Supplemental Indenture, dated as of February 26, 2010, among Pepsi-Cola Metropolitan
Bottling Company , Inc., The Pepsi Bottl ing Group, Inc., Bottling Group, LLC and The Bank of New
York Mellon, as trustee, to the Indenture dated March 8, 1999 between The Pepsi Bottling Group,
Inc., Bottling Group, LLC and The Chase Manhattan Bank, as trustee, which is incorporated herein
by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities
and Exchange Commission on March 1, 2010.
139
Table of Contents
4.54 Indenture, dated as of March 8, 1999, by and among The Pepsi Bottling Group, Inc., as obligor ,
Bottling Group, LLC, as guarantor , and The Chase Manhattan Bank, as trustee, relating to
$1,000,000,000 7% Series B Senior Note due 2029, which is incorporated herein by reference to
Exhibit 10.14 to The Pepsi Bottling Group, Inc.’s Registration Statement on Form S-1 (Registration
No. 333-70291) filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on March 24, 1999.
4.55 Third Supplemental  Indenture, dated as of October 24, 2018, between Pepsi-Cola Metropolitan
Bottling Company , Inc. and The Bank New York Mellon Trust Company , N.A., as trustee, to the
Indenture dated as of January 15, 1993 between Whitman Corporation and The First National Bank
of Chicag o, as trustee, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s
Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on October 25,
2018.
4.56 Second Supplement al Indenture, dated as of February 26, 2010, among Pepsi-Cola Metropolitan
Bottling Company , Inc., PepsiAmericas, Inc. and The Bank New York Mellon Trust Company , N.A.,
as trustee, to the Indenture dated as of January 15, 1993 between Whitman Corporation and The First
National Bank of Chicago, as trustee, which is incorporated herein by referen ce to Exhibit 4.2 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
March 1, 2010.
4.57 First Supplemental Indenture, dated as of May 20, 1999, between Whitman Corporation and The
First National Bank of Chicago, as trustee, to the Indenture dated as of January 15, 1993, between
Whitman Corporation and The First National Bank of Chicago, as trustee, each of which is
incorporated herein  by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to Post-Ef fective Amendment No. 1 to
PepsiAmericas, Inc.’s Registration Statement on Form S-8 (Registration No. 333-64292) filed with
the Securities and Exchange Commission on December 29, 2005.
4.58 Form of PepsiAmericas, Inc. 7.29% Note due 2026, which is incorporated herein by reference to
Exhibit 4.7 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Quarterly  Report on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended March
20, 2010.
4.59 Second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of October 24, 2018, between Pepsi-Cola Metropolitan
Bottling Company , Inc. and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as trustee, to the Indenture
dated as of August 15, 2003 between PepsiAmericas, Inc. and Wells Fargo Bank Minnesota, National
Association, as trustee, which is incorp orated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s
Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on October 25,
2018.
4.60 First Supplemental Indenture, dated as of February 26, 2010, among Pepsi-Cola Metropolitan
Bottling Company , Inc., PepsiAmericas, Inc. and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as trustee,
to the Indenture dated as of August 15, 2003 between PepsiAmericas, Inc. and Wells Fargo Bank
Minnesota, National Association, as trustee, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.3
to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission
on March 1, 2010.
4.61 Indenture dated as of August 15, 2003 between PepsiAmericas, Inc. and Wells Fargo Bank
Minnesota, National  Association, as trustee, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4 to
PepsiAmericas, Inc.’s Registration Statement on Form S-3 (Registration No. 333-108164) filed with
the Securities and Exchange Commission on August 22, 2003.
4.62 Form of PepsiAmericas, Inc. 5.50% Note due 2035, which is incorporated herein by reference to
Exhibit 4.17 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended March
20, 2010.
10.1 Form of PepsiCo, Inc. Director Indemnification Agreement, which is incorporated herein by
reference to Exhibit 10.20 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended
December 25, 2004.*
10.2 Severance Plan for Executive Employ ees of PepsiCo, Inc. and Affiliates, which is incorporated
herein by reference to Exhibit 10.5 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the fiscal
quarter ended September 6, 2008.*
140
Table of Contents
10.3 PepsiCo, Inc. 2007 Long-T erm Incentiv e Plan, as amended and restated March 12, 2010, which is
incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed
with the Securities and Exchange Commission on May 1 1, 2010.*
10.4 Form of Annual Long-T erm Incentive Award Agreement, which is incorporated  herein by reference
to Exhibit  10.1 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and
Exchange Commission on February 7, 2008.*
10.5 Form of Performance-Based Long-T erm Incentive Award Agreement, which is incorporated herein
by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities
and Exchange Commission on February 7, 2008.*
10.6 Form of Annual Long-T erm Incentive Award Agreement, which is incorporated  herein by reference
to Exhibit  10.1 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and
Exchange Commission on February 1 1, 2009.*
10.7 Form of Performance-Based Long-T erm Incentive Award Agreement, which is incorporated herein
by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities
and Exchange Commission on February 1 1, 2009.*
10.8 Form of Pro Rata Long-Term Incentive Award Agreement, which is incorporate d herein by reference
to Exhibit  10.3 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and
Exchange Commission on February 1 1, 2009.*
10.9 Form of Aircraft Time Sharing Agreement, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 10 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’ s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the fiscal quarter ended March 21, 2009.*
10.10 PBG 2004  Long Term Incentive Plan, which is incorporated herein by referen ce to Exhibit 99.1 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Registration Statement on Form S-8 (Registration No. 333-16 5107) filed with the
Securities and Exchange Commission on February 26, 2010.*
10.11PBG Stock Incentive Plan, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 99.6 to PepsiCo,
Inc.’s Registration Statement on Form S-8 (Registration No. 333-165107) filed with the Securities
and Exchange Commission on February 26, 2010.*
10.12 Amendments to PBG 2002 Long Term Incentive Plan, PBG Long Term Incentive Plan, The Pepsi
Bottling Group, Inc. 1999 Long Term Incentive Plan and PBG Stock Incentive Plan (effective
February 8, 2007), which are incorpor ated herein by reference to Exhibit 99.7 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s
Registration Statem ent on Form S-8 (Registration No. 333-165107) filed with the Securities and
Exchange Commission on February 26, 2010.*
10.13 Amendments to PBG 2004 Long Term Incentive Plan, PBG 2002 Long Term Incentive Plan, The
Pepsi Bottling Group, Inc. Long Term Incentive Plan, The Pepsi Bottling Group, Inc. 1999 Long
Term Incentive Plan, PBG Directors’  Stock Plan and PBG Stock Incentive Plan (effective February
19, 2010), which are incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 99.8 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Registration
Statement on Form S-8 (Registration No. 333-165107) filed with the Securities and Exchange
Commission on February 26, 2010.*
10.14 Specified Employee  Amendments to Arrangements Subject to Section 409A  of the Internal Revenue
Code, adopted February 18, 2010 and March 29, 2010, which is incorporated herein by reference to
Exhibit 10.13 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended
March 20, 2010.*
10.15 Form of Performance-Based Long-T erm Incentive Award Agreement, which is incorporated herein
by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities
and Exchange Commission on April 16, 2010.*
10.16 Form of Annual Long-T erm Incentive Award Agreement, which is incorporated  herein by reference
to Exhibit 10.1 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended
March 24, 2012.*
10.17 Form of Annual Long-T erm Incentive Award Agreement, which is incorporated  herein by reference
to Exhibit  10.1 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and
Exchange Commission on March 18, 2013.*
141
Table of Contents
10.18 PepsiCo, Inc. 2007 Long-T erm Incentiv e Plan, as amended and restated March 13, 2014, which is
incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed
with the Securities and Exchange Commission on March 14, 2014.*
10.19 PepsiCo, Inc. Execu tive Incentive Compensation Plan, as amended and restated effective February 7,
2014, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit B to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Proxy Statement for
its 2014 Annual Meeting of Sharehold ers filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
March 21, 2014.*
10.20 The Pepsi Co International Retirement Plan Defined Benefit Program, as amended and restated
effective as of January 1, 2019.*
10.21 The PepsiCo International Retirement Plan Defined Contribution Program, as amended and restated
effective as of January 1, 2019.*
10.22 PepsiCo, Inc. Long-T erm Incentive Plan (as amended and restated May 4, 2016), which is
incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit B to PepsiCo’ s Proxy Statement for its 2016 Annual
Meeting of Shareholders, filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on March 18, 2016.*
10.23 Form of Annual Long-T erm Incentive Award Agreement, which is incorporated  herein by reference
to Exhibit 10.1 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended
March 19, 2016.*
10.24 PepsiCo Pension Equalization Plan (the Plan Document for the Pre-409A  Program), as amended and
restated effective as of April 1, 2016, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’ s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended March 19, 2016.*
10.25 PepsiCo Pension Equalization Plan (Plan Document for the Section 409A  Program), amended and
restated ef fective as of January 1, 2019.*
10.26 PepsiCo Automatic Retirement Contribution Equalization Plan, as amended and restated effective as
of January 1, 2019.*
10.27 PepsiCo Director Deferral Program (Plan Document for the 409A  Program), amended and restated
effective as of December 20, 2017, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 10.41 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’ s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 30, 2017.*
10.28 Form of Annual Long-T erm Incentive Award Agreement, which is incorporated  herein by reference
to Exhibit 10.49 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December
31, 2016.*
10.29 PepsiCo Executive Income Deferral Program (Plan Document for the 409A  Program), amended and
restated effective as of January 1, 2005 (with amendments through March  9, 2017), which is
incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q
for the quarterly period ended March 25, 2017.*
10.30 Five-Y ear Credit Agreement, dated as of June 4, 2018, among PepsiCo, Inc., as borrower , the lenders
named therein, and Citibank, N.A., as administrative agent, which is incorporated herein by reference
to Exhibit  10.1 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and
Exchange Commission on June 5, 2018.
10.31 Amendment to Certain PepsiCo Award  Agreements, which is incorporated herein by reference to
Exhibit 10.45 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 30,
2017. *
10.32 Amendment to the PBG 2004 Long Term Incentive Plan and the PBG Stock Incentive Plan, effective
December 20, 2017, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 10.46 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s
Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 30, 2017.*
10.33 PepsiCo, Inc. Long Term Incentive Plan (as amended and restated December 20, 2017),which is
incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 10.47 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for
the fiscal year ended December 30, 2017.*
142
Table of Contents
10.34 Form of Annual Long-T erm Incentive Award Agreement, which is incorporated  herein by reference
to Exhibit 10.1 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended
March 24, 2018.*
10.35 Form of Performance-Based Long-T erm Incentive Award Agreement, which is incorporated herein
by referen ce to Exhibit 10.2 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarterly
period ended March 24, 2018.*
10.36 PepsiCo, Inc. Executive Incentive Compensation Plan, as amended and restate d effective February
13, 2019.*
21 Subsidiaries of PepsiCo, Inc.
23 Consent of KPMG LLP .
24 Power of Attorney .
31 Certification of our Chief Executive Officer and our Chief Financial Officer pursuant to Section 302
of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
32 Certification of our Chief Executive Officer and our Chief Financial Officer pursuant to Section 906
of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
101The follow ing materials from PepsiCo, Inc.’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended
December 29, 2018 formatted in XBRL (eXtensible Business Reporting Language): (i) the
Consolidated Statem ent of Income, (ii) the Consolidated Statement of Comprehensive Income, (iii)
the Conso lidated Statement of Cash Flow s, (iv) the Consolidated Balance Sheet,  (v) the Consolidated
Statement of Equity and (vi) Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements.
* Management contracts and compensatory plans or arrangements required to be filed as exhibits pursuant to Item 15(a)(3) of
this report.
143
Table of Contents
SIGNA TURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, PepsiCo has duly
caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
Dated: February 15, 2019
 
   
 PepsiCo, Inc.
   
 By: /s/ Ramon L. Laguarta
  Ramon L. Laguarta
  Chairman of the Board of Directors and Chief
Executive Of ficer
144
Table of Contents
Pursuant to the requirements of the Secu rities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the
following persons on behalf of PepsiCo and in the capacities and on the date indicated.
 
   
SIGNA TURE TITLE DATE
/s/    Ramon L. Laguarta Chairman of the Board of Directors February 15, 2019
Ramon L. Laguarta and Chief Executive Of ficer  
/s/    Hugh F . Johnston Vice Chairman, Executive Vice President February 15, 2019
Hugh F . Johnston and Chief Financial Of ficer  
/s/    Marie T. Gallagher Senior Vice President and Controller February 15, 2019
Marie T. Gallagher (Principal Accounting Of ficer)  
/s/    Shona L. Brown Director February 15, 2019
Shona L. Brown   
/s/    Geor ge W. Buckley Director February 15, 2019
Geor ge W. Buckley   
/s/    Cesar Conde Director February 15, 2019
Cesar Conde   
/s/    Ian M. Cook Director February 15, 2019
Ian M. Cook   
/s/    Dina Dublon Director February 15, 2019
Dina Dublon   
/s/    Richard W. Fisher Director February 15, 2019
Richard W. Fisher   
/s/    William R. Johnson Director February 15, 2019
William R. Johnson   
/s/    David C. Page Director February 15, 2019
David C. Page   
/s/    Robert C. Pohlad Director February 15, 2019
Robert C. Pohlad   
/s/    Daniel Vasella Director February 15, 2019
Daniel Vasella   
/s/    Darren Walker Director February 15, 2019
Darren Walker   
/s/    Alberto Weisser Director February 15, 2019
Alberto Weisser   
145
